2
THE LAND-FEVER.
The
wild new country, with all its coarseness and all its
disadvantages of various kinds, has yet a fascination for the
settler, in consequence of a certain free, hearty tone, which has
long since disappeared, if indeed it ever existed, in parts of the
country where civilization has made greater progress. The
really fastidious, and those who only pretend to be such, may hold
this as poor compensation for the many things lacking of another
kind; but those to whose apprehension sympathy and sincerity
have a pre-eminent and independent charm, prefer the kindly
warmth of the untaught, to the icy chill of the half-taught; and
would rather be welcomed by the woodsman to his log-cabin, with
its rough hearth, than make one of a crowd who feed the
ostentation
of a
millionaire
, or gaze with sated eyes upon costly feasts
which it would be a mockery to dignify with the name of
hospitality
.
The infrequency of inns in a newly settled country leads
naturally to the practice of keeping open house for strangers;
and it is rare indeed that the settler, however poor his
accommodations
,
hesitates to offer the best he has to the tired wayfarer.
Where payment is accepted, it is usually very inconsiderable;
and it is seldom accepted at all, unless the guest is manifestly
better off than his entertainer. But whether a compensation be
taken or refused, the heartiness of manner with which every thing
that the house affords is offered, cannot but be acceptable to the
visitor. Even the ever rampant pride, which comes up so
disagreeably
at the West, where the outward appearance of the
stranger betokens any advantage of condition, slumbers when
that stranger claims hospitality. His horse is cared for with
more solicitude than the host ever bestows on his own; the table
is covered with the best provisions the house affords, set forth in
the holiday dishes; the bed is endued with the brightest
patchwork
quiltthe pride of the housewife's heart; and if there be
any fat fowlsany white honeyany good teaabout the
premises
,
the guest will be sure to have it, even though it may have
been reserved for Independence or Thanksgiving.
This habit was however reversed, or at least suspended, during
the speculating times. The country was then inundated with
people who came to buy land,not to clear and plough, but as
men buy a lottery-ticket or dig for goldin the hope of
unreasonable
and unearned profits. These people were considered as
public enemies. No personal violence was offered them, as might
have been the case at the Southwest; but every obstacle, in the
shape of extravagant charges, erroneous information, and rude
refusal, was thrown in their way. Few were discouraged by
this, however; for they came in the spirit of the knights of
romance
when they had to enter enchanted castlesstrong in faith
of the boundless treasures which were to reward their
perseverance
.
To mislead an unpractised land-hunter was a matter of no
great difficulty; for few things are more intricate and
puzzling
,
at first, than the system which has been devised to
facilitate
the identifying of particular spots. Section-corners and
quarter-stakes, eighties, and forties, and fractions, are plain
enough when one is habituated to them, and they
seem
plain
enough to the new man,on paper. But when he finds himself
in the woods, with his maps and his copious memoranda, he is
completely at sea, with no guide but the compass. A friend
who afterwards became quite a proficient in the mysteries of
land-finding tells me that he twice lost himself completely in the
woods. The first time, he says, my mishap was owing to
the wandering habits of a wild Indian pony which I had chosen
on account of his power of ceaseless travel. He had been
accustomed
to pick up his living where he could find it, and he took
advantage of my jogging pace, just at dusk, when I did not feel
too
certain of my whereabout, to quit the scarce-defined road, in
search of something tempting which he espied at a distance. My
resource in this case was to abandon my horse, and fix my eyes
on the North Star, which I knew would bring me to a certain
State road, in due time. The other occasion was in broad
day-light
,
but when there was only an occasional gleam of sunshine,
so that I had no steady guide as to direction. The ground was so
thickly strown with leaves that my horse's hoofs left no permanent
track, and I found myself in a complete maze. The trees were
all alike to my bewildered eyes (I had left my compass at the last
lodging-place,); and all I knew was that I was south of the road
which I had quitted for the sake of saving some miles' distance
After many efforts at marking treesvery ineffectual without an
axeI bethought me of a newspaper, which I tore into pieces
and affixed to bushes and low limbs as I went, and so obtained a
straight line; by which means, after some hours' rather anxious
wandering, I was finally extricated.
To pass a night in the woods is a small affair for a hunting
party; but it is something quite different for a solitary individual,
unprovided with axe or gun, and, of course, unable to make
himself
comfortable in any way. To sleep in a tree might do, if
trees were not occasionally haunted by wild cats; or a lair in the
heaped leaves of autumn, if there were not a chance of warming
into activity a nest of rattlesnakes. These are no doubt partly
useless fears, but to the stranger they are very real; and they
tend not a little to the increase of his difficulties by discomposing
his nerves when cool reflection would be his best friend.
Mistakes in locating land were often very serious, even
where there had been no intention to deceivethe purchaser
finding
only swamp or hopeless gravel, when he had purchased fine
farming land and maple timber. Every mile square is marked
by blazed trees, and the corners especially distinguished by stakes
whose place is pointed out by trees called Witness-trees, and so
accurate and so minute is the whole system that it seems almost
incredible that so many errors should have arisen. The
back-woodsman
made no mistakes, for to him a stump, or a stone, or
a prostrate tree, has individuality; and he will never confound it
with any other. One accustomed to wandering in the woods will
know even the points of the compass, in a strange place, without
sun or star to guide him. But the fact of the unwillingness of
the actual settler to guide the speculator faithfully, became so
well known, that purchasers often preferred relying on their own
sagacity, backed by what seemed unmistakable rules, to trusting
such disaffected guides. Innumerable stories are current in the
woods of the perplexities of city gentlemen;and the following,
if not strictly true, will serve to illustrate somewhat the state
of things in those wild times when sober prudence was forgotten,
and delusion ruled the hour. I shall call it, for want of better
title,
A REMINISCENCE OF THE LAND-FEVER.
The
years 1835 and 1836 will long be remembered by the
Western settlerand perhaps by some few people at the East,
tooas the period when the madness of speculation in lands had
reached a point to which no historian of the time will ever be
able to do justice. A faithful picture of those wild days would
subject the most veracious chronicler to the charge of
exaggeration
;
and our great-grand-children can hope to obtain an adequate
idea of the infatuation which led away their forefathers, only by
the study of such detached facts as may be noted down by those
in whose minds the feeling recollection of the delusion is still
fresh. Perhaps when our literary existence shall have become
sufficiently confirmed to call for the collection of Ana, something
more may be gleaned from the correspondence in which were
embodied the exultings of the successful, and the lamentations of
the disappointed.
Seeing is believing, certainly, in most cases; but in the days
of the land-fever, we, who were in the midst of the infected
district
,
scarcely found it so. The whirl, the fervour, the flutter, the
rapidity of step, the sparkling of eyes, the beating of hearts, the
striking of hands, the utter
abandon
of the hour, were incredible,
inconceivable. The man of one idea was every where: no
man had two. He who had no money, begged, borrowed, or stole
it; he who had, thought he made a generous sacrifice, if he lent
it at cent per cent. The tradesman forsook his shop; the farmer
his plough; the merchant his counter; the lawyer his office;
nay, the minister his desk, to join the general chase. Even the
schoolmaster, in his longing to be abroad with the rest, laid
down his birch, or in the flurry of his hopes, plied it with
diminished
unction.
Tramp! tramp! along the land they rode,
Splash! splash! along the sea!
The man with one leg, or he that had none, could at least get on
board a steamer, and make for Chicago or Milwaukie; the strong,
the able, but above all, the enterprising, set out with his
pocketmap
and his pocket-compass, to thread the dim woods, and see
with his own eyes. Who would waste time in planting, in
building
,
in hammering iron, in making shoes, when the path to wealth
lay wide and flowery before him?
A ditcher was hired by the job to do a certain piece of work in
his line. Well, John, did you make any thing?
Pretty well; I cleared about two dollars a day: but I should
have made more by
standing round;
[1]
[1]
Verbatim.
i. e., watching the
land-market
for bargains.
This favourite occupation of all classes was followed by its
legitimate consequences. Farmers were as fond of standing
round as any body; and when harvest time came, it was
discovered
that many had quite forgotten that the best land requires
sowing; and grain, and of course other articles of general
necessity
,
rose to an unprecedented price. The hordes of travellers
flying through the country in all directions were often cited as the
cause of the distressing scarcity; but the true source must be
sought in the diversion, or rather suspension, of the industry of
the entire population. Be this as it may, of the wry faces made
at the hard fare, the travellers contributed no inconsiderable
portion; for they were generally city gentlemen, or at least
gentlemen
who had lived long enough in the city to have learned to
prefer oysters to salt pork. This checked not their ardour,
however
;
for the golden glare before their eyes had power to neutralize
the hue of all present objects. On they pressed, with headlong
zeal: the silent and pathless forest, the deep miry marsh, the
gloom of night, and the fires of noon, beheld alike the march of
the speculator. Such searching of trees for town lines! Such
ransacking of the woods for section corners, ranges, and base
lines! Such anxious care in identifying spots possessing
particular
advantages! And then, alas! after all, such precious
blunders!
These blunders called into action another class of operators,
who became popularly known as land-lookers. These met
you at every turn, ready to furnish water-power, pine lots,
choice farming tracts, or any thing else, at a moment's notice.
Bar-rooms and street-corners swarmed with these prowling gentry.
It was impossible to mention any part of the country which they
had not personally surveyed. They would tell you, with the
gravity of astrologers, what sort of timber predominated on any
given tract, drawing sage deductions as to the capabilities of the
soil. Did you incline to city property? Lo! a splendid chart,
setting forth the advantages of some unequalled site, and your
confidential friend, the land-looker, able to tell you more than all
about it, or to accompany you to the happy spot; though that he
would not advise; bad roads, nothing fit to eat, etc.; and
all this from a purely disinterested solicitude for your welfare.
These amiable individuals were, strange to tell, no favourites
with the actual settlers. If they disliked the gentleman
speculator
,
they hated with a perfect hatred him who aided by his local
knowledge the immense purchases of non-residents. These
short-sighted and prejudiced persons forgot the honour and
distinction
which must result from their insignificant farms being
surrounded by the possessions of the magnates of the land.
They saw only the solitude which would probably be entailed on
them for years; and it was counted actual treason in a settler to
give any facilities to the land-looker, of whatever grade. Let
the land-shark do his own hunting, was their frequent reply to
applications of this kind; and some thought them quite right.
Yet this state of feeling among the Hard-handed, was not without
its inconvenient results to city gentlemen, as witness the case of
our friend Mr. Willoughby, a very prim and smart bachelor,
from
It was when the whirlwind was at its height, that a gentleman
wearing the air of a bank-director, at the very leastin other
words, that of an uncommonly fat pigeondrew bridle at the
bars in front of one of the roughest log houses in the county of
. The horse and his rider were loaded with all those
unnecessary defences, and cumbrous comforts, which the fashion
of the time prescribed in such cases. Blankets, valise,
saddle-bags
,
and holsters nearly covered the steed; a most voluminous
enwrapment of India-rubber cloth completely enveloped the rider.
The gallant sorrel seemed indeed fit for his burden. He looked
as if he might have swam any stream in Michigan
Barded from counter to tail,
And the rider arm'd complete in mail;
yet he seemed a little jaded, and hung his head languidly, while
his master accosted the tall and meagre tenant of the log cabin.
This individual and his dwelling resembled each other in an
unusual degree. The house was, as we have said, of the
roughest
;
its ribs scarcely half filled in with clay; its looped and
windowed raggedness rendered more conspicuous by the tattered
cotton sheets which had long done duty as glass, and which now
fluttered in every breeze; its roof of oak shingles, warped into
every possible curve; and its stick chimney, so like its owner's
hat, open at the top, and jammed in at the sides; all shadowed
forth the contour and equipments of the exceedingly easy and
self-satisfied person who leaned on the fence, and snapped his long
cart-whip, while he gave such answers as suited him to the
gentleman
in the India-rubbers, taking especial care not to invite him
to alight.
Can you tell me, my friend, civilly began Mr.
Willoughby
.
Oh!
friend!
interrupted the settler; who told you I was
your friend? Friends is scuss in these parts.
You have at least no reason to be otherwise, replied the
traveller, who was blessed with a very patient temper, especially
where there was no use in getting angry.
I don't know that, was the reply. What fetch'd you into
these woods?
If I should say `my horse,' the answer would perhaps be as
civil as the question.
Jist as you like, said the other, turning on his heel, and
walking off.
I wished merely to ask you, resumed Mr. Willoughby,
talking after the nonchalant son of the forest, whether this is
Mr. Pepper's land.
How do you know it an't mine?
I'm not likely to know, at present, it seems, said the
traveller
,
whose patience was getting a little frayed. And taking out
his memorandum-book, he ran over his minutes: South half of
north-west quarter of section fourteenYour name is Leander
Pepper, is it not?
Where did you get so much news? You a'n't the sheriff,
be ye?
Pop! screamed a white-headed urchin from the house,
Mam says supper's ready.
So ain't I, replied the papa; I've got all my chores to do
yet. And he busied himself at a log pig-stye on the opposite
side of the road, half as large as the dwelling-house. Here he
was soon surrounded by a squealing multitude, with whom he
seemed to hold a regular conversation.
Mr. Willoughby looked at the westering sun, which was not
far above the dense wall of trees that shut in the small
clearing
;
then at the heavy clouds which advanced from the north,
threatening a stormy night; then at his watch, and then at his
note-book; and after all, at his predicamenton the whole, an
unpleasant prospect. But at this moment a female face showed
itself at the door. Our traveller's memory reverted at once to
the testimony of Ledyard and Mungo Park; and he had also
some floating and indistinct poetical recollections of woman's
being useful when a man was in difficulties, though hard to
please at other times. The result of these reminiscences, which
occupied a precious second, was, that Mr. Willoughby
dismounted
,
fastened his horse to the fence, and advanced with a brave
and determined air, to throw himself upon female kindness and
sympathy.
He naturally looked at the lady, as he approached the door,
but she did not return the compliment. She looked at the pigs,
and talked to the children, and Mr. Willoughby had time to
observe
that she was the very duplicate of her husband; as tall, as
bony, as ragged, and twice as cross-looking.
Malviny Jane! she exclaimed, in no dulcet treble, be
done a-paddlin' in that 'ere water! If I come there, I'll
You'd better look at Sophrony, I guess! was the reply.
Why, what's she a-doin'?
Well, I guess if you look, you'll see! responded Miss
Malvina
,
coolly, as she passed into the house, leaving at every step
a full impression of her foot in the same black mud that covered
her sister from head to foot.
The latter was saluted with a hearty cuff, as she emerged from
the puddle; and it was just at the propitious moment when her
shrill howl aroused the echoes, that Mr. Willoughby, having
reached the threshold, was obliged to set about making the
agreeable
to the mamma. And he called up for the occasion all his
politeness.
I believe I must become an intruder on your hospitality for
the night, madam, he began. The dame still looked at the
pigs. Mr. Willoughby tried again, in less courtly phrase.
Will it be convenient for you to lodge me to-night, ma'am?
I have been disappointed in my search for a hunting-party, whom
I had engaged to meet, and the night threatens a storm.
I don't know nothin' about it; you must ask the old man,
said the lady, now for the first time taking a survey of the new
comer; with
my
will, we'll lodge nobody.
This was not very encouraging, but it was a poor night for the
woods; so our traveller persevered, and making so bold a push
for the door that the lady was obliged to retreat a little, he
entered
,
and said he would await her husband's coming.
And in truth he could scarcely blame the cool reception he had
experienced, when he beheld the state of affairs within those
muddy
precincts. The room was large, but it swarmed with human
beings. The huge open fire-place, with its hearth of rough stone,
occupied nearly the whole of one end of the apartment; and near
it stood a long cradle, containing a pair of twins, who crieda
sort of hopeless cry, as if they knew it would do no good, yet
could not help it. The schoolmaster, (it was his week,) sat
reading
a tattered novel, and rocking the cradle occasionally, when
the children cried
too
loud. An old grey-headed Indian was
curiously
crouched over a large tub, shelling corn on the edge of a
hoe; but he ceased his noisy employment when he saw the
stranger
,
for no Indian will ever willingly be seen at work, though
he may be sometimes compelled by the fear of starvation or the
longing for whiskey, to degrade himself by labour. Near the
only window was placed the work-bench and entire paraphernalia
of the shoemaker, who in these regions travels from house to
house, shoeing the family and mending the harness as he goes,
with various interludes of songs and jokes, ever new and
acceptable
.
This one, who was a little, bald, twinkling-eyed fellow,
made the smoky rafters ring with the burden of that favourite
ditty of the west:
All kinds of game to hunt, my boys, also the buck and doe,
All down by the banks of the river O-hi-o;
and children of all sizes, clattering in all keys, completed the
picture and the concert.
The supper-table, which maintained its place in the midst of
this living and restless mass, might remind one of the square
stone lying bedded in the bustling leaves of the acanthus; but
the associations would be any but those of Corinthian elegance.
The only object which at that moment diversified its dingy
surface
was an iron hoop, into which the mistress of the feast
proceeded
to turn a quantity of smoking hot potatoes, adding
afterward
a bowl of salt, and another of pork fat, by courtesy
denominated
gravy: plates and knives dropped in afterward, at the
discretion
of the company.
Another call of Pop! pop! brought in the host from the
pig-stye
;
the heavy rain which had now began to fall, having no
doubt, expedited the performance of the chores. Mr. Willoughby,
who had established himself resolutely, took advantage of a very
cloudy assent from the proprietor, to lead his horse to a shed, and
to deposit in a corner his cumbrous outer gear; while the
company
used in turn the iron skillet which served as a wash-basin,
dipping the water from a large trough outside, overflowing with
the abundant drippings of the eaves. Those who had no
pocket-handkerchiefs
,
contented themselves with a nondescript article
which seemed to stand for the family towel; and when this
ceremony
was concluded, all seriously addressed themselves to the
demolition
of the potatoes. The grown people were accommodated
with chairs and chests; the children prosecuted a series of flying
raids upon the good cheer, snatching a potato now and then as
they could find an opening under the raised arm of one of the
family, and then retreating to the chimney corner, tossing the hot
prize from hand to hand, and blowing it stoutly the while. The
old Indian had disappeared.
To our citizen, though he felt inconveniently hungry, this
primitive meal seemed a little meagre; and he ventured to ask if
he could not be accommodated with some tea.
An't my victuals good enough for you?
Oh!the potatoes are excellent, but I'm very fond of tea.
So be I, but I can't have every thing I wantcan you?
This produced a laugh from the shoemaker, who seemed to
think his patron very witty, while the schoolmaster, not knowing
but the stranger might happen to be one of his examiners next
year, produced only a faint giggle, and then reducing his
countenance
instantly to an awful gravity, helped himself to his
seventh
potato.
The rain which now poured violently, not only outside but
through many a crevice in the roof, naturally kept Mr.
Willoughby
cool; and finding that dry potatoes gave him the hiccups, he
withdrew from the table, and seating himself on the shoemaker's
bench, took a survey of his quarters.
Two double-beds and the long cradle, seemed all the sleeping
apparatus; but there was a ladder which doubtless led to a
lodging
above. The sides of the room were hung with abundance
of decent clothing, and the dresser was well stored with the usual
articles, among which a tea-pot and canister shone conspicuous;
so that the appearance of inhospitality could not arise from
poverty
,
and Mr. Willoughby concluded to set it down to the account
of rustic ignorance.
The eating ceased not until the hoop was empty, and then the
company rose and stretched themselves, and began to guess it
was about time to go to bed. Mr. Willoughby inquired what
was to be done with his horse.
Well! I s'pose he can stay where he is.
But what can he have to eat?
I reckon you won't get nothing for him, without you turn
him out on the mash.
He would get off, to a certainty!
Tie his legs.
The unfortunate traveller argued in vain. Hay was scuss,
and potatoes were scusser; and in short the mash was the
only resource, and these natural meadows afford but poor picking
after the first of October. But to the mash was the good steed
despatched, ingloriously hampered, with the privilege of
munching
wild grass in the rain, after his day's journey.
Then came the question of lodging for his master. The lady,
who had by this time drawn out a trundle-bed, and packed it full
of children, said there was no bed for him, unless he could sleep
up chamber with the boys.
Mr. Willoughby declared that he should make out very well
with a blanket by the fire.
Well! just as you like, said his host; but Solomon sleeps
there, and if you like to sleep by Solomon, it is more than
I
should.
This was the name of the old Indian, and Mr. Willoughby
once more cast woful glances toward the ladder.
But now the schoolmaster, who seemed rather disposed to be
civil, declared that he could sleep very well in the long cradle,
and would relinquish his place beside the shoemaker to the guest,
who was obliged to content himself with this arrangement, which
was such as was most usual in those times.
The storm continued through the night, and many a crash in
the woods attested its power. The sound of a storm in the dense
forest is almost precisely similar to that of a heavy surge
breaking
on a rocky beach; and when our traveller slept, it was only
to dream of wreck and disaster at sea, and to wake in horror and
affright. The wild rain drove in at every crevice, and wet the
poor children in the loft so thoroughly, that they crawled
shivering
down the ladder, and stretched themselves on the hearth,
regardless
of Solomon, who had returned after the others were in
bed.
But morning came at last; and our friend, who had no desire
farther to test the vaunted hospitality of a western settler, was not
among the latest astir. The storm had partially subsided; and
although the clouds still lowered angrily, and his saddle had
enjoyed
the benefit of a leak in the roof during the night, Mr.
Willoughby
resolved to push on as far as the next clearing, at least,
hoping for something for breakfast besides potatoes and salt. It
took him a weary while to find his horse, and when he had saddled
him, and strapped on his various accoutrements, he entered the
house, and inquired what he was to pay for his entertainment
laying somewhat of a stress on the last word.
His host, nothing daunted, replied that he guessed he would let
him off for a dollar.
Mr. Willoughby took out his purse, and as he placed a silver
dollar in the leathern palm outspread to receive it, happening to
look toward the hearth, and perceiving the preparations for a very
substantial breakfast, the long pent-up vexation burst forth.
I really must say, Mr. Pepper he began: his tone was
certainly that of an angry man, but it only made his host laugh.
If this is your boasted western hospitality, I can tell you
You'd better tell me what the dickens you are peppering me
up this fashion for! My name isn't Pepper, no more than yours
is! May be that
is
your name; you seem pretty warm.
Your name not Pepper! Pray what is it, then?
Ah! there's the thing now! You land-hunters ought to know
sich things without asking.
Land-hunter! I'm no land-hunter!
Well! you're a land-shark, thenswallowin' up poor men's
farms. The less I see of such cattle, the better I'm pleased.
Confound you! said Mr. Willoughby, who waxed warm, I
tell you I've nothing to do with land. I wouldn't take your whole
state for a gift.
What did you tell my woman you was a land-hunter for,
then?
And now the whole matter became clear in a moment; and it
was found that Mr. Willoughby's equipment, with the mention of
a hunting party, had completely misled both host and hostess.
And to do them justice, never were regret and vexation more
heartily expressed.
You needn't judge our new-country folks by me, said Mr.
Handy, for such proved to be his name; any man in these parts
would as soon bite off his own nose, as to snub a civil traveller
that wanted a supper and a night's lodging. But somehow or other,
your lots o' fixin', and your askin' after that 'ere Pepperone of
the worst land-sharks we've ever had heremade me mad; and
I know I treated you worse than an Indian.
Humph! said Solomon.
But, continued the host, you shall see whether my old
woman
can't set a good breakfast, when she's a mind to. Come,
you shan't stir a step till you've had breakfast; and just take
back this plaguey dollar. I wonder it didn't burn my fingers
when I took it!
Mrs. Handy set forth her very best, and a famous breakfast it
was, considering the times. And before it was finished, the
hunting
party made their appearance, having had some difficulty in
finding their companion, who had made no very uncommon
mistake
as to section corners and town-lines.
I'll tell ye what, said Mr. Handy, confidentially, as the
cavalcade
with its baggage-ponies, loaded with tents, gun-cases, and
hampers of provisions, was getting into order for a march to the
prairies, I'll tell ye what; if you've occasion to stop any where
in the Bush, you'd better tell 'em at the first goin' off that you
a'n't land-hunters.
But Mr. Willoughby had already had a caution.
BALL AT THRAM'S HUDDLE.
The
winter being a time of comparative leisure for the farmer
and his family, is generally the chosen period for regular,
premeditated
amusements, such as dancing, seeing shows, and
going
to school;this last being considered only fit to fill up spare
time of such young people as are old enough to do any thing
useful. A ball on Christmas or New-Year night, or in
commemoration
of Jackson's victory, or Washington's birth, is always
in order; as those ears happen all to occur in the depth of winter.
And the raree-shows which traverse the remoter parts of the
country, almost invariably offer their attractions about the same
period, their owners knowing very well that the farmer never feels
so generous or so jovial as when his crops are all safely housed,
and his wheat in the ground for next year's harvest.
These exhibitions are a rich treat, sometimes; not only to those
who gaze upon them in good faith, but to the cooler spectator,
employed
rather in watching the company than the performers. I
remember one, the
matriel
of which was a Lecture on Astronomy,
with Orrery and Tellurium, (grand-sounding amusements for the
woods!) a model of Perkins' steam gun, and a Magic Lantern.
The master of ceremonies (feeling very little ceremony himself,)
went about quite coolly, with his hat on and a segar in his mouth,
marshalling the company, and ordering the boys to make themselves
as small as they could, in order that he might the more easily
get round to take up a contribution before the exercises began.
The fee, being left to the generosity of the spectators, was not
very burthensome in collecting; and the orator declared before
he began the lecture, that he had not received enough to pay for
the candlesof which, by the bye, there were only four, for an
audience of nearly an hundred people. This moved a good
woman
on one of the back seats so deeply, that she asked him to
wait a minute, and then passed a sixpence, along a line of ready
hands, to the rostrum, where the pathetic speaker, after first
examining
it on both sides by the nearest candle, put it in his
pocket
,
and then, with a more contented air, ordered the music to
begin
.
The violin accordingly struck up a lively tune, to which all
the male part of the audience kept time with their feet; and the
lecture, thus gilded over like a bitter pill, began. But such a
lecture! It was read off by rote, the reader evidently knowing
no more of his subject than of Hebrew, and having merely
garbled
from some dull treatise, an incomprehensible jumble of facts
and theories that would have puzzled Sir John Herschel in the
disentangling. The effect of such amusement on such an
audience
may easily be imagined. Some yawned, some nodded, and
some went fairly and audibly to sleep. In vain the four candles
were snuffedin vain the lecturer told his audience that he was
just going to bite offthey evidently began to wish their
sixpences
back in their pockets, when the lecturer finished and the
violin was heard once more. This crisped the spirits of the
company
admirably, and the most curious blundering expositions of
the Orrery and Tellurium found tolerably willing ears. The
showman had wisely put the worst first; and now having done
with the stars, he came to the steam gun, which took very well;
the alcohol burning properly blue, and the reports being managed
with the gentleness of any sucking dove.
But the cream of the night was the Magic Lantern, which had
at least the merit of being suited to the apprehension of the
auditory
;
its grotesque figures and frightful goblins possessing, too,
the additional advantage of being set off by the operator's wit.
The extinguishment of the lights set all the babies crying at once;
but the violin, or some panacea discovered by the mammas,
quieted
them after a while; and we saw the ghost that scared
London
for twenty years roll his eyes horribly, and were told by
the operator that that was the way the young men cast sheep's
eyes when they went a-speaking. This idea created a laugh of
course, which seemed a happy relief to some of the spectators,
who had begun to feel very squeamish at the sight of a ghost. The
night-mare, and several other engaging physiognomies, were still
to come, and after all was over, in spite of desperate jokes, some
3
of the ladies declared audibly as they went out, that they did not
expect to sleep a wink all night. Yet they were doubtless sure
not to miss the next exhibition of the same kind.
The only exception to the choice of winter for regular
amusements
,
is the ball on Independence night, or rather day, for we
take time by the forelock. In the sketch which follows, I have
endeavoured to give an idea of one of these; but it must be
understood
that the description applies to a newly settled part of the
country, far from the vicinity of any large town.
It
was on the sultriest of all melting afternoons, when the flies
were taking an unanimous siesta, and the bees, baked beyond
honey or humming, swung idly on the honeysuckles, that I
observed
,
with half-shut eye, something like activity among the
human butterflies of our most peaceful of villages. If I could
have persuaded myself to turn my head, I might doubtless have
ascertained to what favoured point were directed the steps (hasty,
considering all things,) of the Miss Liggits, Miss Pinn, and my
pretty friend, Fanny Russell; but the hour was unpropitious to
research, and slumber beguiled the book from my fingers, before
the thought Where
can
they be going! had fairly passed
through my mind. Fancy had but just transported me to the
focus of a circle of glass-blowers, the furnace directly in front,
and the glowing fluid all round me, when I was recalled to
almost
equally overcoming realities, by a light tap at the door. I
must have given the usual invitation mechanically, for before I
was fairly awake, the pink face of one of my own hand-maidens
shone before my drowsy eyes.
If you don't want me for nothin', I'd like to go down to the
store to get some notions for the ball.
The ball! what! a red-hot ball! I replied, for the drowsy
influence was settling over me again, and I was already on the
deck of a frigate, in the midst of a sharply-contested action.
Massy no, marm! this here Independence ball up to Thram's
Huddle, said Jane, with a giggle.
I was now wide awake with astonishment. A dance, Jane,
in such weather as this!
Why law! yes; nothin' makes a body so cool as dancin' and
drinkin' hot tea.
This was beyond argument. Jane departed, and I amused
myself with the flittings of gingham sun-bonnets and white aprons
up and down the street, in the scorching sun.
It was waxing toward the tea-hour, when that prettiest of
Fannies
,
Fanny Russell, her natural ringlets of shadowy gold, which
a duchess might envy, looking all the richer under the melting
influence of the time, came tripping into the little porch.
If you
would
be so kind as to lend me that large feather fan;
I would take such good care of it! It's for the ball.
Sweet Fanny! one must be churlish indeed, to deny thee a
far greater boon!
Next came that imp, Ring Jones; but he goes slyly round to
the kitchen-door, with an air of great importance. Presently,
enter Jane.
Ring Jones has brought a kind of a bill, marm, for our Mark;
and Mark ain't to hum, and Ring says he can't go without an
answer.
But I cannot answer Mark's billets, you know, Jane.
No, marm; butthis 'ere is something about the
team
, I
guess.
And in the mean time Jane had,
sans ceremonie
, broken the
wafer, and was spelling out the contents of Mark's note.
I can't justly make it out; but I know it's something about
the
team;
and they want an answer right off.
Thus urged, I took the note, which was after this fashion:
The agreeable Cumpany of Mr. Mark Loring and Lady is
requested to G. Nobleses Tavern to Thram's huddle Independence
the 4th July.
And here followed the names of some eight or ten managers.
But, Jane, here's nothing about the team, after all.
Jist look o' t'other side, marm; you see they didn't want to
put it right in the ticket, like.
Upon this hint, I discerned, in the extreme corner of the paper,
a flourish which might be interpreted over. Over I went
accordingly
,
and there came the gist of the matter.
Mark we want to hav you be ready with your Team at one
o'clock percisely to escort the ladies if you can't let us know and
don't forgit to Put in as many Seats as you can and All your
Buffaloes.
[2]
[2]
It may be necessary to inform the civilized reader, that the use of buffalo
robes in July, is to serve the purpose of cushions, and not of wrappers.
I ventured to promise that the team, and the seats, and the
buffaloes
,
should be at Mark's disposal at one percisely, and
Ring Jones departed, highly exalted in his own opinion, by the
success of his importunity.
It was to be supposed that we had now contributed our quota
of aid on this patriotic occasion; but it seemed that more was
expected. The evening was far advanced, when the
newly-installed
proprietor of the half-finished hotel at Thram's Huddle,
alighted at our door; and, wiping his dripping brow, made known
the astounding fact that he had scoured the country for dried
apples
,
without success, and informed us that he had come, as a
dernier resort
, to beg the loan of some; for, as he sensibly
observed, a ball without no pies, was a thing that was never
heerd on, no wheres.
When this matter was settled, he mustered courage to ask, in
addition, for the great favour of a gallon of vinegar, for which he
declared himself ready to pay any price; that is, any thing
that was reasonable.
I could not refrain from inquiring what indispensable purpose
the vinegar was to serve.
Why, for the lettuce, you see!and if it's pretty sharp, it'll
make 'em all the spryer.
Mr. Noble departed, in a happy frame of mind, and we heard
no more of the ball that night.
The next day, the eldest Miss Liggitt jist called in, as she
happened to be passing, to ask if I was a-goin' to want that
'ere flowery white bunnet-curting of mine.
Some time ago I might not have comprehended that this
description
applied to a blonde-gauze veil, which had seen its best
days, and was now scarce presentable. It did not require any
great stretch of feminine generosity to lend this; but when it
came to a pair of white lace gloves, I pleaded poverty, and
got off.
Our Jane, who is really quite a pretty girl, though her hair be
of the sandiest, and her face and neck, at this time of the year,
one continuous freckle, had set her heart upon a certain blue
satin ribbon, which she did not like exactly to borrow, but which
she had none the less made up her mind to have, for the grand
occasion. So she began, like an able tactician, by showing me
one of faded scarlet, on which she requested my opinion.
Don't you think this'll look about right?
That horrid thing! No, Jane, pray don't be seen in that!
Well! what kind o' colour
do
you think would look good
with this belt? holding up a cincture, blue as the cloudless vault
above us.
Blue, or white; certainly not scarlet.
Ah! but I ha'n't got neither one nor t'other; and she looked
very pensive.
I was hard-hearted, but Jane was not without resource.
If you'd a-mind to let me have that 'ere long blue one o'
your'n: you don't never wear it, and I'd be willin' to pay you for't.
Who could hold out? The azure streamer became Jane's, in
fee simple.
Spruce and warm looked our good Mark, in his tight blue
coat, with its wealth of brass buttons, his stock five fathoms
I mean inchesdeep, and his exceeding square-toed boots,
bought new for this very solemnity. And a proud and pleased
heart beat in his honest bosom, I doubt not, as he drove to the
place of rendezvous, buffaloes and all, with cerulean Jane at his
side, a full half hour before the appointed time. They need not
have cautioned Mark to be percise. For my part, I longed for
the receipt of fern-seed to walk invisible, or some of those other
talismans which used in the good old times to help people into
places where they had no business to be; and in this instance, the
Fates seemed inclined to be propitious, in a degree at least.
The revellers had scarcely passed on the western road in long
and most rapid processionthe dust they raised had certainly not
subsidedwhen a black cloud, which had risen stealthily while
all were absorbed in the outfit, began to unfold its ominous shroud.
The fringes of this portentous curtain scarcely passed the
zenith, when a low, distant muttering, and a few scattering but
immense drops, gave token of what was coming; and long ere
the gay
cortge
could have reached the Huddle, which is fully six
miles distant, a heavy shower, with thunder and lightning
accompaniments
,
must have made wet drapery of every damsel's
anxiously elaborate ball-dress. Beaver and broad-cloth might
survive such a deluge, but alas for white dresses, long ringlets,
and blonde-gauze bunnet-curtings!
The shower was too violent to last, and when it had subsided,
and all was
Fresh as if Day again were born,
Again upon the lap of Morn,
I fortunately recollected an excellent reason for a long drive,
(man is his own Fate,) which would bring us into the very
sound of the violins of the Huddle. A young woman who had
filled the very important place of help in our family, was
lying very ill at her father's; and the low circumstances of her
parents made it desirable that she should be frequently
remembered
by her friends during her tedious illness. So in a light
open wagon, with a smart pony,
borrowed
for the nonce,
selon les
regles
, we had a charming drive, and moreover, the much-coveted
pleasure of seeing the heads of the assembled company at Mr.
Noble's; some bobbing up and down, some stretched far out of
the window, getting breath for the next exercise, and some, with
bodies to them, promenading the hall below. I tried hard to
distinguish the belle chvelure of my favourite Fanny Russell,
or the straight back and nascent whiskers of our own Mark; but
we passed too rapidly to see all that was to be seen, and in a few
moments found ourselves at the bars which led to the forlorn
dwelling of poor Mary Anne Simms.
The only apartment that Mr. Simms' log-hut could boast,
was arranged with a degree of neatness which made a visitor
forget its lack of almost all the other requisites for comfort; and
one corner was ingeniously turned into a nice little room for the
sick girl, by the aid of a few rough boards eked out by
snow-white
curtains. I raised the light screen, and what bright vision
should meet my eyes, but the identical Fanny, for whom I had
looked in vain among the bobbing heads at the Huddle. She was
whispering kindly to Mary Anne, whose pale cheek had acquired
something like a flush, and her eyes a decided moisture, from the
sense of Fanny's cheering kindness.
Fanny explained very modestly: I was so near Mary Anne,
and I didn't know when I should get time to come again
Didn't you get wet, coming over?
Not so
very:
wewe had an umbrella.
I remembered having lent one to Mark.
But you are losing the ball, Fanny; you'll not get your
share of the dancing. And at this moment I heard a new step
in the outer part of the room, and a very familiar voice just
outside
the curtain:
Come, Miss Russell, isn't it about time to be a-goin'? There's
another shower a-comin' up.
Fanny started, blushed, and took leave. Common humanity
obliged us to give time for a retreat, before we followed; for we
well knew that our very precise Mr. Loring would not have been
brought face to face with us, just then, for the world. When we
did emerge, the sky was threatening enough, and as there was
evidently no room for us where we were, we had no resource but
to make a rapid transit to Mr. Noble's. We gained the noisy
shelter just in time. Such a shower!and it proved much more
pertinacious than its predecessor; so that I had the pleasure of
sitting in Miss Nobleses kitchen for an hour or more. We
were most politely urged to join the festivities which were now
shaking the frail tenement almost to dislocation; but even if we
had been ball-goers, we should have been strikingly
de trop
, where
the company was composed exclusively of young folks. So we
chose the kitchen.
The empress of this torrid region, a tall and somewhat doleful
looking dame, was in all the agonies of preparation; and she
certainly was put to her utmost stretch of invention, to obtain
access to the fire-place, where some of the destined delicacies of
the evening were still in process of qualification, so dense was the
crowd of damp damsels, who were endeavouring in various ways
to repair the cruel ravages of the shower. One jist wanted to
dry her shoes; another was dodging after a hot iron, jist to rub
off her hankercher; while others were taking turns in pinching
with the great kitchen tongs the long locks which streamed,
Ophelia-like, around their anxious faces. Poor Miss Nobles
edged, and glided, and stopped, among her humid guests, with a
patience worthy of all praise; supplying this one with a pin, that
with a needle-and-thread, and the other with one of her own
sidecombs
;
though the last mentioned act of courtesy forced her to
tuck behind her ear one of the black tresses which usually lay
coiled upon her temple. In short, the whole affair was a sort of
prelibation of the Tournament, saving that
my
Queen of Beauty
and Love was more fortunate than the Lady Seymour, in that
her
coiffure
is decidedly improved by wet weather, which is more
than could probably be said of her ladyship's.
At length, but after a weary while, all was done that could be
done toward a general beautification; and those whose array
was utterly beyond remedy, scampered up stairs with the rest,
wisely resolving not to lose the fun, merely because they were
not fit to be seen.
The dancing now became fast and furious, and the spirit of
the hour so completely aroused that thirst for knowledge which is
slanderously charged upon my sex as a foible, that I hesitated not
to slip up stairs, and take advantage of one of the various knot-holes
in the oak boards which formed one side of the room, in order
that a glimpse of something like the realities of the thing might
aid an imagination which could never boast of being all
compact
.
It was but a glimpse, to be sure, for three candles can
do but little toward illuminating a long room, with dark brown
and very rough walls; but there was a tortuous country-dance,
one side quivering and fluttering in all the colours of the
rainbow
,
the other presenting more nearly the similitude of a funeral;
for our beaux, in addition to the solemn countenances which they
think proper to adopt on all occasions of festivity, have imbibed
the opinion that nothing but broad-cloth is sufficiently dignified
wear for a dance, be the season what it may. And there
were the four Miss Liggets, Miss Mehitable in white, Miss
Polly Ann in green, Miss Lucindy in pink, and Miss Olive all
over black-and-blue, saving the remains of the blonde-gauze
veil, which streamed after her like a meteor, as she
galoped
down the middle. My own Jane was playing off her most
recherches
graces at the expense of the deputy sheriff, who
seemed for once caught, instead of catching; and to my great
surprise, Fanny Russell, evidently in the pouts, under cover of
my fan, was enacting the part of wall-flower, while Mark leaned
far out of the window, at the risk of taking an abrupt leave of
the company.
Peeping is tiresome. I was not sorry when the dance came to
an end, as even country-dances must; and when I had waited to
see the ladies arranged in a strip at one end of the room, and the
gentlemen in ditto at the other, and old Knapp the fiddler testing
the absorbent powers of a large red cotton handkerchief upon a
brow as thickly beaded as the fair neck of any one of the
nymphs around him, (and some of them had necklaces which
would have satisfied a belle among our neighbours, the
Pottowatomies
,)
I ran down stairs again, to prepare for our moonlight
flitting.
Mrs. Noble now renewed her entreaties that we would at least
stay for supper; and in the pride of her heart, and the energy
of her hospitality, she opened her oven-door, and holding a candle
that I might not fail to discern all its temptations, pointed out to
me two pigs, a large wild turkey, a mammoth rice-pudding, and
an endless array of pies of all sizes; and these she declared
were not a beginning of what was intended for the
refreshment
of the company. A cup-board was next displayed, where,
among custards, cakes, and saase, or preserves, of different
kinds, figured great dishes of lettuce, all ready, only jist to
pour the vinegar and molasses over it, bowls of large pickled
cucumbers, and huge pyramids of dough-nuts. But we continued
inexorable, and were just taking our leave, when Fanny Russell,
her pretty eyes overflowing and her whole aspect evincing the
greatest vexation and discomposure, came running down stairs,
and begged we would let her go home with us.
What
can
be the matter, Fanny!
Oh, nothing! nothing at all! ButI want to go home.
It is never of much use advising young girls, when they have
made up their minds to be foolish; yet I did just call my little
favourite aside, and give her a friendly caution not to expose
herself
to the charge of being rude or touchy. But this brought
only another shower of tears, and a promise that she would tell
me all about it; so we took her in and drove off.
I could not but reflect, as we went saunteringly home,
enjoying
the splendour of the moonlight, and the delicious balminess
of that stilly hour, how much all balls are alike. Here had
been all the solicitude and sacrifice in the preparation of
costume
;
all the effort and expense in providing the refreshments; for
the champagne and ices, the oysters and the perigord pies, are no
more to the pampered citizens, than are the humbler cates we have
attempted to enumerate, to the plain and poor back-woodsman;
then here was the belle of the evening, in as pretty a paroxysm
of insulted dignity, as could have been displayed on the most
classically-chalked floor; and, to crown all, judging from past
experience
in these regions, some of the gentlemen at least
would, like their more refined prototypes, vindicate their claims
to the title, by going home vociferously drunk. We certainly are
growing very elegant.
Fanny's explanation was deferred, at her own request, until
the following morning; and long before she made her promised
visit, Jane, who came home at day-light, and only allowed herself
a change of dress before she entered soberly upon her domestic
duties, had disclosed to me the mighty mystery. It had been the
opinion of every body, Jane herself included, (a little green-eyed,
I fancy,) that Fanny and Mark had gone off to Squire Porter's
and got married, under cover of the visit to poor Mary Anne.
This idea once started, the beaux and belles, not better bred than
some I have seen elsewhere, had not suffered the joke to drop, but
pushed their raillery so far, that Fanny had fairly given up and
run away, while Mark, however well pleased in his secret soul,
had thought it necessary to be very angry, and to throw out
sundry
hints of thrashing some of the stouter part of the
company
.
The peace had not actually been broken, however; and
when I saw and talked with Fanny, the main difficulty seemed to
relate to the future course of conduct to be observed toward
Mark, who, as Fanny declared, with another sprinkling of tears,
had never thought of saying such a word to her in his life!
Women are excellent manuverers generally, but we were
outdone here. All our dignified plans for acting as if nothing
had happened, were routed by a counter scheme of Mark
himself
,
who, before the week was out, not only said such a word,
but actually persuaded Fanny to think that the best of all ways
to disprove what had been said, was to go to Squire Porter's, and
make it true, which was accordingly accomplished, within the
fortnight.
And what for no? Mark Loring, with a very good-looking
face, and a person as straight as a gun-barrel (to borrow a
favourite comparison of his own,) has the wherewithl to make
a simple and industrious country maiden very comfortable. He
has long been earning, by the labour of his hands, far better pay
than is afforded to our district schoolmaster; and with the
well-saved
surplus has purchased a small farm, which he and his
pretty wife are improving with all their might. No more balls
for my bright-haired neighbour, or her sober spouse! And if I
should tell my honest sentiments, I should say so much the
better
!
for in the hastening of the happy marriage of Mark and
Fanny, may be summed up all the good which I have yet
observed
to result from the ball at Thram's Huddle, or any other in
our vicinity.
A FOREST FTE.
A less
common and natural accompaniment of our national
holiday is a party of pleasure, or some device to pass the day in
quiet amusement, instead of the noisy demonstrations which seem
to serve as a safety-valve for the exuberance of animal spirits
so habitually repressed throughout the United States during the
remainder
of the year. Gunpowder in unpractised hands is the
cause of so much evil, and its natural friend and ally, whiskey,
so inimical to peace and good order, that it is an object of no
small solicitude to the soberer classes in the new country to devise
some mode of celebrating Independence that shall not end in
bloodshed and mortal quarrels. A Sunday school celebration
one on a large scale, that should bring children and parents, from
far and near, to hear addresses, sing songs, and enjoy a rustic feast
under a long bower of fresh branches, was tried one year; but
the opposition of the powder party was so bitter that very little
was gained in the way of peace, although perhaps some broken
bones and blistered faces were saved. Even on that occasion,
however, I recollect that a son of one of our neighbours,
attempting
to blow off some scattered grains of coarse powder from near
the touch-hole of the one-pounder that was fired all day by the
opposition, suddenly found the whole of itthe powder, not the
gunfirmly imbedded in his face, just beneath the skin; and
although
his mother picked out many grains with her needle, and
others made their own way out by suppuration, he will still carry to
his grave such a curiously tattooed physiognomy as will serve to
remind him of the glorious Fourth, let his lot be cast where it may.
Another device for the more refined enjoyment of the day was a
pic-nic party, such as is here sketched under the title of a Forest
Fte. This sketch is not to be received as
history
any more than
many others of a similar tone. Real occurrences are introduced,
but fancy and general recollections furnished the warp into which
such scraps of truth are wovencharacteristic correctness being
the only aim.
If there be any feeling in the American bosom which may be
considered a substitute for that loyalty of which the renowned
Captain Hall so pathetically notices the lamentable lack, it is the
enthusiasm which is annually rekindled, even in the most
utilitarian
and dollar-worshipping souls among us, by the return of
Independence
day. The first sign of the dawning of this virtue is
discoverable in the
penchant
of our younglings for Chinese
crackers
,
and indeed gunpowder in any form, always evinced during
the last days of June and the opening ones of July; a season in
which he whose pockets will hold money, must be either more or
less than boy. And as the child is father of the man, the
passion for showing joy and gratitude through the medium of
gunpowder seems to increase and strengthen with every
recurrence
of our national festival, till as much villanous saltpetre
is expended on a single celebration as would have sufficed our
revolutionary forefathers to win a pitched battle. The gentler
sex, partaking, by sympathy at least, in the excitement of the
time, yet exhibit their patriotism by less noisy demonstrations: by
immeasurable pink ribbons; by quadruple consumption of sugar
candy; by patient endurance of unmerciful spouting; by
unwearied
running after the trainers, and shrill and pretty shrieking
at the popping; and sometimes, in primitive and unsophisticated
regions, by getting up parties of pleasure, with the aid of such
beaux as they can inveigle from amusements better suited to the
dignity of the sex, such as drinking, scrub-racing; firing salutes
from hollow logs, or blacksmiths' anvils; playing
fox-and-geese
for sixpences; or shooting at a turkey tied to a post, at a
shilling the chance.
One particular Independence day not many years sinsyne is
memorable in our village annals. It was probably owing to the
fact that gunpowder was not very abundant, that some of the lite
of the settlement proposed a select pic-nic, to be held on the shore
of a beautiful, lonely sheet of water, which having nothing else
to do, reflects the flitting clouds at no great distance from our
clearing. A famous time it was, and a still more famous one it
would have been, but for an idea which sprang up among certain
of our rural exclusives, that it was ungenteel to appear pleased
with what delighted others. I say sprang up, because I feel
assured that our fashionables had never even read of the airs of
their thorough-bred prototypes; and from a retrospect of the
whole affair, I am convinced that the human mind has a natural
tendency toward exclusiveism. This effort at superior
refinement
,
with some slight mistakes and disappointments, clouded
somewhat the enjoyment of the occasion; but on the whole, the
affair went off at least as well as such preconcerted pleasures do
elsewhere. Mr. Towson and Mr. Turner, to be sure  But
let us begin at the beginning.
Nothing could have been more auspicious than our outset.
All the good stars seemed in conjunction for once, and their
kindly influence lent unwonted lustre to the eyes of the ladies
and the boots of the gentlemen. Every body felt confident that
every thing had been thought of; nobody could recollect any
body that
was
any body, who had not been included in the very
select circle of invitation. Plenty of teams had been
engaged
for
who thinks of ploughing or haying on Independence
day?all the whips were provided with red snappers, and
cockades
and streamers of every hue decorated the tossing heads of
our gallant steeds. Indeed, to do them justice, the horses seemed
as much excited as any body. Provant in any quantity, from
roast-pig, (the peacock of all our feasts,) to custards, lemonade,
and green tea, had been duly packed and cared for. Music had
not been forgotten, for one of the party played the violin
merville
,
to the extent of two country dances and half a quadrille,
while another beau was allowed to be a splendid whistler, and
a third, who had cut his ankle with a scythe, and could not
dance, had borrowed the little triangle from the hotel, which we
all agreed to look upon as a tambourine when it should mark the
time for the dancers, and a gong when employed in its more
accustomed
office of calling the hungry to supper. So we were
unexceptionably provided for at all points.
The day was such as we often have during the warm months
the most delicious that can be imagined. From the first
pearly streak of dawn, to the last fainting crimson of a Claude
sunset, no cloud was any where but where it should have been,
to enhance the intensity of a blue that was truly Heaven's
owninimitable, unapproachable by any effort of human art.
A light crisping breeze ruffled the surface of the lake, whose
shaded borders furnished many a swelling sofa of verdant turf for
the loungers, as well as a wide and smooth area for the exertions
of the nimble-footed. Here we alighted; here were our shining
steeds tethered among the oak bushes to browse, to their very
great satisfaction; our flags were planted, and, to omit nothing
appropriate to the occasion, our salute was fired, with the aid of
what a young lady who went into becoming hysterics declared to
be a six-pounder, but which proved on inquiry to be only a
horse-pistol
;
our belle refusing to be convinced, however, on the ground
that she had heard a six-pounder go off at Detroit, and certainly
ought to know.
Quelle imagination!
as a French
gentleman
of our acquaintance used to exclaim admiringly, when his
children perpetrated the most elaborate and immeasurable fibs
quelle imagination!
When this was over, Mr. Towson, a very tall and slender
young gentleman, who is considered (and I believe not without
reason,) a promising youth, proposed reading the Declaration of
Independence, and had drawn out his pocket-handkerchief for the
purpose, observing very appositely that if it had not been for that
declaration we should never have been keeping Independence on
the shores of Onion Lake, when he was voted down; every body
talking at once, to make it clear that a sail on the said lake ought
to precede the reading. Mr. Towson assented with the best grace
he could muster, to a decision that reduced him, for the present
at least, to a place in the ranks, and offering his arm to Miss
Weatherwax, an imaginative young lady, a belle from a rival
village, he attempted with a very gallant air to lead the way to
the larger of the two boats provided for our accommodation.
Now it so happened that this said large boat, having a red
handkerchief
displayed aloft, had been by common consent styled
the Commodore; and these advantages being considered, it
may readily be inferred that each and every individual who
meant to tempt the waves had secretly resolved to secure a
seat in it. But as the unlucky beau urged his fair companion
forward, another, who had been deeply engaged with two of our
own belles in the discussion of a paper of sweeties, observing a
movement toward the beach, was on the alert in an instant, and
with a lady on each arm, made first way to the Commodore; all
scattering sugar-plums as they went, to serve as a clue to those
who might choose to follow in their wake. Not among these was
the spirited Mr. Towson. He declared that the other boat would
be far pleasanter, and Miss Weatherwax being quite of his
opinion
,
he led her to the best (
i. e.
the driest) seat in it, and procured
a large green branch, which he held over her by way of parasol,
or rather awning. The company in general now followed,
taking
seats, since the
ton
was thus divided, in either boat, as choice
or convenience dictated. All seemed very well, though this was
in fact the beginning of an unfortunate split, which from that
moment
divided our company into parties; the largest, viz., that
which took possession of the Commodore, claiming of course
to be the orthodox, or regular line, while the other was considered
only an upstart, or opposition concern. The latter, as usual,
monopolized the wit. They amused themselves by calling the
exclusives squatters, premptioners, &c., and reiterated
so frequently their self-congratulations upon having obtained seats
in the smaller craft, that it might be shrewdly guessed they
wished
themselves any where else.
The sail was long and hot, especially to the excluded; for the
Commodore having made at once for a narrow part of the lake,
shaded by overhanging trees, and enjoying the advantage of a
breeze from the south, dignity required that the other boat should
take an opposite course. It accordingly meandered about under
the broiling sun, until the reflection from the water had baked the
ladies' faces into a near resemblance to that of the rising harvest
moon; these very ladies, with the heroic self-devotion of martyrs,
declaring they never had so pleasant a sail in their lives.
Meanwhile, those of us whom advanced years or soberer taste
disposed rather to tea and talk than to songs and sailing, were
busily engaged in arranging to the best advantage the variety of
good things provided for the refreshment of the company. This
proved by no means so easy a task as the uninitiated may
suppose
.
Our party, which was originally to have been a small one,
had swelled by degrees to something like forty persons, by the
usual process of adding, for various good reasons, people who
were at first voted out. No agreement having been entered into
as to the classification of the articles to be furnished by each, it
proved, on unpacking the baskets, that there had been an
inconvenient
unanimity of taste in the selection. At least one dozen
good housewives had thought it like enough every body would
forget butter; so that we had enough of a fluid article so called,
to have smoothed the lake in case of a tempest. Then we had
dozens and dozens of extra knives and forks, and scarce a single
spoon; acres of pie with very few plates to eat it from; tea-kettles
and tea-pots, but no cups and saucers. The young men with
a never-to-be-sufficiently-commended gallantry, had provided
good store of lemons, which do not grow in the oak-openings; but
alas! though sugar was reasonably abundant, we searched in
vain for any thing which would answer to hold our sherbet, and
all the baskets turned out afforded but six tumblers.
These and similar matters were still under discussion, and much
ingenuity had been evinced in the suggestion of substitutes, when
one of the boating parties announced its return by the discharge
of the same piece of ordnance which had frightened Miss
Weatherwax
from her propriety, on our arrival. We now hastened our
preparation for the repast, and some of the gentlemen having
procured
some deliciously cool water from a spring at a little
distance
,
and borrowed a large tin pail and sundry other
conveniences
from a lady whose log-house showed picturesquely from the
depths of the wood, the lemonade was prepared, and all things
declared
ready. But the other boat, the opposition line, as it was
denominated in somewhat pettish fun, still kept its distance.
Handkerchiefs were waved; the six-pounder horse-pistol went off
with our last charge of powder; but the spunky craft still
continued
veering about, determined neither to see nor hear our
signals
.
It was now proposed that we should proceed without the
seceders, but to this desperate measure the more prudent part of the
company made strenuous objection. So we waited with grumbling
politeness till it suited the left branch of our troop to rejoin us,
which gave time to warm the lemonade and cool the tea. We
4
tried to look good-humoured or indifferent; but there were some
on whose unpliant brows frowns left their trace, though smiles
shone faint below. The late arrival laughed a good deal; quite
boisterously, we thought, and boasted what a charming time they
had.
Had
you
any music? asked Mr. Towson of Mr. Turner, the
hero of the Commodore's crew, with an air of friendly interest.
No, said the respondent, taken by surprise.
Ah! there now! what a pity! I wish you had been near us,
that you might have had the benefit of ours! The ladies sang
`Bonnie Doon,' and every thing; and `I see them on their
winding
way;' and  it went like ile, Sir.
`Winding way!' you might have seen yourselves on your
winding way, if you'd been where we was! said the rival beau,
with an air of deep scorn. What made you go wheeling about
in the sun so?
Fishing, Sirthe ladies were a-fishing, Sir!
Fishing! Did you catch any thing?
No, Sir! we did not catch any thing! We did not wish to
catch any thing! We were fishing for amusement, Sir!
Oh!ah! fishing for amusement, eh!
But here the call to the banquet came just in time to stop the
fermentation before it reached the acetous stage, and brows and
pocket-kerchiefs were smoothed as we disposed ourselves in every
variety of Roman attitude, and some that Rome in all her glory
never knew, reclining round the long-drawn array of table-cloths
upon whose undulating surface our multitudinous refreshment
was deployed. Shawls, cloaks, and buffalo-robes formed our
couchesgiant oaks our pillared roof. We had tin pails and
cups to match, instead of vases of marble and goblets of burning
gold. But nobody missed these imaginary advantages. Talk
flagged not, as it is apt to do amid scenes of cumbrous splendour,
and the merry laugh of the young and happy rang far through
the greenwood, unrestrained by the fear of reproof or ridicule.
Exclusiveism
and all its concomitants were forgotten during tea-time.
When the repast was finished, the sun was far on his
downward
way, and the esplanade which had been selected as the
ball-room
was well shaded by a clump of trees on its western border.
Thitherward all whose dancing days were not over, turned with
hasty steps, and Mr. Kittering's violin might be heard in various
squeaks and groans, giving token of the onset. But we listened
in vain for farther demonstrations. No Morning Starno
Mony-Muskno Poule, or Trenise delighted the
attendant
echoes. Debate, warm and rapid, if not loud and angry,
seemed to leave no chance for sweeter sounds. The morning's
feud between Towson and Turner had broken out with fresh
acrimony
,
when places were to be claimed for the dance. Hard
things were said, and harder ones looked, on both sides; and in
conclusion, Mr. Towson again marched magnanimously off the
field, and contented himself with the sober glory of reading the
Declaration to a select audience; while the Commodore's crew,
victorious as before, through superior coolness, got up a dance,
and had the violin and triangle all to themselves.
The moon rose full and ruddy before we were packed in our
wagons to return. The tinkling of bells through the wood, the
ceaseless note of the whip-poor-will, the moaning of the evening
wind, the chill of a heavy dew, all fraught with associations of
repose, gradually quieted the livelier members of the party, and
put the duller or the more fatigued fairly asleep. Some of the
jokers remained untameable for awhile. The young ladies kept
up a little whispering and a great deal of giggling among
themselves
,
and the word Commodore was so frequently audible,
that one might have thought they were talking of the last war.
Mr. Turner drove so closely upon the vehicle in which Mr.
Towson
occupied the back seat, as to bring his horses' heads
unpleasantly
near the new hat of that gentleman.
Hallo! Turner! your horses will be biting me next! said
Mr. Towson, rather querulously.
Don't be afraid; they don't like such lean meat.
I should think by their looks they'd be glad of any thing to
eat! said Towson.
Oh! you mus'n't judge them by yourself, replied Turner,
coolly; they get plenty to eat, every day.
Even this sharp shooting subsided after a while, and before we
alighted, unbroken silence had settled upon the entire
cortge
.
But the pic-nic afforded conversation for a month, and every body
agreed in thinking we had had a charming Independence.
LOVE vs. ARISTOCRACY.
The
great ones of the earth might learn many a lesson from
the little. What has a certain dignity on a comparatively large
scale, is so simply laughable when it is seen in miniature, (and,
unlike most other things, perhaps, its real features are better
distinguished
in the small), that it must be wholesome to observe
how what we love appears in those whom we do not admire.
The monkey and the magpie are imitators; and when the one
makes a thousand superfluous bows and grimaces, and the other
hoards what can be of no possible use to him, we may, even in
those, see a far off reflex of certain things prevalent among
ourselves
.
Next in order come little children; and the boy will
put a napkin about his neck for a cravat, and the girl supply her
ideal of a veil by pinning a pocket handkerchief to her bonnet,
while we laugh at the self-deception, and fancy that
we
value
only realities. But what affords us most amusement, is the
awkward
attempt of the rustic, to copy the airs and graces which have
caught his fancy as he saw them exhibited in town; or, still
more naturally, those which have been displayed on purpose to
dazzle him, during the stay of some mould of fashion in the
country. How exquisitely funny are his efforts and their failure!
How the true hugs himself in full belief that the gulf between
himself and the
pseudo
is impassable! Little dreams he that his
own ill-directed longings after the
distingu
in air or in position
seem to some more fortunate individual as far from being
accomplished
as those of the rustic to himself, while both, perhaps, owe
more to the tailor and milliner than to any more dignified source.
The country imitates the town, most sadly; and it is really
melancholy, to one who loves his kind, to see how obstinately
people will throw away real comforts and advantages in the vain
chase of what does not belong to solitude and freedom. The
restraints
necessary to city life are there compensated by many
advantages resulting from close contact with others; while in
the country those restraints are simply odious, curtailing the real
advantages of the position, yet entirely incapable of substituting
those which belong to the city.
Real refinement is as possible in the one case as in the other.
Would it were more heartily sought in both!
In
the palmy days of alchemy, when the nature and powers
of occult and intangible agents were deemed worthy the study of
princes, the art of sealing hermetically was an essential one;
since many a precious elixir would necessarily become
unmanageable
and useless if allowed to wander in the common air.
This art seems now to be among the lost, in spite of the anxious
efforts of cunning projectors; and at the present time a subtle
essence, more volatile than the elixir of lifemore valuable than
the philosopher's stonean invisible and imponderable but most
real agent, long bottled up for the enjoyment of a privileged few,
has burst its bounds and become part of our daily atmosphere.
Some mighty sages still contrive to retain within their own
keeping
important portions of this treasure; but there are regions of
the earth where it is open to all, and, in the opinion of the
exclusive
,
sadly desecrated by having become an object of pursuit to
the vulgar. Where it is still under a degree of control, the seal
of Hermes is variously represented. In Russia, the supreme
will of the Autocrat regulates the distribution of the airy
good: in other parts of the Continent, ancient prescription has
still the power to keep it within its due reservoirs. In France,
its uses and advantages have been publicly denied and
repudiated
;
yet it is said that practically every body stands
open-mouthed
where it is known to be floating in the air, hoping to inhale as
much as possible without the odium of seeming to grasp at what
has been decided to be worthless. In England we are told that
the precious fluid is still kept with great solicitude in a dingy
receptacle
called Almack's, watched ever by certain priestesses,
who are self-consecrated to an attendance more onerous than that
required for maintaining the Vestal fire, and who yet receive
neither
respect nor gratitude for their pains. Indeed, the fine spirit
has become so much diffused in England that it reminds us of the
riddle of Mother Goose
A house-full, a hole-full,
But can't catch a bowl-full.
If such efforts in England amuse us, what shall we say of the
agonized pursuit every where observable in our own country?
We have denounced the fascinating gas as poisonouswe have
staked our very existence upon excluding it from the land, yet it
is the breath of our nostrilsthe soul of our beingthe one
thing needfulfor which we are willing to expend mind, body,
and estate. We exclaim against its operations in other lands,
but it is the purchaser decrying to others the treasure he would
appropriate to himself. We take much credit to ourselves for
having renounced what all the rest of the world were pursuing,
but our practice is like that of the toper who had forsworn drink,
yet afterward perceiving the contents of a brother sinner's bottle
to be spilt, could not forbear falling on his knees to drink the
liquor
from the frozen hoof-prints in the road; or that other votary
of indulgence, who, having once had the courage to pass a
tavern, afterward turned back that he might treat resolution.
We have satisfied our consciences by theory; we feel no
compunction
in making our practice just like that of the rest of the
world.
This is true of the country generally; but it is nowhere so
strikingly evident as in these remote regions which the noise of
the great world reaches but at the reboundas it were in faint
echoes; and these very echoes changed from their original, as
Paddy asserts of those of the Lake of Killarney. It would
seem that our
elixir vit
a strange anomalybecomes stronger
by dilution. Its power of fascination, at least, increases as it
recedes
from the fountain head. The Russian noble may refuse to
let his daughter smile upon a suitor whose breast is not covered
with orders; the German dignitary may insist on sixteen
quarterings
;
the well-born Englishman may sigh to be admitted into a
coterie not half as respectable or as elegant as the one to which
he belongsall this is consistent enough; but we
must
laugh
when we see the managers of a city ball admit the daughters of
wholesale
merchants, while they exclude the families of
merchants
who sell at
retail;
and still more when we come to the
new country and observe that Mrs. Penniman, who takes
in
sewing, utterly refuses to associate with her neighbour Mrs.
Clapp, because she goes
out
sewing by the day; and that our
friend Mr. Diggins, being raised a step in the world by the last
election, signs all his letters of friendship, D. Diggins, Sheriff.
There is Persis Allen, the best and the prettiest girl to be
found within a wide belt of forest, must be quite neglected by the
leaders of the
ton
among us, because she goes out to spin, in order
to help her unlucky father. Not that spinning is in itself
considered
vulgarfar from it! Flocks are but newly introduced
among us, and all that relates to them is in high vogue; but
going
out! there is the rub! Persis might have lounged about at
home, with her hair uncombed and her shoes down at heel, only
helping some neighbour occasionally for a short time to earn
a new dress,without losing caste. But to engage herself as a
regular drudge, to spin day after day in old Mr. Hicks' great
upper chamber all alone, and never have time or finery to go to a
ball or a trainingshe must be a poor, mean-spirited creature,
not fit to associate with genteel people.
The father of Persis is a blacksmith, and an honest and worthy
man, but he is one of those who are described in the country as
having such bad luck! When he first came into the wilds, he
put a sum of money that constituted his all, in a handkerchief
about his head, and then swam over a deep and rapid river,
because he was too intent on pursuing his journey to await the
return of a boat which had just left the shore. He saved
his hour, but lost the price of his land; and so was obliged to
run in debt for a beginning. During the haying of his first
western
summer he was too ardent in his endeavours to retrieve his
loss to allow himself a long rest at noon, as the other mowers
did; and the consequence was an attack of fever which put him
still further back in the world. Once more at work, and no less
determined than before, he employed his leisure time in assisting
the neighbours in the heavy and dangerous business of logging;
and once more unlucky, he attempted to stop by his single arm
a log which threatened to roll down a slope, and the next moment
he lay helpless with a dislocated shoulder and a hand so
mashed
that it was long doubtful whether it would ever regain its
powers.
All through these disasters his faithful help-meet struggled on,
enfeebled by ague, and worn with nursing and watching and
pitying her husband. Early and lateout of doors and within
she was at work, endeavouring to preserve a remnant from the
general wreck, aided and cheered by her eldest daughter, who,
like many children so situated, became prematurely thoughtful
and laborious, and seemed never to have known the careless
joyousness
of childhood. At length Mrs. Allen took a heavy cold
in searching all the evening for her cow, through grass and bushes
dripping with dew, and she was seized with a rheumatism which
made a cripple of her, just as her husband was able to go to his
forge again. So our pretty Persis seemed, as I have said, born
the predestined child of care, but she held the blessed place of
comforter, and that consciousness can throw somewhat of an
angelic radiance over even the face of care. She looked neither
pale nor sad, though she was seldom smiling; and from the habit
of constant effort and solicitude at home, she seemed, when away
and among young people, as if she hardly knew what to do with
herself. But in old Mr. Hicks' spinning-room she was in her
element; the great unfurnished chamber is cool and shady, and
across its ample floor Persis has paced back and forth, at her light
labour, till she has acquired an elastic grace of motion which
dancing-masters often try in vain to teach. Indeed, I faney that
few of my fair readers know the real advantages of a thorough
acquaintance with the spinning-wheel; the expanded chest, the
well developed bust, the firm, springing step which belong to this
healthiest and most graceful of all in-door employments. And
let me whisper to some of my pretty, mincing, pit-a-pat friends,
that an easy and elastic step is no trifling point in the estimation
of those who know what real elegance is, independently of stupid
fashions. Many a young lady can manage the curve of the wrist
prescribed by the French prints, and let her shoulders fall so low
that one can hardly help trembling for the consequences, yet her
walk, after all, needs all the charitable shadow afforded by long
dresses. But we must not indulge in impertinent digressions.
Spinning differs from other feminine labours, inasmuch as its
profits are dependent on the superior skill or industry of the
spinner
.
Let a poor girl sew ever so steadily, she can earn but little
addition to her miserable
per diem;
but in spinning there is, by
ancient
custom, a measure to the day's work; and a good hand may
by extra exertion accomplish this twice in a June day. So poor
Persis worked incessantly when she could be spared from home,
encouraged by the thought that all she could accomplish over and
above her run and a half was so much clear gain. A gain
in home comforts, sweet Persis! but a terrible loss elsewhere.
The loss of caste was, however, less an evil to the Allens,
because their home troubles had hitherto prevented their mingling
much with the people about them, and so, they had not yet fully
adopted the public sentiment. But they learned to know all about
it in time.
There is one white and green house in the village, and that,
where paint is still so rare, is by good right the Palazzo Pitti of
our bounds. It is shown to the passing traveller as a proof of the
civilization of the country, and elicits not a few remarks from the
farmers who pass it slowly in their huge wagons. It is worth
looking at, too, for even its outer decorations are a masterpiece
of taste. The siding is plain white to be sure; but the frames
of doors and windows, the cornices, the corner-boards and the
piazza railing are all bright green. The sashes are in black
rather prison-like but vastly genteeland the front door is in
an elaborate mahogany style, with more curly-wurlies than
usual. Within doors, a taste no less gorgeous is evident, for the
wood-work is all of the brightest blueprobably in imitation of
lapis-lazuli.
In this favoured and much-envied dwelling resides a lady who
is considered by the public in general, and herself in particular,
as the very cream of our aristocracy.
Mrs. Burnet is a fair and plump dame, whose age can only be
guessed by considering a grown-up son. Not a wrinkle mars
her smooth brow; not a gray hair mingles with the smooth brown
tresses that are laid so demurely on either temple. Her
countenance
wears a fixed smile, and her words are measured by the
strictest rule of propriety; and the tones which convey them to
the ear are of so silvery a softness that one can hardly think the
most yielding of all substances could melt between those correct
lips. (This paraphrase is the result of much laborious thought.)
But in the full brown eye above them there lurkswhat shall we
call it?to say the least, a latent power which is felt through all
those silvery tones, and in spite of all that winning softness. The
initiated are exceedingly careful how they rouse this sleeping
power; for in those singular tonesto convey which to the reader
would require music-paper and some skill at annotationthings
are sometimes said which other people might say passionately or
sharply, but which Mrs. Burnet knows how to make the more
bitter by sweetness.
This lady's household consisted usually of only two members
beside herselfa serving-maid with a flat white face and a
threatening
beardfor Mrs. Burnet had an instinctive dislike of youth
and beautyand a young man toward whom nature had been more
bounteous, but whom fortune had so neglected that he was fain to
do chores for his board at Mrs. Burnet's, while he picked a
very scanty education out of the village school. This poor youth,
Cyprian Amory, was the nephew of the great lady, but only the
gloom of her glory fell on him; for his mother had made an
imprudent marriage, and her orphan boy was a heavy burthen to
Mrs. Burnet's pride. She could not quite make an outcast of her
sister's son, but she revenged the mortification which his poverty
occasioned her, by rendering his situation as odious as possible;
taking care always to represent him as an object of charity,
although his services were such as would have earned ungrudged
bread any where else. Cyprian was of a mild and quiet temper,
and being unfitted by delicate health for the labour of farming,
he was intent on preparing himself for that poorest of all drudgery,
the teaching of a district school. So he bore all in a silence
which his aunt ascribed to stupidity, but which a few friends that
he loved, and whose love consoled him, considered the result of a
patience and resignation almost saintly.
Besides Cyprian and the flat-faced serving-maid, Mrs. Burnet's
family boasted yet one member moreher only son and heir, of
whom more, presently.
Mrs. Burnet's establishment was at no great distance from the
humble dwelling of William Allen; indeed the two gardens
joined at their farther extremity. And at that corner the wide
difference between the two was not so evident, for the fruit-trees
hid the splendid white and green mansion, while the roses and
lilies which adorned Mr. Allen's garden had evidently never
heard of our aristocracy, since they bloomed with a provoking
splendour which Mrs. Burnet's did not always exhibit. That
lady's general plan was so thrifty, that her grounds were largely
devoted to corn and potatoes; and she did not remember to pay
much attention to flowers, unless she longed for their decorative
powers on some great occasion.
Such an occasion had arrived; for George Burnet had just come
home after finishing what he called his law studies; studies
which we rather think were comprised in six months' sharp
practice, as clerk to a gentleman who had quitted the
shoemaker's
bench for the law, on the supposition that the art of
pettifogging
would prove a stepping-stone to a bench of more dignity.
This gentleman's neophyte, Mr. George Burnet, was such a youth
as the only son of a doting mother is apt to bewilful, conceited
and very hard to please; in short, not voted particularly
agreeable
for any qualities of his own, but much reverenced as the
heir-presumptive of the white and green house, and also on
account of his aristocratic pretensionshis father having once
been elected to the legislature. He was fully sensible of his
advantages, and not a little apt to boast of his expectations; was
good-natured when he was pleased, and very kind where he took
a fancyin short, one of those people who intend well, or at
least intend no ill, but are never to be depended on for a day.
Mr. George Burnet came home in high spirits, determined to
enjoy to the uttermost the interval between the finish of his
preparation
and the opening of sharp practice on his own account. He
was extravagantly fond of dancing, and his mother had always
promised him a grand party when he should have got through his
studies, on the express condition, however, that he was to return
immediately to business, and not stay to hunt and fish and
serenade
about the neighbourhood. George found it easy to promise,
and the party was now to come off.
The preparations for this great event had for some time been
foreshadowed in the active brain of Mrs. Burnet; and George's
freedom suit was duly bespoken, and two violins secured,
long before the arrival of the graduate. But, as the appointed
day drew nigh, who shall tell of the hopes and fears, the
consultations
and the arguments, which were expended on and over the
list of favoured guests. Enough to say that it was almost the
ditto of those familiar to the town-bred getters-up of splendid
hospitality
,
(!) and that the principle of the whole thing was precisely
the same, though set forth and put in practice in homelier guise.
Who will do to invite? Who may be left out? Who will look
best? Whose presence will reflect most honour on the
entertainers
?
Whose enmity will be least formidable among those
who ought to be excluded on account of want of
caste
, or want of
savoir faire?
George Burnet and his lady mother found it hard
to agree in their estimate of the guests; George insisting upon
all the pretty girls, and these, for the most part, portionless belles,
being the last to be selected by Mrs. Burnet.
Mary Stevens, said George.
Poh! She goes out sewing! said Mrs. Burnet.
I don't care for that, said the dutiful son, she has rosy
cheeks, and I'll have her.
There's Mary Drinkwater, I shall ask, of course, observed
Mrs. Burnet.
Squint-eyed! said George.
No matter for that, was the reply, she's got a farm of her
own. I hope you'll be very civil to her.
Mother, said George Burnet, I wouldn't marry Polly
Drinkwater if there wasn't another girl in the world!
I haven't asked you to marry her; though, for that matter,
it is just as easy to love a rich girl as a poor one, said Mrs.
Burnet. But, George, it is high time for you to have done with
nonsense, and behave like a man. Mary Drinkwater is, after
all
Hush! mother, said George, politely laying his hand on his
mamma's mouth; no use talkinglet's go on with the party.
There's Jane Lawton is a nice girl.
But her mother's a fright, said Mrs. Burnet.
Leave her out, then, said George.
No, no; if you ask Jane, we must have the old folks.
Lump 'em, then, said George; and who has Phebe
Penniman
got tacked to her?
Nobody, thank fortune! said his mother; her old lame
grandmother can't go out; but Phebe 'll come in a shilling
calico.
I don't care what she comes in, said the youth, if she only
brings those pretty bright eyes of hers with her; and Phebe's a
good hearty girl, too; she can dance all night. But who was
that splendid looking girl that was with her this morning? By
George! I never saw such a step!
That was Persis Allen, said Mrs. Burnet; a new family
that moved in after you went away. But I will
not
have her, so
that's settled! She's as proud as a peacock, for all she goes out
to spin by the day at old Hicks's. I won't have her, though I
long for some of those lilies to dress the supper-table with. I
can't get the lilies without asking her, but I'd rather go without.
But she's a screamer of a girl, persisted Master George;
I'd rather have her than all the rest.
But you won't have her, though, said Mrs. Burnet; and
George, seeing her so determined, let the matter drop, a sure sign
that he was determined, too.
But all his strategy was vain. No surprise, no coaxing, no
pouting, had the least effect upon Mrs. Burnet. The Allen
family
had pertinaciously omitted all that courting which, we regret
to say, follows wealth and power even to the wilds; and they had,
moreover, found occasion, more than once, to resent certain
impertinences
which Mrs. Burnet was in the habit of offering to her
poorer neighbours. So the lady was inexorable; and, strong in
her smooth bitterness, she carried her point. Persis was left out.
But, on the eve of the great day, when the preparations were
in great forwardness, those dazzling lilies were again mentioned;
and George, who was never much hampered by the restraints of
good breeding, declared he would get the lilies without inviting the
damsel, and, on this glorious thought intent, he climbed the
intervening
fence, by moonlight, and made directly for the spot rendered
lovely by the choicest flowers of our poor Persis. This was the
neighbourhood of a little arbour, over the rustic framework of
which a luxuriant wild-grape had been trained, to shade a soft
bank covered with abundant mosses. The overpowering perfume
of the lilies, called forth in double measure by the dew, guided
our adventurer directly to their place, even before they became
visible in the moonlight; and he was about to rifle the bed, when
his eye was caught by as white an object in the arbour. George's
conscience whispered that it was a sperrit; but, after the first
moment's start, he could not resist venturing a little nearer; and
there was Persis Allen, fast asleep on her mossy couch, her fair
forehead upward toward the sky, a book still open on her lap, and
a lily fallen at her feet, fit emblem of her own purity and beauty.
Mr. George Burnet stood entranced. He had seen no such
personification of beauty and romance in the whole course of his
law-studies. He ventured nearer,nearer stilluntil he could
distinguish the lightest curl waved by the evening breeze, and
even the satin smoothness of the skin beneath. But while he
still gazed, the sleeping beauty stirredopened her eyesuttered
a slight exclamation, as if not quite sure that what she saw was
realand our gallant youth darted off, as much frightened as if
the opening of those eyes had threatened literal instead of only
figurative death. The young girl did not scream, although she
ought, in propriety, to have done so. She had no presentiment
that she was to be made a heroine of; and, in truth, men of all
sorts are too plenty, and too unceremonious, at the West, to
excite
much alarm. So, concluding that the intruder had been only
some neighbouring marauder in search of her father's fine
raspberries
,
she picked up her bonnet, and walked quietly into the
house.
Meanwhile, our scared swain had reached his own maternal
mansion; and, coming empty-handed, was closely questioned,
and not a little laughed at when he recounted the failure of his
adventure.
But, hold on a little till I tell ye! interposed Master George:
If she hadn't been there I'd have got 'em easy enough; but the
sight of such a white thing, you know, right in the moonlight,
made my heart beat so that I could hardly see. But, by George!
what a girl! Mother! I must and will have that girl at my
party, and so there's an end of it.
How can you be so vulgar, George? replied his mother.
Vulgar or not, persisted he, if she don't come, I don't!
I'll go and spend the evening with her, instead of those dowdies.
George, said Mrs. Burnet, you always were an obstinate
boy, but I was in hopes you had more sense now.
So I have, said the dutiful youth, and that's the reason I
want my own way. Come, mother, get your bonnet and shawl,
and let's go over and invite that prettywhat's her name? and
then we'll ask her for the flowers.
And George at length carried his point, and dragged his
mother
over to William Allen's.
Persis, dear, said Mrs. Burnet, in her most seducing and
mellifluent tones, as soon as the requisite salutations were over,
will you come and spend the evening to-morrow? We shall
have a number of young people
And fiddles, interposed George, in way of parenthesis.
Persis murmured something in reply, but Mrs. Burnet
proceeded
without waiting for an answer.
And, if you
can't
come, you will at least give me a few of
your beautiful flowers to dress my supper-table. I must have
some of those lilies. You have so many that I am sure you can
spare me some.
Oh yes, certainly, Persis said; you shall have the lilies
in welcome.
But you'll come, said George, whose eyes had devoured the
beautiful face with no measured stare all this time; you'll
come, won't you?
II don't knowI'll ask mother, said Persis.
Well! I'll send for the flowers in the morning, said Mrs.
Burnet, hurrying away quite unceremoniously.
George was very reluctant to be dragged off without a promise
from Persis, but he was obliged to be content with the advantage
he had gained. He felt that the tone of his mother's invitation
had not been what it should be, but he hoped his own urgency
had supplied all deficiencies. An invitation to the Palazzo was
not likely to be contemned by any of the village damsels. We
must confess, it occasioned no little flutter in the innocent heart
of Persis; but she was, as we have said, prematurely sober and
self-restrained, and sought good advice before she ventured to
decide
on a point so important. She did not even think What
shall I wear? perhaps the scantiness of her wardrobe saved her
the trouble. She only said to her parents, Had I better go?
They were naturally disposed to think Persis might safely
follow
her own inclination in the matter; and the young girl had
as naturally been inclined to what all young people love. But
the next morning, when Persis went as usual to her spinning, she
mentioned the whole affair to old Mr. Hicks and his good sister;
the visit of the evening before, the hasty tone of the mother as
contrasted with the urgency of the son; and also, for we must
own that Persis, like many a simple country damsel, had a quick
perception of the ludicrousthe odd way Mrs. Burnet had of
coupling her request for the lilies so closely with the invitation for
the evening.
Just like her! said Aunt Hetty, she's the
coldest-heartedest
crittur that ever spoke.
She is a proud, unfeeling woman, said old Mr. Hicks, and,
if you'll take my advice, my dear, you'll keep clear of the
Burnets
altogether. George is always crazy after some pretty face
or another, and it's no credit to a young girl like you to have his
acquaintance. If he or his mother should meet you in the street,
at B, they wouldn't know you at all. Don't go, Persis.
At this advice from the plain-spoken old man, Persis blushed
deeply, and the vision of the grand party, which had begun to
loom large in her imagination, faded away almost entirely. She
had so much respect for farmer Hicks, who was known as the
oldest settler and universally looked up to by the neighbours, that
she resolved at once to follow his advice, and decline the
tempting
invitation. Besides, in a cooler view, an instinctive
self-respect
whispered that Mrs. Burnet's manner was any thing but
what it should have been, and that the only urgency had been on
the part of the young man. So she told her good old friend that
she would not go to Mrs. Burnet's.
The lilies went, however, and formed the crowning decoration
of the feast, dividing the public eye with the splendid pediment
of maccaroons which had been brought with great care and
solicitude
from B. The entire gentility of the neighbouring
village was collected. There was the lawyer's lady, and the
clergyman's lady, and the storekeeper's lady, all drest as primly
as possible, and looking as solemn as the occasion required.
Then, there was Mrs. Millbank, the tailor's lady, a very
genteel
woman, and she wore an elegant black bombazine, with
pink satin bows on the shoulders, and a flounce half a yard deep.
Mrs. Perine, the harness-maker's lady, was in plain white, but
she wore a scarf of rainbow hues, and a most superb and
towering
head-dress of black feathers and pale blue roses. Miss
Adriance
,
the school-ma'am, was invited, because she was genteel
and wore spectacles, though her calling was scarcely the thing
for a select party; and she honoured the occasion by appearing
in a green merino, and a mob-cap, full trimmed with yellow
ribbons
.
But it would require the accuracy of a court-circular to
describe the costume of every star that twinkled in Mrs. Burnet's
parlour on that distinguished evening. We can but observe that
the eyes were brighter than the candles, and the conversation
much less blue than the cerulean mantelpiece. The very beaux
were inspired, and, instead of sneaking into corners, or getting
behind the door, they came boldly forward, talked and laughed
among themselves, and looked sideways at the girls, with most
unwonted assurance.
George, arrayed in the freedom suitsolemn black, of
course, as became his professionmade the agreeable to his male
guests after the most approved styleshaking hands heartily, and
asking them to take something to drink. But the festivities
had reached no great height, when the youthful heir, scanning
closely the tittering circle, missed the bright mistress of the lilies,
and, finding or making an opportunity to speak to his mamma,
asked if the Allen girl had not come.
No, my dear, said the honey-voiced Mrs. Burnet, I dare
say she couldn't get her frock washed in time, or she would have
been here.
5
As the lady turned away, with a gentle titter at her own wit,
her young hopeful vanished by the nearest door.
Where's your girl? said he a few moments after,
addressing
Mr. Allen.
Gone to bed, was the cool reply.
Why! isn't she coming to our 'us?
Not this night, I think, replied her father, very composedly
for, be it known, that the ceremonies of acceptance and apology
are not in vogue among usevery body exercising his democratic
privilege of going or staying away, without rendering account to
any one.
Why! that beats all! exclaimed Mr. George, in
considerable
vexation. Why didn't she come?
WellI believe she didn't want to, said Mr. Allen.
I don't believe that, muttered George, and, going out of the
door, he looked up at the only upper window.
Halloo! PersisI say, Persis!
No answer.
Persis Allen; what's the matter with you?
Dead silence; and poor George, casting a wrathful look at the
papa quietly smoking his pipe in the kitchen, went his way back
to the party, resolving to pay the most provoking attention to Miss
Drinkwater, by way of revenging himself on Fate and Persis
Allen.
The party went off in the usual stylethat is to say, dull and
stiff at first, chattering and warm secondly, and then, after due
attention to the vivers, coming to an uproarious finale. Mr.
George, early excited by drinking with his dear five hundred
friends, more or less, became quite stupid before the company
departed; and, when the last shawl had left the entry-table, and
the second supply of tallow candles began to burn low in the
sockets, Mrs. Burnet was obliged to call in the strong arm of
Huldy from the kitchen to get Mr. George up to bed.
The next day, it became too evident that the freedom-party had
cost Mr. George Burnet a violent fever. He awoke out of a long
sleep with an agonizing pain in his head, and a pulse going at
railroad speed. Before evening medical aid had been summoned,
heads and vials shaken, and a cot put into George's room for Mrs.
Burnet, and a smoked ham put into the pot for the watchers.
(Watchers are always expected to be very hungry.) In short, it
was a serious case, and excited much interest with the two
Galens
of the neighbourhood.
Midnight!and not a nose from one end of the village to
the othersnoredfor the screams and ravings of the
unfortunate
youth freighted the weary echoes.
Persis! Persis Allen! why don't she come? rung in the
night air, so distinctly that the owner of the appellation lay
trembling
in her little attic, with the vague dread of distress and
impending
disaster. All night long did the heart-rending tones of
the sufferer keep her awake, and it was scarcely daylight when
a messenger from Mrs. Burnet knocked loudly at her father's
door, to entreat Persis to come but for a moment to George's
bedside
,
hoping that the sight of her might have some effect in
soothing
his irritation. She went, though trembling and almost
fainting
with fright and agitation, never doubting, in her simplicity,
whether it was proper for her to comply with so unusual a request.
There is a sort of sacred reverence for the sick in those regions,
where there is scarce any reverence for any thing else.
The moment George's delirious brain became aware of the
presence of the pale beauty, he would have sprung from his bed
but for strong arms that held him down. It was indeed
surprising
that her image should have taken so firm a hold on his
memory
and imagination; but it soon became evident that nothing but
her presence would soothe his more than midsummer madness.
So there the poor girl was obliged to sit, her cold hand clasped
between
his burning palms, and his wild eyes fixed upon her face,
hour after hour, listening to his raving vows that she and she only
should be his wife, spite of his mother anda less smooth-looking
personage.
We are not to suppose that Persis was unmoved by the sound
of all these passionate words. Words have a power of their own,
as we have all doubtless experienced, and besides, George Burnet
was rather a handsome young man, and the certain heir of a still
handsomer property. So that we shall not pretend that his
protestations
,
though made in all the wildness of delirium, fell upon
deaf ears or a stony heart. On the other side of the bed stood
Cyprian Amory, unwearied in his attention to the sick man, but
watching with a painful anxiety the changes in the pale face of
Persis, and frequently suggesting something which might tend to
quiet George and relieve her unpleasant situation. At length
George's ravings grew fainter, his grasp gradually slackened, his
eyes closed, and he fell asleep, murmuring blessings on the fair
being who had so kindly soothed his wretchedness. Persis was
removed, half fainting, and it was not until some hours' rest that
she was able to return home, so completely had her nerves been
overwrought by this distressing scene. Yet Mrs. Burnet
dismissed
her without the slightest acknowledgment of the sacrifice she
had made to humanity; evidently rejoiced to get rid of so
dangerous
a friend.
But there was further trouble in store for the politic mamma.
George's delirium subsided, it is true, but his memory proved
wonderfully tenacious of the subject of his ravings. As he
gained
strength his natural willfulness showed itself, and a
determination
to make good all he had said to Persis was but too
apparent
.
The violence of his disease was not of long duration, but it
had so shattered him that his convalescence was slow; and,
during
the weeks of his scarce perceptible amendment, his talk was
continually of his fair neighbour. His mother would not stay in
the room to listen to what so deeply offended her; but Cyprian
was always there, and into his unwilling ear did George pour all
his plans for the future.
We shan't live here, Cyp, he would say; she's too splendid
a creature for the woods, and beside, mother would worry her life
out. Isn't she a sweet creature, Cyp? Staywhat do you go
away for? You shall be my clerk, Cyp, you write so much
better
than I doyou shall study law with metake care of my
business whenever I'm away. I shall be sent to Congress by and
bye, and, while I'm gone to Washington, you'll be head man at
home. Only help me to persuade my mother. Won't
she
make
a figure at Washington? Such a step! and how she carries her
head! and he would run on by the hour after this fashion,
holding
Cyprian fast till his new found strength would be entirely
exhausted
,
and he would fall asleep only to wake and renew the
strain.
Matters could not long go on thus. It never entered the head
of either mother or son that Persis Allen would have to be asked
more than once; and Mrs. Burnet only waited her son's more
complete recovery to put an end to his fine dreams. When the
time came for the execution of this her fixed purpose, there was a
scene indeed. George cried and swore alternately, while his
mother, calm as usual, with her lips compressed to a thready
thinness
,
and that unearthly light in her eye which malicious eyes
will
perversely emit when their owner most desires to seem
angelically
virtuous, she expressed her unalterable determination to
disinherit him if he persisted in marrying a girl who earned her
living by spinning.
This was a tremendous engine, and wielded with the coolness
so peculiar to Mrs. Burnet, it bore with terrible force upon poor
George, who had been brought up to expect a fortune which was
entirely in his mother's power. But opposition only contributed
to keep alive a determination which would otherwise most
probably
have shared the fate of many others which George had made
and broken. He did not venture to defy his mother openly, for,
in his eyes as well as hers, the possession of property was all that
made any essential difference between one man and another. But
there had been nothing in his education which forbade his
pursuing
covertly what he had not courage to defend; and Persis was
doomed to be waylaid on all occasions by her impetuous admirer,
till she was almost ready to marry him to get rid of him.
George had now entirely recovered, and his mother insisted on
his returning to his business according to promise. Cyprian took
charge of the village school, and the white and green house
presented
a silent and very haughty-looking exteriorMrs. Burnet
having subsided into her usual aristocratic grandeur, and not
even knowing the poor spinning-girl when she met her. Cyprian
Amory, it is true, though he belonged to the great house, was
troubled with no such shortness of memoryindeed, it would
have been fortunate for him if he had, poor fellow! for why
should he remember Persis? They often encountered at sunset,
when each was returning from the day's task; and it was perhaps
from an idea that Persis' own youth had not passed without its
trials and struggles, that Cyprian was led at times to be rather
confidential on the subject of his condition and its difficulties. It
was thus that the fair spinning-girl learned that the only chance
to which Cyprian looked for an escape from the horrors of a
district-school
,
was George's consenting to receive him as a clerk, a
destiny not in itself to be coveted, yet far preferable to its
alternative
.
Such was the pity and sympathy excited in the gentle
breast of Persis, that she almost wished sometimes that she had
accepted George, since she might then have been of so much
service
to poor Cyprian!
But the time came when Cyprian no longer met Persis, as he
sauntered along the road, after shutting up the school-house.
She was bound, day and night almost, to the death-bed of her
kind old friend, farmer Hicks, whose sister, quite infirm, and
almost
imbecile, depended on Persis as on a daughter. Inured as
she was to care and to personal sacrifice, the aid of Persis about
the sick-bed was invaluable, and the old man, with his dying
breath, blessed her, and recommended his sister to her kindness.
After he was gone, and his will came to be opened, it was
found that he had left Persis his entire property, with the sole
burthen of a comfortable support for the aged sister, feeling,
the will said, that she could not be in better hands.'
Here was an overturn of affairs! and, at first, it seemed likely
to be the overturn of poor Persis' wits, too; not that she was
elated
,
but perplexed and embarrassed in the extreme by the
surprise
,
and by the sudden weight of responsibility. She was to
live in her own house, that the old lady might not be subject to
the pain of a removal; and, as Persis' younger sister was now
able to supply in part her place at home, this was soon arranged;
but other matters presented more formidable difficulties.
We must not pretend that our village maiden had been
indifferent
to the addresses of a young gentleman who was considered
by the entire democracy about her to be so much above her.
She had a kind and noble heart, but, after all, she was human,
and subject to the influence of
caste
, as well as the rest of us.
George Burnet, a young lawyer, the beau of the country, and
heir of the splendid white and green house and the fine farm
appended
to it, would have been irresistible, perhaps, but for a
something
an
unexplained, troublesome something, which presented
itself before Persis' mental vision whenever she had time to think
of the matter. There was drawn, by some magical or invisible
power, on the retina of her mind's eye, a pretty rural scenea
log-house, plain and small, shaded with trees and surrounded with
gay flowers. In the upper chamber of this humble abode was a
neatly dressed damsel plying the great wheel, and in the little
garden which her window commanded, was a tall, slender young
man, busily tending some well-kept rows of vegetables, and
occasionally
casting a glance upward at the window. The damsel
at the wheel was Persis herself, the youth in the garden, her
friend, Cyprian Amory.
This pretty picture had often presented itself to Persis, while
she was still a simple spinning-girl, and it stood very much in the
way of George Burnet's interest. And yet, if Persis could only
marry George, how much might she brighten the lot of her friend,
Cyprian. George would take Cyprian into his office, and, once
on the way, Cyprian might, nay, must, rise to a condition in life
so much better suited to a mind like his. A farmer's life would
never do for that delicate frame, and a school in the country is
only another name for starvation, and not reputable starvation
either
.
It was such considerations as these that had caused Persis
sometimes to listen to George Burnet, and try to make up her
mind to like him, though she had told him no a thousand times.
It was only a few days after the funeral of old Mr. Hicks, that
the old aunty and her young guardian were still seated at the
tea-table, when they were surprised by a visit from Mrs. Burnet.
That agreeable lady was decked in her sweetest smiles, and paid
her compliments of condolence in the choicest phrase, crowning
all by hoping that as Miss Allen must be quite at leisure she
should have the pleasure of seeing her oftenvery often. She
was so fond of the society of young people! and now they were
to be such near neighbours, she hoped Persis would be sociable.
This visit was followed at no great distance by another, with
the avowed object of pleading George's cause, the match being
now warmly desired by the devoted mother. She had understood,
she said, that there had been an attachment, (she did not say a
mutual one, though her manner implied it,) but Miss Allen must
be aware that nothing could be more imprudent than engagements
hastily made, and without proper provision for the future.
Now
there could be no possible objection; and she hoped her dear
Persis would not object to an early day, since poor George would
find it impossible to engage in business until his mind was at
rest.
All this was delivered so volubly that Persis had no opportunity
for a word, but even while Mrs. Burnet was speaking, her mind
had been unconsciously applying all these prudential observations
in another direction. It was a brilliant thought, truly, and it was
marvelous that it had not suggested itself beforethat she was an
heiress, and could do as she liked. She had money enough for
two, and Cyprian could hire workmen, and oversee the farm as
old Mr. Hicks had done. All this was concluded in a moment;
and, as a finish to the cogitation, grown worldly wise by
suffering
,
she considered that if any thing should yet be lacking, she
could still ply the wheel as before, and so make all right.
And, when Mrs. Burnet had exhausted all her eloquence, and
paused for a reply, she got only a plain and somewhat absent
negative
.
Who shall give the faintest idea of her rage? Who paint the
gleam of that eye, or the sharp thinness of the compressed lips?
Bitter sweet was she at parting, but Persis was so occupied with
her new idea that she felt no embarrassment at having offended the
great lady.
But how to put her plan in Cyprian's head? We can account
for what follows only in one waythe intensity of the thought
which dwelt on him for so long a time must have drawn him to
her side; for he no sooner understood that Mrs. Burnet had been
to see Persis than he found himself irresistibly impelled toward
the old farm-house.
And there, in the parlour, by the great western window, sat
Persis
;
her head leaning on her hand, her eyes fixed on vacancy,
and her thoughts so absorbing that she did not perceive Cyprian's
entrance until he stood before her. A starta fluttering blush,
and the magnetic influence was evident to both. Cyprian was
not yet so much of a schoolmaster that he could talk nothing but
grammar; and though you might have found it difficult to parse
what he said to Persis on that occasion, the meaning was, on the
whole, remarkably clear to her mind. She felt satisfactorily
convinced
that Cyprian had long loved her, though pride and
poverty
would forever have sealed his lips, but for the rumour that
she had decidedly refused a rich lover.
And what did poor George Burnet do? He talked undutifully
to his amiable mamma, and swore he would go and be a Patriot.
Mrs. Burnet took both these things quietly, and George, after all,
had to marry Polly Drinkwater.
HARVEST MUSINGS.
Who
can help falling into a reverie at the decline of a sultry
summer day? Who can pass unnoticed the delicious changes in
the light and in the air; the orange tints darkening into purple,
and the hot breath of Day freshened by the soft-falling dew?
The whip-poor-wills striving one with the other which could in
most dainty variety recount their wrong-caused sorrow,
[3]
[3]
Sir Philip Sydney's Arcadia.
fill the
woods with their plaints; the harvest-moon rises in the blue depths
of ether, globular to the sight, not merely round; and of a deep
golden orange colour, likelikeJerry Dingle says it is like the
yelk of an egg that's been froze, and then dropt into a great tub
o' bluin'-water. Not so very unlike, good Jerry, as mine own
observation witnesseth at this moment; and so, in the barrenness
of our own sun-burnt and wilted fancy, we will let thy homely
comparison stand for want of a better.
How still is this evening atmosphere! The breeze is not yet
strong enough to wave the curtain; it only stirs it, as with an
expectant
thrill! Would it might come! with force sufficient to
drive away some of these musquitoes, whose attacks are enough to
put to flight all romantic thoughts except those of boarding-school
girls and midshipmen. The night-hawks are very busy; they
have scented our broods of young turkeys; and there are owls
enough hooting and flying about, to scare any body that was
not born in the woods. The cows come lowing home, bringing
with them a circumambient cloud of musquitoes, to spell those
which have exhausted their energies upon us. One lone and lorn
individual of the horned people stays mourning in the forest;
probably calling with fruitless iteration upon her tender offspring,
doomed to the knife at this season of boarding hands. The
katydids are high in their eternal disputation; and somewhere
within hearing, though out of sight, is Jerry Dingle, with a rifle,
getting his cradle ready for to-morrow.
Oh, mystery of mysteries were once these dark sayings to my
uninitiated ear! Why should a rifle be needed for reaping, since though grain shoots, nobody every heard of its being shot?
And the cradle? Wheat waves, but why should it be rocked?
Wild music called me once to the gate, and there stood Jerry
with a whetstone sharpening a scythe, which had several slender
rods arranged parallel with its curved blade, and now the riddle
was read. But I have never learned to this day why a
whetstone
should be called a rifle, while there is so different an
implement
of the same name so much in use among us. The
cradle seems more intelligible, because the pretty slender
curved bars which help to lay the grain in regular rows as fast
as it is cut, do bear some little resemblance to the form of
rockers.
The operation of cradling is worth a journey to see. The
sickle may be more classical, but it cannot compare in beauty
with the swaying, regular motion of the cradle, which cuts at
once a space as wide as strong arms, aided by a long blade, can
describe; and at the same time lays the golden treasure in
beautiful
lines, like well-ordered hosts in array of battle. There is
no movement more graceful and harmonious than that of a row
of cradlers; none on which one can gaze by the hour with more
pleasure. It suggests the idea of soft music
siciliano
or
gracioso
.
The subject of the weather, always so valuable a resource in
the way of conversation, is never more prominent than during
the harvest time. Saving and excepting new year's day, when
the beaux are apt to be, as Mr. C. said, hard up for talk, and
some few bitter days in February, when tingling fingers and
crimson noses remind one inevitably of the state of the
atmosphere
,
there is indeed no period when the weather is so
universally
the theme for young and old, rich and poor. In town this
subjection to the skyey influences wears one aspect, in the
country
another. There is no part of the year when the difference
between city and country views and habits is more striking.
Those who have brought city habits with them to this green and
growing world, and who naturally look back very frequently with
feelings of affectionate reminiscence to the roasting brick houses
and the broiling flag pavements which helped to ripen their earlier
summers, are particularly alive to the change in their location
and circumstances when this time comes round. How the citizen
labours to be cool! How pathetically he descants on each
particular
stage of sweltering! How do magazines and dailies teem
with articles which only to read bring the drops to one's
forehead
!
What listless hours! what groans, what fans, what
lemonade
,
what ice-cream, are associated in civic minds with the
idea of the dog-days! What racing to springs and
watering-places
,
what crowding in ferry-boats and rail-road cars, attest the
anxiety of the urbane world for a breath of cool air!
Recreation
has become a serious business; amusement a solemn duty;
for who can work in such weather? At Saratoga or the Falls,
at Rockaway or Nahant, strenuous Idleness has but one aimthe
killing of the sultry hours; and nobody will deny, that after all,
the hours sometimes die hard.
We too labour to be cool, but it is after another sort. The
citizen who finds it difficult to sustain life at this season, even
with the aid of baths and ices, may be curious to know how the
wretched being whom necessity forces to labour under the sun of
August, endures the burden of existence; how often he seeks the
cooling shade; what drinks moisten his parched throat; by what
means he contrives to fan his burning brow. Fear nothing, oh!
sympathizing reader! Save thy sensibilities for a more urgent
call. This is a world of compensations. The labourer has
neither shade, nor
punkah
, nor lemonade, nor even ginger-beer.
He may get a drink of buttermilk occasionally; but the
sparkling
,
ice-cold spring supplies his best beverage; and in place of
all thy luxuries he lives from sunrise till sunset in a perpetual
vapour-bath, of Nature's own providing; more refreshing by far
than even the famed solace of the Turk; and he does his own
shampooing so well that every power of his frame is kept
incessantly
in the very best condition. He would die on thy sofa.
Yes! in the country all is activity and bustle, at the very time
when the seekers of pleasure are at their wit's end for pastime.
It is the era not only
from
which, but
toward
which all reckon for
weeks. I can't undertake it afore harvest. Well, I'll see
about it after harvest. Wait till we know how the harvest turns
out. Does wife or daughter long for a new dress? I'd
rather
give you two after harvest. Is a jaunt in question? The
grain must be secured before it is talked of. Is a man under the
harrows, that is, hard pressed by his creditors? He begs only
for a delay till after harvest. Not that all things turn out
always
according to the expectations of these sanguine calculators.
But with the husbandman this time is the boundary of his
immediate
hopehis mental sensible horizonthe natural limit of his
view. Hope, it is true, is in this as in other cases, often delusive
enough; but the return of the season affords many a peg on
which to hang bright promises that cheer from afar the weary
way of the farmer.
When it comes, as we have said, all is activity and bustle. All
energies are concentrated upon it, and every thing gives way to
it. Politics for a time let go their hold upon the rustic partisan.
He cares not for vetoes, nor even for tariffs; bad legislation
stays not the ripening of corn; (fortunately for us all.) When
the beneficent Sun has done his work, and wheat nods its brown
head and sways languidly in the faint breath of the morning;
when corn flings its silken banners abroad, and the earth seems
every where burdened with Heaven's bounty; at this glorious
season the farmer, with his heart and his arm nerved by hope,
goes forth to put the finishing stroke to the year's labours. No
fear of the sun's fervours deters or disheartens him. He fears
only the delicious cooling shower which would drive his hands
to the barn, and perhaps detain his grain on the ground long
enough materially to injure its quality.
To be early in the field is the farmer's maxim. He waits only
for light enough to work by, before calling up his men, who are
apt to be up before he calls them, so contagious is the enthusiasm
of the hour. No one likes to be a laggard in harvest. And then
the early morning air is so fresh and so inspiriting; the
brightening
hues of the pearly East so irresistibly glorious, the rising of
the sun so majestic, that even the dull soul feels, and the dull eye
gazes, with an admiration not unmixed with awe. Two hours'
labour before the six o'clock breakfast lays bare a wide space in
the field, for very numerous are the strong arms brought up to the
work. This season is the test of the husbandman's capabilities,
whether as master or man. The unthrifty is behindhand in his
preparations. He has depended upon
luck
for his assistants, and
put off looking for or engaging them until the last moment.
Luck, as usual, takes care of those who take care of themselves,
and so neighbour Feckless is obliged to take up with the leavings.
When it is time to begin, scythes want sharpening and rifles are
worn out or lost, and perhaps a ride of ten miles is necessary to
repair the deficiency. Before harvest is half over, the stock of
provisions proves scanty, and half a day must be spent in
borrowing
of the neighbours. With all these and many more
drawbacks
,
the work goes on but slowly, and the crop is perhaps not
properly secured in season. Wheat will become so dead ripe
that much is lost in the gathering, or perhaps successive rains,
when it ought to be under cover, will rust and ruin it entirely.
Neighbour Feckless has of course no barn; (in the new country
better farmers cannot always afford one;) and being obliged to
put up his grain in a hurry, it is perhaps not sufficiently dried, or
not well stacked; in which case every grain will sprout and
grow in such a way that the entire mass becomes one body of
shoots, so that it must be torn apart, and is only fit to feed the
cattle with. Bad luck! sighs our poor friend.
Far otherwise runs the experience of the thriving farmer. All
is ready betimes, and due allowance made for lee-way and
peradventures
.
He is not obliged to overwork himself or his
people
.
He goes forward in his own business in order to insure its
success. It is proverbial in the country that Come, boys! is
always better than Go, boys! Neighbour Thrifty knows this
so well that if he be not in the freshness of his strength, so that
he can take the lead in mowing or reaping, he will yet engage in
some part of the day's labours, which will keep him in the midst
of his men, so that the influence of his eye and of his voice may
be felt, without his incurring the odious suspicion of being a
mere overseer or task-master. And what a various congregation
is that which does his bidding! Not mere day-labourersfor the
country furnishes comparatively few of thesebut all men of all
kinds. Do you want your wagon-wheel mended? The
wheelwright
,
if he have no fields of his own, is busy in those of his
neighbour. The carpenter will not drive a nail for love or
money
,
for he too is bespoke. You are unlucky if your nag
need shoeing at this critical period, for the son of Vulcan will
not have time to light a fire in his own smithy, perhaps for a
fortnight. Peep into the village school-house; you will find
none there but minors, in a very literal sense; wee things who
would be only in the way at home. All boys who are old enough
to rake or run on errands are sure to be in the field, and the girls
are helping at home to boil and bake. The interests of learning
have for the time the go-by. This is so well understood that in
most places the master abdicates for the season in favour of the
female sovereign, again to resume the sceptre when Winter
grasps his.
Stranger than all, even law-suits are suspended, for the justice
is in the field; witnesses are swinging the cradle; all possible
jurymen are scattered miles apart, mowing the broad savannahs;
and the contending parties themselves are too much engrossed,
each with his own business, to wish matters pushed to extremities
at such a crisis. Even the young lover almost forgets the flaxen
ringlets of his sweetheart in the bustle of a field-day, and if he
meet the damsel at evening will be apt to entertain her with an
account of his achievements with the cradle or the sickle.
Idleness
is banished so completely that even the incurably lazy bustle
about as if they too wished to do something. It is amusing to
see one of this class at this juncture. In the general rush of
business
and consequent scarcity of strong arms, he knows that
even his aid is of consequence. Feeling this to be emphatically
his day, he is disposed to make the most of it. He accordingly
assumes a swaggering air; don't know whether he'll come or
not: but, on the whole, guesses he'll help! He braces up for
the occasion, lays by his rifle and his fishing-tackle, and like a
spinning-top whirls round bravely for a while, but if not now and
then lashed into speed by some new motive, soon subsides into
his natural state of repose. We have known a worthy of this
tone promise to help four different farmers, and after all, take
down his rifle and guess he'd better go and try if he couldn't
see a deer!
The good woman within doors is far from being idle all this
time. Hers is the pleasant though rather arduous task of keeping
the harvesters in heart for the labours of the day, and for this
purpose she summons all her skill and forethought, and sets forth
all her good cheer. Pies and cake and all manner of rustic
dainties grace her bounteous board; for her reputation is at stake,
since she is supposed at this time to do her very best. To set a
poor table at harvest is death to any housewifely reputation. Good
humour too is very desirable, where work is to be done; and to
this we all know good cheer is apt to contribute; and no
mistress
likes to see her table surrounded by sour faces, even if
the work should go on as well as ever. The providing for a
dozen or two of harvest-hands is not a matter of any especial
research
;
since although, as we have hinted, some delicacies are
always included, yet the main body of the meal, three times a
day, is formed of pork and hot bread. Where these are
abundant
,
(and no Western farmer need lack either,) the adjuncts are
matter of small moment. Pork and hot bread three times a day!
No wonder they can work twelve hours out of the twenty-four.
To labour any less on such diet would be suicide.
One of the pretty sights of these days is the passing of the
huge loads of grain and hay as they are brought home to their
several owners. There are generally three or four men and
boys on the top of each load, chattering merrily, urging on the
cattle, and evincing in their tones and gestures a glad sense of
bustle and importance which is quite infectious. One cannot
help watching them as they toss and stack their graceful burdens,
and sympathizing in their merry laughter, and almost envying
them their light-hearted jocularity. By and by the wagon passes
again, a mere frame, with a man or boy at every stake, holding
on for life, and laughing and talking louder than ever, since the
speed is tenfold and the jolting in proportion. The gradual
completion
of a stack and the final pointing out and thatching which
is to secure all within from the weather, is an operation in which
we often find amusement by the hour.
The harvest-moon is a phenomenon which can hardly be passed
over, in thinking of this season. As if to cheer and aid the
husbandman
on whose apparently humble labours the comfort, the
very existence of the proudest is absolutely dependant, the moon
shows her glowing face at nearly the same hour for a whole
week, lengthening out the day with some hours of refreshing
coolness. The surpassing beauty of her mild light can be fully
appreciated only after a day of heat and dust and exertion. In
the country, in the true wild forest, and after the labours of the
harvest field, it has an ineffable charm. We will not call the
harvest-moon a miracle, for astronomers explain her constancy;
but we will say that a phenomenon so admirably adapted to the
consolation and refreshment of the weary tiller of the soil, seems
to refer us directly to the divine benignity, which disdains not to
watch over the comforts as well as the necessities of all.
Would I might add to this sketch of the labours of the harvest,
that we do honour to its close by some innocent festivities like
those which used to be known under the name of harvest-home.
But alas! our holydays are only political; election days, when it
is our business to vote, and Independence, when it is our
business
to rejoice. We have no days consecrated to innocent
hilarity
;
no days of the feast of in-gathering, over which harmless
Sport may preside, gladdening at once the heart of young and
old, and strengthening the links of human sympathy. But
this is a work-a-day world, and we are a working people.
Granted; yet we should work no whit the less for an occasional
interval of gayety. But there's Thanksgivingtrue; and
good as far as it goes. It is a family gathering; a set season for
the meeting of near friends, and renewing of all thoughts of
affectionate
interest. In this new world we have scarcely begun
to pay respect to this occasion: the custom is regarded partly as
sectional, partly as inappropriate; for our family-friends, where
are they? With our joy there would mingle a touch of sadness.
We could not rejoice in thinking of the absent.
Are we wiser than our forefathers?those of the olden time,
when it was supposed there was a time for merry-making, among
other good things in this world? Were the feast of harvest and
the feast of in-gathering, which were ordained to the Jews by the
highest authority, purely ceremonial? Imperative obligation is
6
allowed to attach to the command, Six days shalt thou labour,
and on the seventh thou shalt rest. Is no weight whatever to be
given to that which immediately follows: Thou shalt keep the
feast of harvest, the first-fruits of thy labours... and the
feast of in-gathering, which is in the end of the year? A plain
reader may reasonably be puzzled by the very great stress we
lay upon the one, and the absolute neglect with which we treat
the other. It is true we know but little of the especial form of
these festivals, but we know that rejoicing made a part of them,
and that the joy was heightened by feasting and music. Not only
were these permitted, but commanded; only the revelry which
attended
them, when manners became corrupt, was condemned.
Has the nature of man so changed that all this has now become
unsuitable? Does he really eschew pleasures, or have his
pleasures assumed a darker character?
THE BEE-TREE.
Among
the various settlers of the wide West, there is no class
which exhibits more striking peculiarities than that which, in
spite of hard work, honesty, and sobriety, still continues
hopelessly
poor. None find more difficulty in the solution of the
enigma presented by this state of things, than the sufferers
themselves
;
and it is with some bitterness of spirit that they come at
last to the conclusion, that the difference between their own
condition
and that of their prosperous neighbours, is entirely owing
to their own bad luck; while the prosperous neighbours look
musingly at the ragged children and squalid wife, and regret that
the head of the house ha'n't no faculty. Perhaps neither view
is quite correct.
In the very last place one would have selected for a dwelling,
in the centre of a wide expanse of low, marshy land,on a
swelling knoll, which looks like an island,stands the forlorn
dwelling of my good friend, Silas Ashburn, one of the most
conspicuous victims of the bad luck alluded to. Silas was
among the earliest settlers of our part of the country, and had
half a county to choose from when he located in the swamp,
half a county of as beautiful dale and upland as can be found
in the vicinity of the great lakes. But he says there is the very
first-rate of pasturing for his cows, (and well there may be, on
forty acres of wet grass!) and as for the agues which have nearly
made skeletons of himself and his family, his opinion is that it
would not have made a bit of difference if he had settled on the
highest land in Michi
gan
, since every body knows if you've got
to have the ague, why you've got to, and all the high land and
dry land, and
Queen Ann
[4]
[4]
Quinine.
in the world wouldn't make no odds.
Silas does not get rich, nor even comfortably well off, although
he works, as he says, like a tiger. This he thinks is because
rich folks ain't willing poor folks should live, and because he,
in particular, always has such bad luck. Why shouldn't he
make money? Why should he not have a farm as well stocked,
a house as well supplied, and a family as well clothed and cared
for in all respects, as his old neighbour John Dean, who came
with him from York State? Dean has never speculated, nor
hunted, nor fished, nor found honey, nor sent his family to pick
berries for sale. All these has Silas done, and more. His family
have worked hard; they have worn their old clothes till they well
nigh dropped off; many a day, nay, month, has passed, seeing
potatoes almost their sole sustenance; and all this time Dean's
family had plenty of every thing they wanted, and Dean just
jogged on, as easy as could be; hardly ever stirring from home,
except on 'lection days; wasting a great deal of time, too, (so
Silas thinks,) helping the women folks. But some people
get all the luck.
These and similar reflections seem to be scarcely ever absent
from the mind of Silas Ashburn, producing any but favourable
results upon his character and temper. He cannot be brought to
believe that Dean has made more money by splitting rails in the
winter than his more enterprising neighbour by hunting deer,
skilful and successful as he is. He will not notice that Dean
often buys his venison for half the money he has earned while
Silas was hunting it. He has never observed, that while his own
sallow helpmate goes barefoot and bonnetless to the brush-heap to
fill her ragged apron with miserable fuel, the cold wind careering
through her scanty covering, Mrs. Dean sits by a good fire, amply
provided by her careful husband, patching for the twentieth time
his great overcoat; and that by the time his Betsey has kindled
her poor blaze, and sits cowering over it, shaking with ague,
Mrs. Dean, with well-swept hearth, is busied in preparing her
husband's comfortable supper.
These things Silas does not and will not see; and he ever
resents fiercely any hint, however kindly and cautiously given,
that the steady exercise of his own ability for labour, and a
little
more thrift on the part of his wife, would soon set all things right.
When he spends a whole night 'coon-hunting, and is obliged to
sleep half the next day, and feels good for nothing the day after,
it is impossible to convince him that the varmint had better
been left to cumber the ground, and the two or three dollars
that the expedition cost him been bestowed in the purchase of a
blanket.
A blanket! he would exclaim angrily; don't be puttin'
sich uppish notions into my folks' heads! Let 'em make
comfortables
out o' their old gowns, and if that don't do, let 'em
sleep in their day-clothes, as I do! Nobody needn't suffer with a
great fire to sleep by.
The children of this house are just what one would expect
from such training. Labouring beyond their strength at such
times as it suits their father to work, they have nevertheless
abundant opportunity for idleness; and as the mother scarcely
attempts to control them, they usually lounge listlessly by the
fireside, or bask in the sunshine, when Ashburn is absent; and
as a natural consequence of this irregular mode of life, the whole
family are frequently prostrate with agues, suffering every variety
of wretchedness, while there is perhaps no other case of disease
in the neighbourhood. Then comes the two-fold evil of a long
period of inactivity, and a proportionately long doctor's bill; and
as Silas is strictly honest, and means to wrong no man of his due,
the scanty comforts of the convalescents are cut down to almost
nothing, and their recovery sadly delayed, that the heavy
expenses
of illness may be provided for. This is some of poor
Ashburn's
bad luck.
One of the greatest temptations to our friend Silas, and to most
of his class, is a bee-hunt. Neither deer, nor 'coons, nor
prairie-hens
,
nor even bears, prove half as powerful enemies to any thing
like regular business, as do these little thrifty vagrants of the
forest. The slightest hint of a bee-tree will entice Silas Ashburn
and his sons from the most profitable job of the season, even
though the defection is sure to result in entire loss of the offered
advantage; and if the hunt prove successful, the luscious spoil is
generally too tempting to allow of any care for the future, so long
as the sweet'nin can be persuaded to last. It costs nothing,
will poor Mrs. Ashburn observe, let 'em enjoy it. It isn't often
we have such good luck. As to the cost, close computation
might lead to a different conclusion; but the Ashburns are no
calculators.
It was on one of the lovely mornings of our ever lovely autumn,
so early that the sun had scarcely touched the tops of the still
verdant forest, that Silas Ashburn and his eldest son sallied forth
for a day's chopping on the newly-purchased land of a rich
settler, who had been but a few months among us. The tall form
of the father, lean and gaunt as the very image of Famine,
derived little grace from the rags which streamed from the elbows
of his almost sleeveless coat, or flapped round the tops of his
heavy boots, as he strode across the long causeway that formed
the communication from his house to the dry land. Poor Joe's
costume showed, if possible, a still greater need of the aid of that
useful implement, the needle. His mother is one who thinks
little of the ancient proverb which commends the stitch in time;
and the clothing under her care sometimes falls in pieces, seam
by seam, for want of the occasional aid is rendered more
especially
necessary by the slightness of the original sewing; so
that the brisk breeze of the morning gave the poor boy no faint
resemblance to a tall young aspen,
With all its leaves fast fluttering, all at once.
The little conversation which passed between the father and
son was such as necessarily makes up much of the talk of the
poor,turning on the difficulties and disappointments of life, and
the expedients by which there may seem some slight hope of
eluding these disagreeables.
If we hadn't had sich bad luck this summer, said Mr.
Ashburn
,
losing that heifer, and the pony, and them three hogs,
all in that plaguy spring-hole, too,I thought to have bought that
timbered forty of Dean. It would have squared out my farm jist
about right.
The pony didn't die in the spring-hole, father, said Joe.
No, he did not, but he got his death there, for all. He never
stopped shiverin' from the time he fell in.
You
thought he had
the agur, but I know'd well enough what ailded him; but I wasn't
a goin' to let Dean know, because he'd ha' thought himself so
blam'd cunning, after all he'd said to me about that spring-hole.
If the agur could kill, Joe, we'd all ha' been dead long ago.
Joe sighed,a sigh of assent. They walked on musingly.
This is going to be a good job of Keene's, continued Mr.
Ashburn, turning to a brighter theme, as they crossed the road
and struck into the timbered land, on their way to the scene
of the day's operations. He has bought three eighties, all
lying
close together, and he'll want as much as one forty cleared
right off; and I've a good notion to take the fencin' of it as well
as the choppin'. He's got plenty of money, and they say he
don't shave quite so close as some. But I tell you, Joe, if I do
take the job, you must turn to like a catamount, for I ain't
a-going
to make a nigger o' myself, and let my children do nothing
but eat.
Well, father, responded Joe, whose pale face gave token of
any thing but high living, I'll do what I can; but you know I
never work two days at choppin' but what I have the agur like
sixty,and a feller can't work when he's got the agur.
Not while the fit's on, to be sure, said the father; but I've
worked many an afternoon after my fit was over, when my head
felt as big as a half-bushel, and my hands would ha' sizzed if I'd
put 'em in water. Poor folks has got to workbut, Joe! if
there isn't bees, by golley! I wonder if any body's been a
baitin' for 'em? Stop! hush! watch which way they go!
And with breathless interestforgetful of all troubles, past,
present, and futurethey paused to observe the capricious
wheelings and flittings of the little cluster, as they tried every
flower on which the sun shone, or returned again and again to
such as suited best their discriminating taste. At length, after a
weary while, one suddenly rose into the air with a loud whizz,
and after balancing a moment on a level with the tree-tops,
darted
off, like a well-sent arrow, toward the east, followed instantly
by the whole busy company, till not a loiterer remained.
Well! if this isn't luck! exclaimed Ashburn, exultingly;
they make right for Keene's land! We'll have 'em! go ahead,
Joe, and keep your eye on 'em!
Joe obeyed so well in both points, that he not only outran his
father, but very soon turned a summerset over a gnarled root or
grub
which lay in his path. This
faux pas
nearly demolished
one side of his face, and what remained of his jacket sleeve,
while his father, not quite so heedless, escaped falling, but tore
his boot almost off with what he called a contwisted stub of the
toe.
But these were trifling inconveniences, and only taught them
to use a little more caution in their eagerness. They followed on,
unweariedly; crossed several fences, and threaded much of Mr.
Keene's tract of forest-land, scanning with practised eye every
decayed tree, whether standing or prostrate, until at length, in the
side of a gigantic but leafless oak, they espied, some forty feet
from the ground, the sweet home of the immense swarm
whose scouts had betrayed their hiding-place.
The Indians have been here; said Ashburn; you see
they've felled this saplin' agin the bee-tree, so as they could
climb up to the hole; but the red devils have been disturbed
afore they had time to dig it out. If they'd had axes to cut down
the big tree, they wouldn't have left a smitchin o' honey, they're
such tarnal thieves!
Mr. Ashburn's ideas of morality were much shocked at the
thought of the dishonesty of the Indians, who, as is well known,
have no rights of any kind; but considering himself as first
finder, the lawful proprietor of this much-coveted treasure,
gained
too without the trouble of a protracted search, or the usual
amount of baiting, and burning of honeycombs, he lost no time
in taking possession after the established mode.
To cut his initials with his axe on the trunk of the bee-tree,
and to make
blazes
on several of the trees he had passed, to serve
as way-marks to the fortunate spot, detained him but few
minutes
;
and with many a cautious noting of the surrounding
localities
,
and many a charge to Joe not to say nothing to nobody,
Silas turned his steps homeward, musing on the important fact
that he had had good luck for once, and planning important
business
quite foreign to the day's chopping.
Now it so happened that Mr. Keene, who is a restless old
gentleman
,
and, moreover, quite green in the dignity of a land-holder,
thought proper to turn his horse's head, for this particular
morning
ride, directly towards these same three eighties, on which
he had engaged Ashburn and his son to commence the important
work of clearing. Mr. Keene is low of stature, rather globular
in contour, and exceedingly parrot-nosed; wearing, moreover, a
face red enough to lead one to suppose he had made his money
as a dealer in claret; but, in truth, one of the kindest of men, in
spite of a little quickness of temper. He is profoundly versed in
the art and mystery of store-keeping, and as profoundly ignorant
of all that must sooner or later be learned by every resident
landowner
of the western country.
Thus much being premised, we shall hardly wonder that our
good old friend felt exceedingly aggrieved at meeting Silas
Ashburn
and the lang-legged chiel Joe, (who has grown longer
with every shake of ague,) on the way
from
his tract, instead of
to
it.
What in the world's the matter now! began Mr. Keene,
rather
testily. Are you never going to begin that work?
I don't know but I shall; was the cool reply of Ashburn; I
can't begin it to-day, though.
And why not, pray, when I've been so long waiting?
Because, I've got something else that must be done first.
You don't think your work is all the work there is in the world,
do you?
Mr. Keene was almost too agnry to reply, but he made an
effort to say, When am I to expect you, then?
Why, I guess we'll come on in a day or two, and then I'll
bring both the boys.
So saying, and not dreaming of having been guilty of an
incivility, Mr. Ashburn passed on, intent only on his bee-tree.
Mr. Keene could not help looking after the ragged pair for a
moment, and he muttered angrily as he turned away, Aye!
pride and beggary go together in this confounded new country!
You feel very independent, no doubt, but I'll try if I can't find
somebody that wants money.
And Mr. Keene's pony, as if sympathizing with his master's
vexation, started off at a sharp, passionate trot, which he has
learned, no doubt, under the habitual influence of the spicy
temper
of his rider.
To find labourers who wanted money, or who would own that
they wanted it, was at that time no easy task. Our poorer
neighbours
have been so little accustomed to value household comforts,
that the opportunity to obtain them presents but feeble incitement
to that continuous industry which is usually expected of one
who works in the employ of another. However, it happened
in this case that Mr. Keene's star was in the ascendant, and the
woods resounded, ere long, under the sturdy strokes of several
choppers.
The Ashburns, in the mean time, set themselves busily at work
to make due preparations for the expedition which they had
planned for the following night. They felt, as does every one
who finds a bee-tree in this region, that the prize was their own
that nobody else had the slightest claim to its rich stores; yet
the gathering in of the spoils was to be performed, according to
the invariable custom where the country is much settled, in the
silence of night, and with every precaution of secrecy. This
seems inconsistent, yet such is the fact.
The remainder of the lucky day and the whole of the
succeeding
one, passed in scooping troughs for the reception of the
honey,tedious work at best, but unusually so in this instance,
because several of the family were prostrate with the ague.
Ashburn's anxiety lest some of his customary bad luck should
intervene between discovery and possession, made him more
impatient and harsh than usual; and the interior of that
comfortless
cabin would have presented to a chance visiter, who knew
not of the golden hopes which cheered its inmates, an aspect of
unmitigated wretchedness. Mrs. Ashburn sat almost in the fire,
with a tattered hood on her head and the relics of a bed-quilt
wrapped about her person; while the emaciated limbs of the baby
on her lap,two years old, yet unweaned,seemed almost to
reach the floor, so preternaturally were they lengthened by the
stretches of a four months' ague. Two of the boys lay in the
trundle-bed, which was drawn as near to the fire as possible; and
every spare article of clothing that the house afforded was thrown
over them, in the vain attempt to warm their shivering frames.
Stop your whimperin', can't ye! said Ashburn, as he hewed
away with hatchet and jack-knife; you'll be hot enough before
long. And when the fever came his words were more than
verified.
Two nights had passed before the preparations were completed.
Ashburn and such of his boys as could work, had laboured
indefatigably
at the troughs, and Mrs. Ashburn had thrown away the
milk, and the few other stores which cumbered her small
supply
of household utensils, to free as many as possible for the
grand occasion. This third day had been well day to most of
the invalids, and after the moon had risen to light them through
the dense wood, the family set off, in high spirits, on their long,
dewy walk. They had passed the causeway, and were turning
from the highway into the skirts of the forest, when they were
accosted by a stranger, a young man in a hunter's dress, evidently
a traveller, and one who knew nothing of the place or its
inhabitants
,
as Mr. Ashburn ascertained, to his entire satisfaction, by
the usual number of queries. The stranger, a handsome youth
of one or two and twenty, had that frank, joyous air which takes
so well with us Wolverines; and after he had fully satisfied our
bee-hunter's curiosity, he seemed disposed to ask some questions
in his turn. One of the first of these related to the moving cause
of the procession and their voluminous display of
containers
.
Why, we're goin' straight to a bee-tree that I lit upon two or
three days ago, and if you've a mind to, you may go 'long, and
welcome. It's a real peeler, I tell ye! There's a hundred and
fifty weight of honey in it, if there's a pound.
The young traveller waited no second invitation. His light
knapsack was but small incumbrance, and he took upon himself
the weight of several troughs, that seemed too heavy for the
weaker members of the expedition. They walked on at a rapid
and steady pace for a good half hour, over paths which were none
of the smoothest, and only here and there lighted by the
moonbeams
.
The mother and children were but ill fitted for the
exertion, but Aladdin, on his midnight way to the wondrous
vault of treasure, would as soon have thought of complaining of
fatigue.
Who then shall describe the astonishment, the almost breathless
rage of Silas Ashburn,the bitter disappointment of the rest,
when they found, instead of the bee-tree, a great gap in the dense
forest, and the bright moon shining on the shattered fragments of
the immense oak that had contained their prize? The poor
children, fainting with toil now that the stimulus was gone, threw
themselves on the ground; and Mrs. Ashburn, seating her wasted
form on a huge branch, burst into tears.
It's all one! exclaimed Ashburn, when at length he could
find words; it's all alike! this is just my luck! It ain't none
of my neighbours, work, though! They know better than to be
so mean! It's the rich! Them that begrudges the poor man the
breath of life! And he cursed bitterly and with clenched teeth,
whoever had robbed him of his right.
Don't cry, Betsey, he continued; let's go home. I'll find
out who has done this, and I'll let 'em know there's law for the
poor man as well as the rich. Come along, young 'uns, and stop
your blubberin', and let them splinters alone! The poor little
things were trying to gather up some of the fragments to which
the honey still adhered, but their father was too angry to be kind.
Was the tree on your own land? now inquired the young
stranger, who had stood by in sympathizing silence during this
scene.
No! but that don't make any difference. The man that
found it first, and marked it, had a right to it afore the President
of the United States, and that I'll let 'em know, if it costs me my
farm. It's on old Keene's land, and I shouldn't wonder if the
old miser had done it himself,but I'll let him know what's the
law in Michi
gan!
Mr. Keene a miser! exclaimed the young stranger, rather
hastily.
Why, what do
you
know about him?
O! nothing!that is, nothing very particularbut I have
heard him well spoken of. What I was going to say was, that I
fear you will not find the law able to do any thing for you. If
the tree was on another person's property
Property! that's just so much as you know about it! replied
Ashburn, angrily. I tell ye I know the law well enough, and
I know the honey was mineand old Keene shall know it too, if
he's the man that stole it.
The stranger politely forbore further reply, and the whole
party walked on in sad silence till they reached the village road,
when the young stranger left them with a kindly good night!
It was soon after an early breakfast on the morning which
succeeded poor Ashburn's disappointment, that Mr. Keene,
attended
by his lovely orphan niece, Clarissa Bensley, was engaged
in his little court-yard, tending with paternal care the brilliant
array of autumnal flowers which graced its narrow limits. Beds
in size and shape nearly resembling patty-pans, were filled to
overflowing with dahlias, china-asters and marigolds, while the
walks which surrounded them, daily swept with a woman's
neatness, set off to the best advantage these resplendent children
of Flora. A vine-hung porch, that opened upon the miniature
Paradise, was lined with bird-cages of all sizes, and on a
yard-square
grass-plot stood the tin cage of a squirrel, almost too fat to
be lively.
Mr. Keene was childless, and consoled himself as childless
people are apt to do if they are wise, by taking into favour, in
addition to his destitute niece, as many troublesome pets as he
could procure. His wife, less philosophical, expended her
superfluous
energies upon a multiplication of household cares which
her ingenuity alone could have devised within a domain like a
nut-shell. Such rubbing and polishingsuch arranging and
rearranging
of useless nick-nacks, had never yet been known in
these utilitarian regions. And, what seemed amusing enough,
Mrs. Keene, whose time passed in laborious nothings, often
reproved
her lawful lord very sharply for wasting
his
precious
hours upon birds and flowers, squirrels and guinea-pigs, to say
nothing of the turkeys and the magnificent peacock, which
screamed at least half of every night, so that his master was fain
to lock him up in an outhouse, for fear the neighbours should kill
him in revenge for the murder of their sleep. These forms of
solace Mrs. Keene often condemned as really ridie'lous, yet
she cleaned the bird-cages with indefatigable punctuality, and
seemed never happier than when polishing with anxious care the
bars of the squirrel's tread-mill. But there was one never-dying
subject of debate between this worthy couple,the company and
services of the fair Clarissa, who was equally the darling of both,
and superlatively useful in every department which claimed the
attention of either. How the maiden, light-footed as she was,
ever contrived to satisfy both uncle and aunt, seemed really
mysterious
.
It was, Mr. Keene, don't keep Clary wasting her time
there when I've
so much
to do!or, on the other hand, My
dear! do send Clary out to help
me
a little! I'm sure she's been
stewing there long enough! And Clary, though she could not
perhaps be in two places at once, certainly accomplished as much
as if she could.
On the morning of which we speak, the young lady, having
risen very early, and brushed and polished to her aunt's content,
was now busily engaged in performing the various behests of her
uncle, a service much more to her taste. She was as completely
at home among birds and flowers as a poet or a Peri; and not
Ariel himself, (of whom I dare say she had never heard,)
accomplished
with more grace his gentle spiriting. After all was
perform'd to point,when no dahlia remained unsupported,
no cluster of many-hued asters without its neat hoop,when no
intrusive weed could be discerned, even through Mr. Keene's
spectacles,Clarissa took the opportunity to ask if she might take
the pony for a ride.
To see those poor Ashburns, uncle.
They're a lazy, impudent set, Clary.
But they are all sick, uncle; almost every one of the family
down with ague. Do let me go and carry them something. I
hear they are completely destitute of comforts.
And so they ought to be, my dear, said Mr. Keene, who
could not forget what he considered Ashburn's impertinence.
But his habitual kindness prevailed, and he concluded his
remonstrance
(after giving voice to some few remarks which would
not have gratified the Ashburns particularly,) by saddling the
pony himself, arranging Clarissa's riding-dress with all the
assiduity
of a gallant cavalier, and giving into her hand, with her neat
silver-mounted whip, a little basket, well crammed by his wife's
kind care with delicacies for the invalids. No wonder that he
looked after her with pride as she rode off! There are few
prettier
girls than the bright-eyed Clarissa.
When the pony reached the log-causeway,just where the
thick copse of witch-hazel skirts Mr. Ashburn's moist domain,
some unexpected occurrence is said to have startled, not the sober
pony, but his very sensitive rider; and it has been asserted that
the pony stirred not from the said hazel screen for a longer time
than it would take to count a hundred, very deliberately. What
faith is to be attached to this rumour, the historian ventures not
to determine. It may be relied on as a fact, however, that a
strong arm led the pony over the slippery corduroy, but no
further
;
for Clarissa Bensley cantered alone up the green slope
which leads to Mr. Ashburn's door.
How are you this morning, Mrs. Ashburn? asked the young
visitant as she entered the wretched den, her little basket on her arm,
her sweet face all flushed, and her eyes more than half-suffused
with tears,the effect of the keen morning wind, we suppose.
Law sakes alive! was the reply, I ain't no how. I'm
clear tuckered out with these young 'uns. They've had the agur
already this morning, and they're as cross as bear-cubs.
Ma! screamed one, as if in confirmation of the maternal
remark, I want some tea!
Tea! I ha'n't got no tea, and you know that well enough!
Well, give me a piece o' sweetcake then, and a pickle.
The sweetcake was gone long ago, and I ha'n't nothing to
make moreso shut your head! And as Clarissa whispered
to the poor pallid child that she would bring him some if he would
be a good boy and not tease his mother, Mrs. Ashburn produced,
from a barrel of similar delicacies, a yellow cucumber,
something
less than a foot long, pickled in whiskey and water
and this the child began devouring eagerly.
Miss Bensley now set out upon the table the varied contents of
her basket. This honey, she said, showing some as limpid as
water, was found a day or two ago in uncle's woodswild honey
isn't it beautiful?
Mrs. Ashburn fixed her eyes on it without speaking, but her
husband, who just then came in, did not command himself so far.
Where did you say you got that honey? he asked.
In our woods, repeated Clarissa; I never saw such
quantities
;
and a good deal of it as clear and beautiful as this.
I thought as much! said Ashburn angrily; and now,
Clary Bensley, he added, you'll just take that cursed honey
back to your uncle, and tell him to keep it, and eat it, and I hope
it will choke him! and if I live, I'll make him rue the day he
ever touched it.
Miss Bensley gazed on him, lost in astonishment. She could
think of nothing but that he must have gone suddenly mad, and
this idea made her instinctively hasten her steps toward the pony.
Well! if you won't take it, I'll send it after ye! cried
Ashburn
,
who had lashed himself into a rage; and he hurled the
little jar, with all the force of his powerful arm, far down the path
by which Clarissa was about to depart, while his poor wife tried
to restrain him with a piteous Oh, father! don't! don't!
Then, recollecting himself a little,for he is far from being
habitually brutal,he made an awkward apology to the
frightened
girl.
I ha'n't nothing agin
you
, Miss Bensley; you've always been
kind to me and mine; but that old devil of an uncle of yours,
that can't bear to let a poor man live,I'll larn him who he's got
to deal with! Tell him to look out, for he'll have reason!
He held the pony while Clarissa mounted, as if to atone for his
rudeness to herself; but he ceased not to repeat his denunciations
against Mr. Keene as long as she was within hearing. As she
paced over the logs, Ashburn, his rage much cooled by this
ebullition
,
stood looking after her.
I swan! he exclaimed; if there ain't that very feller that
went with us to the bee-tree, leading Clary Bensley's horse over
the cross-way!
Clarissa felt obliged to repeat to her uncle the rude threats
which had so much terrified her; and it needed but this to
confirm
Mr. Keene's suspicious dislike of Ashburn, whom he had
already learned to regard as one of the worst specimens of
western
character that had yet crossed his path. He had often felt
the vexations of his new position to be almost intolerable, and was
disposed to imagine himself the predestined victim of all the
ill-will
and all the impositions of the neighbourhood. It
unfortunately
happened, about this particular time, that he had been
more than usually visited with disasters which are too common
in a new country to be much regarded by those who know what
they mean. His fences had been thrown down, his corn-field
robbed, and even the lodging-place of the peacock forcibly
attempted
.
But from the moment he discovered that Ashburn had
a grudge against him, he thought neither of unruly oxen,
mischievous
boys, nor exasperated neighbours, but concluded that the
one unlucky house in the swamp was the ever-welling fountain
of all this bitterness. He had not yet been long enough among
us to discern how much our bark is waur than our bite.
And, more unfortunate still, from the date of this unlucky
morning call, (I have long considered morning calls particularly
unlucky), the fair Clarissa seemed to have lost all her
sprightliness
.
She shunned her usual haunts, or if she took a walk, or a
short ride, she was sure to return sadder than she went. Her
uncle noted the change immediately, but forbore to question her,
though he pointed out the symptoms to his more obtuse lady, with
a request that she would find out what Clary wanted. In the
performance of this delicate duty, Mrs. Keene fortunately limited
herself to the subjects of health and new clothes,so that Clarissa,
though at first a little fluttered, answered very satisfactorily
without
stretching her conscience.
Perhaps it's young company, my dear, continued the good
woman; to be sure there's not much of that as yet; but you
never seemed to care for it when we lived at L. You used
to sit as contented over your work or your book, in the long
evenings
,
with nobody but your uncle and me, and Charles Darwin,
why can't you now?
So I can, dear aunt, said Clarissa; and she spoke the truth
so warmly that her aunt was quite satisfied.
It was on a very raw and gusty evening, not long after the
occurrences we have noted, that Mr. Keene, with his
handkerchief
carefully wrapped round his chin, sallied forth after dark,
on an expedition to the post-office. He was thinking how
vexatious
it washow like every thing else in this disorganized, or
7
rather unorganized new country, that the weekly mail should not
be obliged to arrive at regular hours, and those early enough to
allow of one's getting one's letters before dark. As he proceeded
he became aware of the approach of two persons, and though it
was too dark to distinguish faces, he heard distinctly the dreaded
tones of Silas Ashburn.
No! I found you were right enough there! I couldn't get
at him that way; but I'll pay him for it yet!
He lost the reply of the other party in this iniquitous scheme,
in the rushing of the wild wind which hurried him on his course;
but he had heard enough! He made out to reach the office, and
receiving his paper, and hastening desperately homeward, had
scarcely spirits even to read the price-current, (though he did
mechanically glance at that corner of the Trumpet of
Commerce
,)
before he retired to bed in meditative sadness; feeling
quite unable to await the striking of nine on the kitchen clock,
which, in all ordinary circumstances, toll'd the hour for
retiring
.
It is really surprising the propensity which young people have
for sitting up late! Here was Clarissa Bensley, who was so busy
all day that one would have thought she might be glad to retire
with the chickens,here she was, sitting in her aunt's great
rocking-chair by the remains of the kitchen fire, at almost ten
o'clock at night! And such a night too! The very roaring of
the wind was enough to have affrighted a stouter heart than hers,
yet she scarcely seemed even to hear it! And how lonely she
must have been! Mr. and Mrs. Keene had been gone an hour,
and in all the range of bird-cages that lined the room, not a
feather
was stirring, unless it might have been the green eyebrow of
an old parrot, who was slily watching the fireside with one optic,
while the other pretended to be fast asleep. And what was old
Poll watching? We shall be obliged to tell tales.
There was another chair besides the great rocking-chair,a
high-backed chair of the olden time; and this second chair was
drawn up quite near the first, and on the back of the tall
antiquity
leaned a young gentleman. This must account for Clary's
not being terrified, and for the shrewd old parrot's staring so
knowingly.
I will wait no longer, said the stranger, in a low, but very
decided tone; (and as he speaks, we recognise the voice of the
young hunter.) You are too timid, Clarissa, and you don't do
your uncle justice. To be sure he was most unreasonably angry
when we parted, and I am ashamed to think that I was angry
too. To-morrow I will see him and tell him so; and I shall tell
him too, little trembler, that I have you on my side; and we shall
see if together we cannot persuade him to forget and forgive.
This, and much more that we shall not betray, was said by the
tall young gentleman, who, now that his cap was off, showed
brow and eyes such as are apt to go a good way in convincing
young ladies; while Miss Bensley seemed partly to acquiesce,
and partly to cling to her previous fears of her uncle's
resentment
against his former protg, which, first excited by some
trifling offence, had been rendered serious by the pride of the
young man and the pepperiness of the old one.
When the moment came which Clarissa insisted should be the
very last of the stranger's stay, some difficulty occurred in
unbolting
the kitchen door, and Miss Bensley proceeded with her
guest through an open passage-way to the front part of the
house, when she undid the front door, and dismissed him with a
strict charge to tie up the gate just as he found it, lest some
unlucky
chance should realize Mr. Keene's fears of nocturnal
invasion
.
And we must leave our perplexed heroine standing, in
meditative mood, candle in hand, in the very centre of the little
parlour, which served both for entrance-hall and
salon
.
We have seen that Mr. Keene's nerves had received a terrible
shock on this fated evening, and it is certain that for a man of
sober imagination, his dreams were terrific. He saw Ashburn,
covered
from crown to sole with a buzzing shroud of bees, trampling
on his flower-beds, tearing up his honey-suckles root and branch,
and letting his canaries and Java sparrows out of their cages;
and, as his eyes recoiled from this horrible scene, they
encountered
the shambling form of Joe, who, besides aiding and
abetting
in these enormities, was making awful strides, axe in hand,
toward the sanctuary of the pea-fowls.
He awoke with a cry of horror, and found his bed-room full of
smoke. Starting up in agonized alarm, he awoke Mrs. Keene,
and half-dressed, by the red light which glimmered around them,
they rushed together to Clarissa's chamber. It was empty. To
find the stairs was the next thought, but at the very top they met
the dreaded bee-finder armed with a prodigious club!
Oh mercy! don't murder us! shrieked Mrs. Keene, falling
on her knees; while her husband, whose capsicum was
completely
roused, began pummelling Ashburn as high as he could
reach, bestowing on him at the same time, in no very choice
terms, his candid opinion as to the propriety of setting people's
houses on fire, by way of revenge.
Why, you're both as crazy as loons! was Mr. Ashburn's
polite exclamation, as he held off Mr. Keene at arm's length. I
was comin' up o' purpose to tell you that you needn't be
frightened
.
It's only the ruff o' the shanty there,the kitchen, as you
call it.
And what have you done with Clarissa?Ay! where's
my niece? cried the distracted pair.
Where is she? why, down stairs to be sure, takin' care o'
the traps they throw'd out o' the shanty. I was out a
'coon-hunting
,
and see the light, but I was so far off that they'd got it pretty
well down before I got here. That 'ere young spark o' Clary's
worked like a beaver, I tell ye!
It must not be supposed that one half of Ashburn's hasty
explanation
penetrated the interior of his hearers' heads. They
took in the idea of Clary's safety, but as for the rest, they
concluded
it only an effort to mystify them as to the real cause of
the disaster.
You need not attempt, solemnly began Mr. Keene, you
need not think to make me believe, that you are not the man that
set my house on fire. I know your revengeful temper; I have
heard of your threats, and you shall answer for all, sir! before
you're a day older!
Ashburn seemed struck dumb, between his involuntary respect
for Mr. Keene's age and character, and the contemptuous anger
with which his accusations filled him. Well! I swan! said
he after a pause; but here comes Clary;
she's
got common
sense; ask her how the fire happened.
It's all over now, uncle, she exclaimed, almost breathless;
it has not done so
very
much damage.
Damage! said Mrs. Keene, dolefully; we shall never get
things clean again while the world stands!
And where are my birds? inquired the old gentleman.
All safequite safe; we moved them into the parlour.
We! who, pray?
Oh! the neighbours came, you know, uncle; andMr.
Ashburn
Give the devil his due, interposed Ashburn; you know
very well that the whole concern would have gone if it hadn't
been for that young feller.
What young fellow? where?
Why here, said Silas, pulling forward our young stranger;
this here chap.
Young man, began Mr. Keene,but at the moment, up
came somebody with a light, and while Clarissa retreated behind
Mr. Ashburn, the stranger was recognised by her aunt and uncle
as Charles Darwin.
Charles! what on earth brought you here?
Ask Clary, said Ashburn, with grim jocoseness.
Mr. Keene turned mechanically to obey, but Clarissa had
disappeared
.
Well! I guess I can tell you something about it, if nobody
else won't, said Ashburn; I'm something of a Yankee, and
it's my notion that there was some sparkin' a goin' on in your
kitchen, and that somehow or other the young folks managed to
set it a-fire.
The old folks looked more puzzled than ever.
Do
speak,
Charles, said Mr. Keene; what
does
it all mean? Did you
set my house on fire?
I'm afraid I must have had some hand in it, sir, said
Charles, whose self-possession seemed quite to have deserted him.
You! exclaimed Mr. Keene; and I've been laying it to
this man!
Yes! you know'd I owed you a spite, on account o' that
plaguy bee-tree, said Ashburn; a guilty conscience needs no
accuser. But you was much mistaken if you thought I was sich
a bloody-minded villain as to burn your gimcrackery for that!
If I could have paid you for it, fair and even, I'd ha' done it with
all my heart and soul. But I don't set men's houses a-fire when
I get mad at 'em.
But you threatened vengeance, said Mr. Keene.
So I did, but that was when I expected to get it by law,
though; and this here young man knows that, if he'd only
speak.
Thus adjured, Charles did speak, and so much to the purpose
that it did not take many minutes to convince Mr. Keene that
Ashburn's evil-mindedness was bounded by the limits of the law,
that precious privilege of the Wolverine. But there was still the
mystery of Charles's apparition, and in order to its full
unravelment
,
the blushing Clarissa had to be enticed from her
hiding-place
,
and brought to confession. And then it was made clear
that she, with all her innocent looks, was the moving cause of
the mighty mischief. She it was who encouraged Charles to
believe
that her uncle's anger would not last for ever; and this had
led Charles to venture into the neighbourhood; and it was while
consulting together, (on this particular point, of course,) that
they managed to set the kitchen curtain on fire, and thenthe
reader knows the rest.
These things occupied some time in explaining,but they
were at length, by the aid of words and more eloquent blushes,
made so clear, that Mr. Keene concluded, not only to new roof
the kitchen, but to add a very pretty wing to one side of the house.
And at the present time, the steps of Charles Darwin, when he
returns from a surveying tour, seek the little gate as naturally as
if he had never lived any where else. And the sweet face of
Clarissa is always there, ready to welcome him, though she still
finds plenty of time to keep in order the complicated affairs of
both uncle and aunt.
And how goes life with our friends the Ashburns? Mr. Keene
has done his very best to atone for his injurious estimate of
Wolverine
honour, by giving constant employment to Ashburn and his
sons, and owning himself always the obliged party, without which
concession all he could do would avail nothing. And Mrs. Keene
and Clarissa have been unwearied in their kind attentions to the
family, supplying them with so many comforts that most of them
have got rid of the ague, in spite of themselves. The house has
assumed so cheerful an appearance that I could scarcely
recognise
it for the same squalid den it had often made my heart ache
to look upon. As I was returning from my last visit there, I
encountered
Mr. Ashburn, and remarked to him how very
comfortable
they seemed.
Yes, he replied; I've had pretty good luck lately; but
I'm a goin' to pull up stakes and move to Wisconsin. I think I
can do better, further West.
IDLE PEOPLE.
Those
who never workthose who number among their most
precious privileges a complete exemption from not only the spur
of necessity, but the pressure of dutymust find it hard to
believe
that there are people in the world whose destiny it seems to
be to work all the time. Yet nothese are the very beings who
think God has so ordered the lot of a portion of his children, in
contrast to the all-embracing beneficence of his providence in
other respects. These might be called the butterflies of the earth,
if the butterfly was not an established emblem of
soul
. Their
self-complacency is much soothed by the conviction that they are
of the porcelain clay of human kind, and they are thankful
or rather, gladthat there
is
a coarser race, to whom hard work
and hard fare are well suited.
The fate of these two divisions of mankind is, after all, much
more justly balanced than either portion is apt to imagine. There
is a universal necessity for labour, and those who obstinately
close their understandings against this fact, whether rich or poor,
inevitably join the class of sufferers sooner or later. There is
nothing in which what we call
fate
is more impartial. The poor
are admonished by destitution, and the rich by ill healththe
mere idler by ennui, and the scheming sharper by disappointment
and disgrace. Yet this same universal necessity is not more
evident
than is the undying effort to elude it. After centuries of
warning, the struggle still continues; its energy sustained
sometimes
by pride, sometimes by a downright love of ease, so blind
that it looks no farther than the present moment. Thus much of
the outer and obvious worlda theatre whose actors, from being,
or supposing themselves to be, th' observed of all observers,
have fallen into many unnatural views and artificial habits of
life, all tending to the one darling end of drawing a broad line of
distinction between themselves and the common and the
vulgar
.
In these western wilds, where nature, scarce redeemed from
primeval barbarism, seems to demand, with an especial
earnestness
,
the best aid of her denizens, and where she pays with gold
every drop that falls on her bosom from the brow of labour, there
may be danger sometimes, methinks, danger of falling into an
error of an opposite character. There is so much work to be
done, and so few people to do it, that the idea of labour is apt to
absorb the entire area of the mind, to the exclusion of some other
ideas not only useful but pleasant withal, and humanizing, and
softening, and calculated to cherish the higher attributes of our
nature. So far is this carried that idleness is emphatically
the
vice for which public opinion reserves its severest frown, and in
whose behalf no voice ventures an apologetic word. If a man
drink, he may reform; even if he should steal, we permit him to
rebuild his character upon repentance; but if he be lazy, we
have neither hope nor charity.
Still, even among us, there are those to whose imagination the
dolce far niente
is irresistible; and it must be confessed that they
form a class which is not likely to raise the reputation of the
followers of pleasure. They have one thing in common with
the fashionables of the eartha determination to eschew every
conceivable form of labour; but, however dignified this trait
may appear when set off by an imposing
hauteur
and an elegant
costume, it makes but a sorry figure in the woods, where the
prevailing
tone is far different. Yet these kindred souls are as
incorrigible
as their betters; and, like them, will often perform as
much labour, and exert as much ingenuity in avoiding work, as
would, if differently directed, suffice to place them in an
independent
and honourable position.
It must be owned that this land of hard work presents a
thousand
temptations to idleness. Not to mention the sacrifice with
which we beginthe giving up of all that gave life a rosy or a
golden tint in the older worldthere may be other excuses for a
longing after amusement, in minds of a certain class. There
is an aspect of severe effortof closenessof grinding care in
the general constitution of society; the natural consequence of
the fact that poverty, or at least narrow circumstances at home,
was the impetus that drove nine-tenths of the population
westward
;
and this aspect being in striking opposition to the free,
glowing, and abundant one which characterizes unworn nature
in this scarce-trodden region, suggests and connects with labour a
certain idea of slaveryof confinement; and creates a
proportionate
desire for all the liberty that so narrow a fate will
permit
.
He who possesses abundant leisure for amusment, will
perhaps
be heard to complain that it is hard to find; but he who is
every hour spurred on by necessity to the most toilsome
employments
,
cannot but snatch with delight every available form of
recreation; and will be apt to devote to the coveted indulgence
hours which must be dearly purchased by the sufferings of the
future. Let us judge him with a charity which we may hardly
be disposed to exercise towards his prototype in high places.
So unpopular, as we have said, so contrary to the prevailing
spirit, is this desire for amusement, that those among us who are
so unfortunate as to be born with something of a poetical
temperament
which
delights in quiet musings, long rambles in the
woods, and other forms of idlenessgenerally disguise to
themselves
and try to disguise to others the true nature of this
propensity
,
by contriving many new and ingenious ways of earning
money, all agreeing in one pointa determined avoidance of
every thing that is usually called
work
.
In the early spring time, while a thin covering of very fragile
ice still encrusts the marshes, there may be seen around their
borders a tangled fringe of seemingly bare bushes. On nearer
approach these bushes are found stripped indeed as to their upper
branches, but garnished at the water's edge with berries of the
brightest coral, each shrined separately in a little ring of crystal.
These are the most delicate and highly prized cranberries;
mellowed
,
not wilted, by the severest frosts, and now peeping through
their icy veil, and glowing in the first warm rays of approaching
spring.
These are an irresistible temptation to our fashionable of the
woods. Armed in boots, not seven-leagued, but thick as the
seven-fold
shield of Ajax, he plunges into the crackling pool; and
there, as long as a berry is to be found, he stands or wades;
snatching, perhaps, a shilling's worth of cranberries, and a six
months' rheumatism. No matter; this is not
work
.
You may see him next, if you are an early riser, setting off, at
peep of dawn, on a fishing expedition. He winds through the
dreary woods, yawning portentously, and stretching as if he were
emulous of the height of the hickory trees. Dexterously
swaying
his long rod, he follows the little stream till it is lost in the
bosom of the woodland lake; if unsuccessful from the bank, he
seeks the frail skiff, which is the common property of laborious
idlers like himself, and, pushing off shore, sits dreaming under
the sun's wilting beams, until he has secured a supply for the
day. Home againan irregular meal at any time of dayand
he goes to bed with the ague; but he murmurs not, for fishing is
not
work
.
Here is a strawberry fieldwell may it claim the name! It
is a wide fallow which has been ploughed late in the last autumn,
and is now lying in ridges to court the fertilizing sunbeams. It
is already clothed, though scantily, with a luxuriant growth of
fresh verdure, and among, and through, and over all, glows the
rich crimson of the field strawberrythe ruby-crowned queen of
all wild fruits. Hereand who can blame him?will our
exquisite
,
with wife and children, if he be the fortunate proprietor
of so many fingers, spend the long June day; eating as many
berries as possible, and amassing in leafy baskets the rich
remainder
,
to be sold to the happy holders of splendid shillings, or
to dry in the burning sun for next winter's tea-saase.
Ploughing
would be more profitable, certainly, but not half so pleasant,
for ploughing is
work
.
Then come the whortleberries; not the little, stunted, seedy
things that grow on dry uplands and sandy commons; but the
produce of towering bushes in the plashy meadow; generous,
pulpy berries, covered with a fine bloom; the blae-berry of
Scotland; a delicious fruit, though of humble reputation, and, it
must be confessed, somewhat enhanced in value by the scarcity
of the more refined productions of the garden. We scorn
thee not, oh! bloom-covered neighbour! but gladly buy whole
bushels of thy prolific family from the lounging Indian, or the
still lazier white man. We must not condemn the gatherers of
whortleberries, but it is a melancholy truth that they do not get
rich.
Wild plums follow closely in the wake of whortleberries, and
these are usually picked when they are so sour and bitter as to
be totally uneatable; because the rush for them is so great,
among the class alluded to, that each thinks nobody else will wait
for them to ripen; and whoever succeeds in stripping all the trees
in his neighbourhood, even though he can neither use nor sell a
particle of his treasure, deems himself the fortunate man. This
seems ridiculous, truly; but is it not exactly the spirit of the
miser? What matters whether the thing be gold or green plums,
if they are equally useless? This blind haste to secure any
thing bearing the form of fruit, is only an extreme exemplification
of the desire to snatch a precarious subsistence from the lap of
Nature, instead of paying the price which she ever demands for
a due and full enjoyment of her bounties.
Baiting for wild bees beguiles the busy shunner of work into
many a wearisome tramp, many a night-watch, and many a lost
day. This is a most fascinating chase, and sometimes excites the
very spirit of gambling. The stake seems so small in
comparison
with the possible prizeand gamblers and honey-seekers
think all possible things probablethat some, who are scarcely
ever tempted from regular business by any other disguise of
idleness
,
cannot withstand a bee-hunt. A man whose arms and axe
are all-sufficient to insure a comfortable livelihood for himself and
his family, is chopping, perhaps, in a thick wood, where the voices
of the locust, the cricket, the grasshopper, and the wild bee, with
their kindred, are the only sounds that reach his ear from sunrise
till sunset. He feels lonely and listless; and as noon draws on,
he ceases from his hot toil, and, seating himself on the tree which
has just fallen beneath his axe, he takes out his lunch of bread
and butter, and, musing as he eats, thinks how hard his life is,
and how much better it must be to have bread and butter without
working for it. His eye wanders through the thick forest, and
follows, with a feeling of envy, the winged inhabitants of the
trees and flowers, till at length he notes among the singing throng
some half dozen of bees.
The lunch is soon despatched; a honey tree must be near; and
the chopper spends the remainder of the daylight in endeavouring
to discover it. But the cunning insects scent the human robber,
and will not approach their home until nightfall. So our weary
wight plods homeward laying plans for their destruction.
The next morning's sun, as he peeps above the horizon, finds
the bee-hunter burning honey-comb and old honey near the scene
of yesterday's inkling. Stealthily does he watch his line of bait,
and cautiously does he wait until the first glutton that finds
himself
sated with the luscious feast sets off in a bee-linelike
arrow darting from the bowblind betrayer of his home, like
the human inebriate. This is enough. The spoiler asks no
more; and the first moonlight night sees the rich hoard transferred
to his cottage; where it sometimes serves, almost unaided, as
food for the whole family, until the last drop is consumed. One
hundred and fifty pounds of honey are sometimes found in a single
tree, and it must be owned the temptation is great; but the luxury
is generally dearly purchased, if the whole cost and consequences
be counted. To be content with what supplies the wants of the
body for the present moment, is, after all, the characteristic rather
of the brute than of the man; and a family accustomed to this
view of life will grow more and more idle and thriftless, until
poverty and filth and even beggary lose all their terrors. It is
almost proverbial among farmers that bee-hunters are always
behindhand.
Wild grapes must be left until after the hard frosts have
mellowed
their pulp; and the gathering of them is not a work of
much cost of time or labour, since the whole vine is taken down
at once, and rifled in a few moments; its bounteous clusters being
reserved for the ignoble death of a protracted withering, as they
hang on strings from the smoky rafters of the log-house.
Hazel-nuts are not very abundant, and they must therefore
so think our wiseacresbe pulled before they are fit for any thing,
lest somebody else should have the benefit of them. So we seldom
see a full ripe hazel-nut. I have had desperate thoughts of
transplanting
a hazel-bush or two; but I am assured it would only be
buying Punchinello. Its powers are gone when it leaves its
proper place.
Hickory-nuts afford a most encouraging resource. They are
so plentiful in some seasons that one might almost live on them;
and then the gathering of them is such famous pastime! An
occasional
risk of life and limb to be sure, but no
work!
Hunting the deer, in forests which seem to have been planted
to shelter him, and in which he is seldom far to seek, is a sort of
middle terma something
between
play and workwhich is not
very severely censured even by our utilitarians. Venison is not
meat, to be sure, in our parlance; for we reserve that term
for pork,
par excellence;
but venison has some solid value, and
may be salted and smoked, which seems to place it among the
articles of household thrift. But our better farmers, though they
may see deer-tracks in every direction round the scene of their
daily rail-splitting, seldom hunt, unless in some degree debilitated
by sickness, or from some other cause incapacitated for their
usual daily course of downright, regular industry. It is cheaper
to buy venison of the Indians, say they; and now that the
Indians are all gone, there are white Indians enoughwhite skins
with Indian tastes and habits under themto make hunting a
business of questionable respectability. Ere long it will be left
in the hands of such, with an occasional exception in favour of
city gentlemen who wander into the wilds with the hope of
rebracing
enervated frames by some form of exercise which is not
work
.
CHANCES AND CHANGES;
OR, A CLERICAL WOOING.
This
disquisition upon some of the different phases of that sweet
sinidleness, has no particular reference to the little story that
follows, except so far as it was suggested by the subduing
influences
of the delicious season at which the incidents here related
are supposed to have occurred. It must be a dry and
impracticable
mind, indeed, that is not filled to overflowing with the
beauty
of our Indian summer; when every winding valley, every
softly swelling upland, in the picturesque openings, is clothed
in such colours as no mortal pencil can imitate, blended together
with such magical effect, that it is as if the most magnificent of
all sunsets had fallen suddenly from heaven to earth, and lay,
unchanged, on forest, hill, and river. Not a tree, from the
almost
black green of tamarack and hemlock, to the pale willow
and the flaunting scarlet maple, the crimson-brown oak and the
golden beechnot a shrub, however insignificant its name or
homely its form  but contributes to the general splendour.
Frequent showers, soft and silent as the very mist, cover the
leaves with dewy moisture; and upon this glittering veil shines
out the tempered autumn sun, calling forth at once glowing hues
and nutty odours, which had been lost in a drier and less
changeful
atmosphere. Low in the bosom of almost every valley lies
either a little lake ready to mirror back the wondrous pageant,
or a bright winding stream, seldom musical here where scarce a
stone of any size is to be found, but always crystal clear, and
watched over by bending willows, or parting to give place to tiny
islands loaded with evergreens. The sharp crack of the rifle or
fowling-piece seems like sacrilege in such scenes; yet the
multitude
of wild, shy, glancing creatures, that venture forth to enjoy
the balmy air and regale themselves upon the abundance of
nature
at this season, tempts into the woods so many of those to
whom the idea of game is irresistible, that we must take the
sportsman with his fine dogs, his glittering gun and his gay
hunting
gear, as part of the picture, if we would have it true to the
life; and we cannot deny that he makes a picturesque adjunct,
though we hate the barbarous art that brings him to these
sweet solitudes.
But not alone on the wild wood and the silent lake does the
Indian
summer shed its tender light, making beautiful what might
else have seemed rough and common-place. The harvest has
been nearly all gathered, and the ploughing for next year's crop
has made some progress, as the deep rich brown of some fields
and the plough itself slowly moving in others can tell us. See
those unerring furrows, those ridges, sometimes curving a little
round some lingering stump, but always parallel, be the area
ever so extensive. Or look yonder, beyond the line of crimson
and brown shrubs that line the rough fence, at the sower, pacing
the wide field with the measured tread of the soldier, that each
spot may get its due proportion of the golden treasure; and
keeping exact time with foot and hand, his own thoughts
furnishing
his only music. No hireling or giddy youth is entrusted with
this nice operation. The foundation for next year's riches is laid
by the master himself; but you may perhaps see the harrow
which follows his footsteps attended only by one of the younglings
of the house, whose little hands wield the slender willow wand
which urges on old Dobbin; and whose shrill piping tones are a
far off imitation of the gruffer shouting of the elder. The
adjoining
field is like a fairy camp, with its ranges of tent-like stacks
of corn, and a young maple left standing here and there as if on
purpose to supply the flaring red banners necessary to the illusion.
Fallows gray are not wanting, to temper the general
gorgeousness
,
nor parties of huskers to give a human interest to the
picture. Here and there a cluster of hay-stacks of all sizes,
covered with roofs shaped like those of a Chinese pagoda, give
quite an oriental touch; while, close at hand, a long shambling
Yankee teamster, coaxing and scolding his oxen in the most
uncouth
of all possible voices, will recall the whereabout, with a
shock, as it were; reminding one that the prevailing human tone
of the region is any thing but poetical.
One very striking feature in our autumn scenery is one that
was undreamed of in the days when people ventured to be
poetical
upon rural themes. Cowper sings with homely truth
Thump after thump resounds the constant
flail
,
That seems to swing uncertain, and yet falls
Full on the destin'd ear. Wide flies the chaff,
The rustling straw sends up a frequent mist
Of atoms sparkling in the noon-day beam
But he would listen in vain for the flail at the West, at least
during
the autumn. The threshing-machine has superseded all
slower modes of extracting the grain from the ear; and though a
machine has a paltry sound, the operation of this mighty
instrument
gives rise to scenes of the greatest animation and
interest
.
Half a dozen horses and all the stout arms of the
neighbourhood
are kept busy by its requisitions. One of the more
active
youths climbs the tall stack to toss down the sheaves; the
next hand cuts the binder, and passes the sheaf to the
feeder
,
who throws it into the monster's mouth. Round goes the
cylinder, at the rate of several hundred revolutions in a minute,
and the sheaf comes from among the iron teeth completely
crushed
;
the grain, straw, and chaff in one mass, but entirely detached
from each otherthe work of a whole day of old-fashioned
threshing
being performed in a few minutes. Several persons are
busied
in raking away the straw from the machine as rapidly as
possible; and shouts and laughter and darting movements testify
to the excitement of the hour. A day with the machine is
considered
one of the most laborious of the whole season; yet it is
a favourite time, for it requires a gathering, which is always the
signal for hilarity in the country.
So tremendous a power does not work without danger; and,
accordingly, the excitement of the occupation is heightened by
the fear of broken arms, dislocated shoulders, torn hands, and the
likeeven death itself being no unusual attendant on the
threshing-machine
.
But no one ever hesitates to use it on this account;
8
since rail-road speed is as much the foible of the backwoodsman
as of his civilized brother. No inconsiderable portion of the grain
is wasted by this tearing process; and the straw, considered so
important by the thorough farmer, is rendered nearly useless;
but the lack of barns in which to store the grain for the slower
process of threshing, and the desire to have a great job finished
at once, reconciles the farmer to all this. The birds profit by it,
at least.
The making a business of marriage, which forms the
nucleus
of the following story, is by no means peculiar to the new
country, though it is certainly better suited to a half savage tone
of manners, than to society which pretends to civilization. Strange
to say, marriages contracted without any previous acquaintance
between the parties, are almost confined to a class which, of all
others, is bound to teach the sacredness of the tie. For such to
treat marriage as a mere business contract, without the least
reference to the undivided and exclusive affection which alone
can make it holy and ennobling, is indeed a marvel; and I trust
that so coarse a form of utilitarianism may become less and less
popular among us. If I appear to have done any thing in the
following little sketch calculated to make the practice seem less
revolting, let it be ascribed to the state of society in which the
circumstances are supposed to have occurred. Among isolated
and uneducated people, we may tolerate what should be held
unpardonable
where greater advantages and greater pretensions
entitle
us to look for a higher degree of refinement.
CHAPTER I.
Let India boast her groves, nor envy we
The weeping amber and the balmy tree.
These
western colonies, gatherings as they are from the four
corners of the earth, of people whose manners, habits, and ideas
are various as their origin, present a thousand little oddities of
custom and character, sometimes amusing and sometimes
vexatious
enough to the looker-on, whose own peculiarities afford in
turn their share of marvel and diversion. The Yankee smiles
when the Scotsman asks for a few o' they molasses for his
cake; the Scot stares in his turn when the man of Connecticut
calls that cake a griddle or a slap-jack. The Englishman
describes gravely a machine which is to be perpelled by the
hair; and the Maineman who indulges a joke at his expense
will talk the next moment of his ca-ow, which, with an
indescribable
twang, he will declare to be the beatermost critter
under
the canopy. And in actions as well as wordsin modes as
well as mannersis this variety constantly presenting itself.
We may see glimpses of half our United States within the
compass
of a school-district. We may travel without stirring from the
cottage fireside, and, in one sense, (not the poet's,)
Run the great cycle, and be still at home.
An odd affair which occurred last autumn within our bounds
gave rise to these reflections, though perhaps the critical reader
may decide that the association is not a very obvious one. A
slender thread serves sometimes to string female reveries, and it
is doubtless best they should not aim too much at consecution
of discourse, lest they be accused of lecturing. I shall tell my
little story promiscuous like, claiming my feminine privilege.
The occasion was a nutting-partya regularly planned and
numerously attended expedition in search of hickory-nuts; a
coldblooded
conspiracy against the domestic comfort of the squirrels,
whose despairing sighs probably swelled the soft southern breeze
which we enjoyed so thoughtlessly. But this nutting is a
wondrous
pleasant kind of laborious idleness. Leaving out of view
the desirableness of the spoilforgetting the talk-promoting
influence
of a dish of well-cracked nuts placed on the little table before
the fire at Christmas-tide, or in some bitter evening in February,
when the snapping and cracking of the more distant articles of
furniture tell of the struggle between the frosty influences without
and the glowing warmth within,the gathering is a toil to be
coveted for its own sake. It is a mode of getting at the very
essence
and heart of a delicious autumn day, when the misty air
glows with an indistinct diffusion of sunlight, so softened and so
universal that we can scarce point out the spot whence it
emanates
,
and all the tints of earth are blended and neutralized into
a perfect harmony with this enchanting atmosphere. Green is
almost or quite gone; scarlet has sobered into crimson, and that
again into a golden brown. The leaves still hang in isolated
clusters upon the oaks, dry, and rustling ever and anon with a
melancholy, sighing music; but the hickory trees stretch their
long branches and lift their lofty heads, denuded of every thing
but their fragrant fruit, which, looked at from below, dwindles
to the size of dots on the rich sky.
This is the time, of all others, for long rambles; and when
October brings it round, we moralizers upon the thriftless and
vagrant
habits of certain of our neighbours, are disposed to be at
least as idle as the idlest, and think no day better, or at least more
delightfully spent, than that on which we repair to a strip of
untouched
forest land a mile or two from our village, and there
waste the short afternoon in such sport as fascinates the truant
schoolboy, until the declining sun, and the chilly breeze of
approaching
night, warn us off, tired trespassers upon nature's blest
domain. Is it possible any body ever had the heart to whip a
truant boy in such weather, when the forest was accessible?
Oh! the pleasures of the cart ride, even with its unfailing
accompaniment
of shrieks of pretty terror, as the patient oxen draw
us up and down and sidling through hills on whose impracticable
roughness no horses could be trusted! Then comes the racing
search after the oldest trees, which are always supposed to
promise
the largest nuts, and then the scramble when some strong arm
shakes down a rattling shower on the unequal floor formed around
the foot of the tree by means of shawls and cloaks and
buffalo-robes
,
spread on the ground lest the thick bed of leaves should hide
the falling treasure. Many is the wild shout of youthful glee
when some older or less accustomed face is unwarily turned
upward
for a moment to ask another shower, and receives, perchance,
a billeted bullet on the tip of its nose. And not a little consoling
is required by the infant heroes upon whom the bounties of
autumn
descend too copiously, administering more and harder
thumps than their green philosophy has yet been trained to
endure
.
These frolics are not without their perils, however, and those
more serious than a bruised nose or a thumped shoulder; and
the especial nut-gathering of which I began to tell, will, I am
sure, be long remembered by all concerned, though perhaps for
very various reasons.
II.
Ye list to the songs of the same forest bird,
Your own merry music together is heard:
Nor can Echo, sweet sisters! amid the rocks tell
Your voices apart in her moss-covered cell.
Our
party was a large one, and as merry as it was large.
Three great wagons, drawn by oxen, were our vehicles; and
into these were crammed as many giggling girls as possible, with
a few older heads by way of ballast. Three stout farmers went
along, to shout at the teams, and to pilot us safely over hill and
hollowno sinecure, as I before hinted. These were to officiate
also as shakers or
pounders;
for, be it known, whenever the
attendants
on these occasions are too old or too lazy to climb, they
make their services effectual by upheaving great stones, which
they throw against the tree with main force, producing
concussions
which might bring down toppling cliffs, let alone
hickory-nuts
.
Our friends, Haw and Gee, were of the order of the
elephant
,
and could not be induced to climb; but they were admirable
pounders, and we were soon well pelted with nuts, and busily
engaged
in freeing them from their aromatic wrappersan
operation
which we of the West call shucking.
Among our bright-eyed company were the twin-daughters of a
worthy neighbour of ours, generally known among the villagers
by the title of Deacon Lightbody, though I believe he has not
any other clain to the dignity than that which rests upon a
particularly
grave face, and a devoted attention to the secular
affairs
of his church. He always makes the fire in the
meetinghouse
sees
to the sweeping and lightingasks the minister to
dinnerhands up all noticesturns out the dogs that sometimes
intrude during serviceand does all necessary frowning and
head-shaking at the unlucky urchins who laugh when the said
dogs howl just outside the door. All this Mr. Lightbody does,
not for the lucre of gain, but from pure love of what he calls the
good cause, though I doubt he deceives himself a little as to
the catholicity of his regard for religion. Yet he declares he
does
try to have charity for those who do not think as he does in
matters of faith, though it is certain that no Christian can object
to any of his favourite doctrines, since they are Bible truths and
nothing else. We must leave the worthy deacon to reconcile
these incongruities, as they have no immediate bearing on our
little story, and were introduced solely for the purpose of making
our reader acquainted with Mr. Lightbody's turn of mind.
Those twin-daughters of his were as like as two peas
sweet peasor pea blossoms rather. Such cloudless azure eyes
such diaphanous complexionssuch dimpling roses and such
sunny hair! If one should undertake to describe them,
nothing
but superlatives would do. Yet their hands had handled
the churn-dasher too often to be very satiny in the palm, and
their feet, having never been coaxed into shoes of the size and
shape of a scissors-sheath, were unfashionably well-proportioned.
Charming fairies were they, nevertheless, and wonderfully alike,
yet with a difference, perceptible enough to their intimates. Ruth
was the demure fairyElsie the tricksy sprite. Ruth was born a
careful, tidy housewife; Elsie an incorrigible shatter-brain. Ruth
never did wrong, while Elsie had to atone for all sorts of offences
against good order and good government twenty times a day. Yet
she made up so sweetly, and was withal so kind and loving, that
her father, who meant to be considered a stern stickler for family
discipline, could seldom find it in his heart to scold her for her
faults, except when she laughed in meeting, which always cost
her a laborious pacification.
These two lilies of the valley were arrayed in white, as was
meet: Ruth's ribands being lilac, and Elsie's pale green, for the
convenience of being known apart. As an offset to their
wood-nymph
costume, we had Miss Cotgrave in a purple silk, with her
coal-black locks brought down to her chin, and then wound round
her large ears, and a pinch-back brooch by way of
ferronire
.
Then there was Ellen Shirley, prepared for a game at her dearly
beloved romps, wisely preferring a pink gingham dress to any sort
of finery; and Patty Chandler grasping her great basket and
staring silently with round eyes, seemingly full of nothing but
anxiety lest she should not manage to secure her share of the
spoils. These, with half a dozen or more of little folks, who
were any thing but
personnages muets
, made up our load, and
the other vehicles carried crews neither less numerous nor less
noisy.
The young ladies talked and laughed moderately, for there
were no beaux; and Miss Cotgrave said she rejoiced that it was
so, for she did hate to have a parcel of young men hanging about.
III.
These arms
Invite the chain, this naked breast the steel.
It
could not have been long after we left the village that two
sober-looking individuals, drest in comely and reverend black,
greeted the pleased eyes of Deacon Lightbody as he stood at his
own door, looking at the meeting-house, (as was his habit,) and
noting the curious effect of the level beams of the afternoon sun,
which shone through and through the little building, making it
glow like a lantern. Light brought warmth to mind, and the
deacon, by a natural transition, began thinking that the very next
week he must bestir himself and get up a bee to bank up his
beloved meeting-house.
Are there any of my readers so benighted as not to take the
sense of this home-bred phrase? Then I must stop to tell them
that a bee is a collection of volunteers who agree to meet at
some specified time to accomplish any object of public or
private
utility which requires the concurrence of numbers. And
banking up is a service rendered very necessary by the
severity
of our winters and the slightness of our dwellings, and
consists in piling earth round the foundations, so as to prevent the
frosty winds from intruding below the floor. All this has nothing
at all to do with our important history, but is merely a private
hint for the enlightenment of the unlearned.
The deacon, then, was devising liberal things for the good of
his dear meeting-house, when the two suits of black, with faces
to correspond, (not to match,) crossed his line of vision and brought
a pleased expression into his solemn countenance. The
gentlemen
alighted, and proved to beone a church-officer from a
neighbouring town, and the other a young clergyman, who being
just come there, and likely to officiate within our bounds
occasionally
,
was an object of the first interest to Mr. Lightbody.
After a short prelude, Mr. Poppleton, the elder gentleman,
began. I called, Mr. Lightbody, to introduce this reverend
gentleman
to your acquaintance.
Mr. Lightbody shook hands, and then shook hands again, and
asked the gentlemen to walk in.
Mr. Poppleton, with a somewhat impatient wave of the hand,
as much as to say he had come on business, and had no time for
ceremony, proceeded in his speech.
This gentleman, sir, is Mr. Hammond,the reverend Mr.
Hammond, sirwho is going to be with us for a spell, and
perhaps
longerand as he thinks some of settling at the West, he
judges it best, and so do we allthat he should take a wife, and
so keep house, for you know it isn't pleasant for a minister to be
boarding round. And he has been recommended
The young man upon this turned, Deacon Lightbody says, as
red as a fire-coal, (as well he might,) and stammered out
something
about his having heard that Mr. Lightbody had two
daughters
.
Why, yes, siryes,I have sosaid the deacona
snug parsonage appearing at the end of a short vista in his
imagination
I
have soand the neighbours
do
say that they are
pretty likely girlsbut walk inwalk in; and the guests were
ushered in with reverential alacrity.
In the keepin-room they found Mrs. Lightbody, with her
hearth scrupulously swept and her white apron shining with
cleanliness, and her fair hair most primly arranged under a
transparent cap, which was yet not so clear as her complexion.
The ceremony of introduction having been repeated, Mr.
Poppleton
,
with very little circumlocution, gave Mrs. Lightbody to
understand the especial purport of the visit.
The good lady shared her husband's reverence for all that
belonged to the church, but she was a woman and a mother, and
she coloured deeply,almost painfully, at this abrupt reference
to the disposal of a daughter. But Mr. Poppleton had come on
business, and he knew only one way of doing it; and Mr.
Hammond
said but little, having, indeed, but little opportunity. After
some ineffectual attempts, he kept his eyes fixed firmly on the
floor while his mouth-piece set forth his claims and enlarged upon
his plans and prospects.
In Mr. Lightbody's mind, however, all was sunshine. To have
a minister for a son-in-law, was all that his ambition coveted;
and to do the candidate justice, his countenance and manner,
setting aside the unmanageable awkwardness of his present
position
were
much in his favour.
As far as I'm concerned, said Mr. Lightbody in winding up
the conference, as far as I'm concerned, I'm perfectly
agreeable
.
I give my consent, and I dare say Miss Lightbody won't
say noyou can take your choiceairy one of 'emairy one of
'emthat isif they are agreeable, you know! I shouldn't put
any force upon 'em, nor over-persuade 'embut if they're
agreeable
I am!
Thus encouraged, the principal and his
double
took leave, in
spite of pressing invitations to stay tea. They were on their
way to some convocation of their order, and were to call as they
returned. But meanwhile, as their way onward lay near the
nutting-ground, Mr. Hammond suggested that it might not be
amiss to make some small tarry in that vicinity. Perhaps he
thought his choice need not be restricted to the deacon's fair twins
or perhapsbut they camesaw
IV.
Alive, I would be loved of one
I would be wept when I am gone.
In
the midstthe very acmeof our frolic, when Ruth was
swinging in a grape-vine which had been slung so conveniently
by the freakish hand of Nature that it needed very little aid from
man,and Elsie, shrieking like a Banshee, was flying through
the dry leaves, pursued by Patty Chandler, whose basket she had
mischievously abstractedthis was the time, of all others, when
the two sober-looking horsemen rode up the hillside and presented
themselves to the view of our abashed damsels, who had forgotten
that there were any grave people in the world. A wet blanket!
and all our fire was extinguished accordingly. Every body fell
to picking up nuts with an air of conscious delinquency.
Mr. Poppleton was acquainted with most of the party, and gave
his companion a general introduction; singling out Ruth and
Elsie, however, and endeavouring, by sundry not very far-sought
questions, to make them shine out for Mr. Hammond's
encouragement
,
just as we pat and coax a shy horse when we wish to
show his paces to advantage. But the twins were more than
shy, and could not be brought to say any thing but yes and no, so
that Mr. Poppleton, discouraged by the result of this his first
effort at a more diplomatic mode of proceeding, fairly called them
aside, leaving Mr. Hammond staring and unprotected among a
parcel of giddy girls.
The reverend youth had no long trial, however, for it was but
a moment before Mr. Poppleton returned, and with a grave sigh
beckoned him away.
It took us a good while to find the fair sisters, and when they
did show themselves, Ruth looked primmer than ever, and Elsie
had certainly been shedding tears, though her face gave us no
small reason to suspect they had been tears of laughter.
What
did
Mr. Poppleton want? was the question of half a
dozen pairs of lips.
Who is that handsome young man? Is he a minister?
asked not a few.
The answers to these questions were very vague. Ruth, and
even Elsie seemed seized with a fit of the silents, and conjecture
was left to float wide and pick up all sorts of things.
I'll tell you! said Miss Cotgrave, whose thoughts were a
good deal turned towards matrimony, I'll tell you all about it!
I see it all now! Old Pop is looking for a wife for that young
man. He always takes care of the young ministers, and he's
been to Deacon Lightbody's to speak for one of his girls!
The truth thus blurted out was almost too much for the heroines
of Mr. Poppleton's anti-romance. They blushed, they laughed,
they made up all sorts of improbable stories, and to escape from
the storm of raillery, began seeking for nuts with renewed
industry
.
How provoking that we have no one to climb the trees!
said Elsie; the nuts hang on the upper boughs after all the
shaking! and at the word, the best climber in the country was
at her elbow.
Joe Fenton, a son of the forest, dark-eyed and ruddy-cheeked,
and withal slender and elastic as a willow wand, had long been
suspected of a bashful liking for Elsie, and yet no one,not even
Miss Cotgrave,had ever been able to ascertain whether there
had actually been any love-passages between them or not.
The principal ground for any suspicion of partiality on the side
of the young lady was an over-scrupulous avoidance of Master
Fenton upon every occasion. This, Miss Cotgrave says, is a
sure sign.
Joe had been ploughing in a neighbouring field, (Burns has
made ploughing glorious, O gentle reader!) and hearing the
merry
shouts of the nut-gatherers, could not resist the temptation to
come and see if his help was not needed.
Oh! climb the tree, Joe! said the little folks, for the grown
damsels were somewhat ceremonious, although Joe was in his
every-day clothes, and did not look half the beau he appears on
Sundays and high occasions.
Not another word was needed, and it was scarcely a moment
before Joe was poised on a bough which it made one dizzy to look
up at. Down came the pelting showers on all sides, and we
were fain to run away until the rain had ceased from the
exhausted
condition of the reservoirs. Baskets were filled, and
bags were brought from the wagons. Another and another tree
did young Fenton climb, and with equal success, until Miss
Cotgrave
,
in pursuing her running changes upon her favourite
theme, inflicted a cruel pinch upon Ruth's arm, asking her
whether the young parson was in treaty for herself or her sister.
A scream from Ruth at the moment when Fenton was making
a perilous transit from one branch to another, caused him to miss
his hold, and the next instant he lay on the ground at her feet
dead, as we all supposed. His lips were colourless, and his
breathing had ceased entirely.
It were vain to tell of the consternation, the distress which
followed
.
Ruth's grief was terrific. The poor girl, feeling that
she had been the cause, though innocently, of this sad accident,
hung over him, wringing her hands in helpless anguish,
beseeching
him to open his eyes and speak to her, and this in tones
which could hardly fail to awaken life if a glimmering remained.
We had begun to despair of the success of the simple remedies
which were within our reach when a deep-drawn sigh from the
sufferer
relieved us. As one of the company observed, The minute
he ketch'd his breath, his cheeks begun to look streaked, and the
red streaks soon overpowered the white ones. Our efforts were
now renewed, and Ruththe prim, the demure Ruth,
transported
beyond herself by the first violent emotion she had ever
experienced, was as profuse in her exclamations of hope and joy,
as she had before been in those of agonizing self-reproach. It was
at this moment that Elsie made her appearance for the first time
since the accident. She was pale, but most of us were so, and
no one seemed so little inclined to assist in recovering poor Joe's
scattered senses.
La! said Miss Cotgrave, if nobody had cared any more
about Joe Fenton than you did, Elsie, he might have been dead
by this time!
Joe turned his opening eyes full upon Elsie.
Are you much hurt? she inquired, with an indifferent air.
Ruth replied for him, with a most eloquent exposition of the
danger
,
and the terror, and the joy; but Elsie turned away as if she
had not heard the words.
We got our patient into a wagon by the aid of our stout
teamsters
;
we had him bled when we reached home, and he felt
almost
well before bed-time,well bodily, we mean, for Elsie's
coldness had found a very sensitive spot in his heart, and the
poor boy could hardly think of it without shivering.
V.
What wicked and dissembling glass of mine
Made me compare with Hermia's sphery eyne?
In
two days Joe Fenton's lithe limbs were as active as ever,
but the bleeding had done nothing for the blow on his heart. He
had never, we are assured, told his love to Elsie, but he thought
she knew all about it, and now to be treated in this killing sort of
way! It was plain that he must have deceived himself entirely;
and, lacking courage to encounter Elsie's frigid looks again, he
resolved to make Ruth the confidant of his troubles, and to
engage
her good offices with her less approachable sister.
As to his shy Doris, she had been gloomy and reserved with
her sister, but more than once closeted with Miss Cotgrave, who
had made her several long calls. Calls are sometimes very useful
in enlightening us as to the character and intentions of particular
friends who do not happen to be present, and Miss Cotgrave was
conscientiously anxious to disabuse Elsie's mind on the subject of
Fenton's attachment. For this benevolent purpose, the
occurrence
in the wood afforded excellent material. Elsie, who had
witnessed the accident from a distance, was at first unable to
move toward the spot, and afterward deterred by some pangs of
maidenly jealousy awakened by the passionate grief of her sister.
We do not like that others should display too much interest in
those who ought to love us and us only; and the instinctive
feeling
of resentment is apt to extend itself even to the objects of
such impertinent affection. So poor Elsie, whose brain was none
of the clearest after that unhappy tumble, came at once to the
conclusion that she must either have been deceived throughout,
or that her young admirer had proved inconstant; and her
uneasiness
took the form of high displeasure at both parties concerned,
with some share of the same feeling towards all the rest of the
world, including her own silly self.
Fenton knocked at Mr. Lightbody's door, and Elsie ran and hid
herself in the garden. Here she shed tears enough to have
watered
a heavier sorrow, and in the very tempest of her passion she
saw her false love and her cruel sister going out as for a walk,
engaged in earnest conversation. The thing was certain, and
the blue eyes were proudly driedto be swimming again the very
next moment.
Elsie! Elsie! It was her father's voice; and summoning
new resolution, she wiped away the intrusive tears and hastened
to the house. In the keepin-room she encountered Mr. Poppleton
and his youthful reverend. Mr. and Mrs. Lightbody sat by, but
Mr. Poppleton was again the spokesman.
Which of you is it? asked the good man after brief
salutation
to the April-faced maiden; then checking himself, he added,
But that isn't itare you the one that had the green string
around her neck t'other day? That was the one we wanted.
Elsie answered mechanically, Yes.
Why you don't look so chirk as you did then. You ain't
sick, be ye?
This brought a mechanical No.
Oh! only a little peakin, eh! Well! now you see, we've
come on particular business. Mr. Hammond stands in need of a
helpmate; and after consulting with his friends, and also getting
the consent and good-will of your honoured father, he wishes to
know if you could be agreeable to undertake the journey of life
with him,that is, if you think you could pitch upon him for a
husband?
Mr. Poppleton, began the blushing Mr. Hammond, as soon
as he could edge in a word, you embarrass the young lady, sir!
Allow me a few minutes' conversation
Mr. Hammond, rejoined the elder, with rather a severe air,
missionaries and missionaries' wives must not be fancy-led like
the vain world. This young woman has been well brought up,
and showed her duty in all things, and now the only question
seems to
me
to be, whether she can make up her mind to renounce
vanity and folly, and spend the rest of her life in doing good.
And upon this text spoke Mr. Poppleton for something like half
an hour, aided very warmly now and then by Mr. Lightbody,
but uninterrupted by any body else. His discourse had so much
the air of a sermon that it would have seemed impertinent,so
Mr. Hammond thought, we dare say,to have attempted to refute
or modify any of its positions. Even a sermon must have an end,
however, and when the orator had gone over and over, and round
and round the subject till he felt satisfied with his exposition of it,
he turned to Mrs. Lightbody with a very complacent, Well,
ma'am, what do
you
say?
Mrs. Lightbody remembered, though she did not tell, that she
had for some time past observed certain almost intangible
indications
of a liking for somebody else, and she therefore referred the
matter to Elsie herself, only observing that a good minister's wife
was a great blessing to the people.
What was her surprise when Elsie, who had been gazing out
of the window, turned suddenly to her father, and gave an
unconditional
,
and almost impetuous consent.
Why, Elsie! said Mrs. Lightbody.
She's right! said the deacon, rubbing his hands.
I hope she'll be a burningbegan Mr. Poppleton. But Mr.
Hammond, looking at the agitated countenance of the beautiful
girl, motioned to his ally to cease, and taking her hand desired
her to compose herself, saying, stiffly enough, but yet kindly,
that he would give her no further trouble at present, but would
call again in a day or two.
And with the usual adieux these odd negotiators departed.
VI.
Kissing the lips of unacquainted change.
That
very evening, when the two fair sisters retired to their
chamber, did Ruth, drawing encouragement from Elsie's
tearstained
cheeks, open her missionhow different from the other!
It was a tale of such passionate protestationsuch humble
suing,on the part of the hero of the hickory-nuttingthat Elsie,
stung with compunction for her blind precipitancy, called and
thought herself the most wretched of human beings; and almost
frightened her more placid sister by the vehemence of her sorrow.
Fenton loved her then, after all; and shewhat had she done!
Why, Elsie, dear! said the soft-voiced Ruth, as the
stricken-hearted
girl sobbed upon her bosom, what
can
be the matter?
I used to think you liked Joe Fenton
Oh! Ruth! I have promisedpromised that odious old
Poppleton
that
hateful young minister,and here tears stopped
the sad story.
Promised what, dear? said Ruth, who was a matter-of-fact
little body.
Oh! promised to be a missionaryto go and live in the woods
to marry thatoh dear! oh dear!
To marry that young clergyman! Why, Elsie! how can
you call him hateful! He is as much handsomer than Joe Fenton
as
Handsome! I don't care for his being handsome! I hate
him! I wish I had never seen him! Oh! that miserable
nutting
!
And her tears poured afresh.
Ruth sat in musing silence. She could not find it in her heart
to condole with her sister upon the prospect of becoming the
help-meet
of so attractive a missionary; and she was unconsciously
balancing in her own mind the various points of difference
between
Mr. Hammond and Joe Fenton, when Elsie suddenly
started
up.
Ruth! why won't you take him yourself?
I! said Ruth, bridling up a little, why, because he has not
asked me!
Oh! butdear, dear sisteryou know we are so much alike
that strangers never can tell us apart. Now do! there's a
darling
good girl! do save me from all this misery! I can never
love himI shall hate himand that will be so wicked for a
missionary's
wife!
Ruth shook her head very discouragingly. She could not think
of offering herself, even to a minister.
Ah! but you know, Mr. Poppleton only asked for the one that
wore the green riband, and if you would just change with me,
nobody would know the difference except father and mother; and
they would not tell. Oh! Ruth, if you love me one bit you can't
refuse! You are just the very thing for a minister's wife! so
much better than poor me! Dear, dear Ruthwon't you? You
have never loved any body else; and I'm sure this young
minister
is good as well as handsome. You don't know how kindly he
spoke to me,and Elsie stopt for want of breath.
You said just now that he was hateful, said Ruth, with her
most demure air.
Ah! but I was thinking of poor Joe, thenI mean I was
thinking how he loved meyou told me yourself, you knowoh!
I should be so miserablebut I never will marry him, and then
father will be so angry! And with a profusion of tears and
kisses she besought her sister to say yes, but in vain. All that
Ruth could be brought to promise was, that she would talk to her
father and mother about it, though she could scarcely withstand
the sobs which continued to burst from Elsie's heart long after
she had fallen asleep.
Upon consulting with the higher powers, Mrs. Lightbody was
soon persuaded into thinking with Elsie, that if Ruth would take
her place, the young minister would never observe the
difference
;
but Mr. Lightbody had the dignity of the cloth too much at
heart to allow of this attempt at deception. He persisted in his
opinion that since Elsie had made an engagement, she ought
certainly
to fulfil it.
And let Fenton take Ruth, if he's a mind to, concluded the
old gentleman with his peculiarly solemn air. Joe's a good
young man, and he's got a good farm toothat ishe will have
when it's cleared upand Ruth will likely have a sight more of
worldly goods than Elsie, though she won't have a minister, to be
sureI hold that a young woman that's got a minister hasn't got
much to wish for.
But, father, said Elsie, who was almost writhing under this
business-like estimate of the matter,what will poor Joe say?
Say! why that's pretty good! Didn't you tell me just now
that the reverend Mr. Hammond would just as leave marry one
as the other? Is Joe Fenton to set up to be more difficult than a
minister, I should like to know?
Yet Elsie did not desist in despair. She was accustomed to
victory upon easier terms, it is true, but she spared neither tears
nor coaxing until she brought her father to a compromise.
It was agreed that when Mr. Hammond paid the critical visit
both sisters should wear green ribands, and let the young divine
make a choice, which was to be considered final.
VII.
Say that but once I see a beauteous star,
I may forget it for another star.
The
toilet of youth and beauty ought never to cost much time,
and the ordinary costume of the fair twins was simpler than the
simplest; yet the reverend Mr. Hammond had been in the
parlour
for a long nervous half hour, and Mr. Lightbody had given
several Blue-Beard-like calls at the foot of the stairs, before Ruth
and Elsie made their appearance on the day of destiny. The
interval had been spent in the most minute and anxious
comparison
of every several ringletevery article of dressand
particularly
every knot and wave of the talismanic green riband.
When all was done they could scarce be sure each of her own
blushing image in the mirror, so perfect was the resemblance.
But oh! dear, dear Ruth! said Elsie, I am so afraid you
will not be able to speak like me! Do try to be a little wild and
saucy! I fear that will betray us, after all. I can be as still as
you, but you will not talk, I know!
I will do my best, since I have promised, said Ruth, with
a sigh; but oh! Elsie, if you were not such a dear, good
sister
Oh! come, comedon't let us wait a moment longer! There
is father calling again! And she hurried her sister along till
they stood in the dreaded presence.
Mr. Hammond, who had fortunately or wisely left his Achates
at home this time, arose to receive the fair sisters as they entered
the room side by side. He cast his eyes wonderingly from one to
the other, and finding himself totally at a loss, gravely resumed
his seat with an air of painful embarrassment. It might
embarrass
a bolder man to find that he could not tell his betrothed
from any other true-love.
Which of these young ladies have I seen before? said he at
last, with straightforward simplicity.
You have seen us both! exclaimed Elsie hastily.
The young man smiled, very quietly, and at once drew his
chair near Elsie's, with so evident a recognition of the voice and
manner that the poor child had much ado to restrain her tears.
She looked imploringly at Ruth, but Ruth could do nothing but
blush, and the catastrophe seemed inevitable, when Miss Cotgrave
came sailing into the room.
She made her best and most sweeping courtesy to the young
minister, and cast a very searching glance at our two agitated
damsels. The young lady's eye was more than piercingit was
screwingyet it was at fault now. Mr. Hammond was thrown
out too, for in the process of receiving the new guest, Ruth and
Elsie had changed their places, and Elsie, warned by past
mischance
,
was resolutely silent.
Dear! how dark you
do
keep your room, Mrs. Lightbody,
said Miss Cotgrave, who, being intuitively aware of a
matrimonial
cloud in the horizon, was determined to have more light on
the subject. I declare, coming in out of the light I can scarcely
see any body!
The western sun shone in so dazzlingMrs. Lightbody said.
But Miss Cotgrave was not so to be baffled.
Do
you
like the fashionable style of dark rooms, sir? said
she, appealing to Mr. Lightbody.
Fashion! at Deacon Lightbody's! The word dance did
not galvanize douce Davie Deans more severely than did this
unlucky term our worthy friend.
No, indeed! he exclaimed, with solemn earnestness; and in
less than half a minute he had conscientiously withdrawn every
curtain and thrown wide every blind, letting in the whole crimson
flood of a gorgeous sunset, and adding an angelic radiance to the
beautiful faces of his daughters.
Why, Ruth! I didn't know you! exclaimed Miss Cotgrave;
you and Elsie are more like each other than you are like
yourselves
!
Then in a lower tone to ElsiePoor Joe Fenton's
shot, eh!
A trained belle in a fashionable boudoir could not have
fainted more gracefully than did our simple Elsie at these words.
All was flutter, as is usual on such occasions, and nobody was
half so frightened as poor Miss Cotgrave.
Mercy on us! what is the matter? I wasn't in earnestI
only meant that he had got the bag to hold! Elsie, Elsie! don't!
I was only joking because you had given him the mitten!
During the time occupied in giving voice to these choice figures
of speech, Elsie's scattered wits had been recalled by the
abundant
aid of cold water, and when she seemed quite recovered,
Miss Cotgrave took her leave, a good deal mortified by the
awkward
result of her humorous effort, yet overjoyed to have come
into possession of a secret, and above all, anxious to get somebody
to help her keep it.
The young divine had stood gravely aloof during this scene.
Inexperienced as he was in the matter of female whims, he was
not yet so blind as to need telling that emotion, and not the illness
which Elsie tried to pretend, had in reality caused her swoon.
So, like a good and sensible Timothy as he was, he took the
readiest and simplest way to relieve his gathering perplexities.
Father! said he, approaching Mr. Lightbody, who sat
twirling his thumbs in a paroxysm of fidgets at Elsie's
perverseness
,
you have kindly consented to entrust me with one of your
daughters, and I had hoped that the one I had the pleasure of
seeing here before, was disposed to listen to me with some degree
of favour. If this is so, if the young lady does feel willing to
undertake the toils and hardships of a missionary lifewill you
yourself bestow her upon me? for I confess that the wonderful
resemblance between them leaves me entirely at a loss.
Mr. Lightbody gave a deep hem! sensibly relieved.
Come here, Ruth, my dear! said he, drawing the blushing
damsel to him very gently, and with a manifest softening of the
aspect which he usually considered becoming; come here and
tell your father if you think you could learn to be happy with this
reverend gentleman, (his reverence was three-and-twenty,) and
whether you are willing to make the sacrifices that a minister's
wife must make in this new country, and devote yourself to the
service of religion and the advancement of sound doctrine? He
paused for a reply, but none came. Perhaps Ruth was thinking
over these sacrifices, which form a standard topic on these
occasions
,
though they are not, practically, very obvious, especially
to people who have been accustomed to a country life.
Taking silence for assent, her father placed her passive hand
in that of Mr. Hammond, and pronounced an emphatic blessing
on them both. And, when this was done, her mother embraced
her, and murmured in her ear some words of exhortation or
encouragement, and then gave place to Elsie, who, after her own
manner, kissed and cried, and whispered her thanks and blessings.
And then the minister, whose views did not seem to accord in all
respects with Mr. Poppleton's, (that gentleman would probably
have judged it superfluous to remain after the business was
settled
,)
drew his gentle
fiance
to the garden-door, and thence into
the garden, though it was already twilight, and there contrived to
make her understand his plans and prospects much better than he
could have done by proxy, even though that proxy had been Mr.
Poppleton.
It was after they had vanished, that our hero of the
nutting-party
made his appearance upon the
tapis
, having been inspired
by Miss Cotgrave with an irresistible desire to know what was
really going on at Deacon Lightbody's. He could hardly have
happened in at a more fortunate juncture. Elsie, to be sure,
was weeping-ripe, but the awful deacon was walking the floor
in a most complacent humour, and Mrs. Lightbody's mild eyes
seemed to beam with unusual kindness.
Master Fenton was a man of few words, but those which he
mustered for this occasion were very much to the purpose; and
if Mr. Lightbody did not experience the same swelling of the
heart as when he bestowed Ruth upon a minister, he gave his
darling Elsie to the young farmer with very good will, and a
blessing which came warm from the heart.
There was not a second garden for Fenton and Elsie, but they
were old acquaintance; and, as the evening closed in, Mr.
Lightbody
rang the bell for family worship, and then, in the midst of
happy hearts, reverently returned thanks for the manifold
blessings
of his earthly lot.
Mr. Hammond is fortunately settled in our neighbourhood, for
the present at least; and he has the ueatest little cottage in the
wood, standing too under a very tall oak, which bends kindly
over it, looking like the Princess Glumdalclitch inclining her ear
to the box which contained her pet Gulliver. This cottage
possesses
among its recommendations that of being at the extremity
of a charming walk through the forest, and this circumstance
makes it especially precious to Elsie and Fenton, who are very
attentive to the dominie's lady. Farmers cannot marry so speedily
as ministers, but after next spring's business is finished, we shall,
may be, have another wedding to record.
AMBUSCADES.
Loves's not a flower that grows on the dull earth;
Springs by the calendarmust wait for sun
For rainmatures by partsmust take its time
To stemto leafto budto blow; it owns
A richer soil and boasts a quicker seed.
J. Sheridan Knowles
.
Tom Oliver
is the hero of my story, and there is almost
enough of him to make two drawing-room heroes. Tom is long,
and strong, and lithe enough to stand for a Kentucky Apollo; and
in his fringed hunting-shirt, with rifle in hand, and a dashing
'coon-skin cap overshadowing his dark eyes, he is no bad
personification
of the Genius of the West. And this is paying the West
a great compliment; for there is a wild grace and beauty about
Tom's whole appearance that is not to be found everywhere.
I know not whether it would be safe to say that Tom has made
his hands hard with labour, for he is not particularly fond of
work; but I may say he has made his heart soft with pity, for
a gentler nature lives not. Daring hunter as he is, he has found
time to be the most dutiful of sons; and from his boyhood he was
the sole support and comfort of a widowed mother. She
depended
upon him as if their relation had been reversed, and when the
poor soul came to die, she could bear no hand near her but his.
Night and day did he watch by her bedside, and the kind offices
of the neighbouring matrons came no nearer than the preparation
of such things as Tom required for his nursing. His hand
administered
the remedies, and offered the draught to the parched lip,
and smoothed the pillows, and fanned the fainting brow. And
when the last dread moment came, the same kind and dear hand
was clasped in the chill embrace of the dying, and afterwards
closed with pious care the eyes that had so long looked upon him
with more than a mother's love. Then and long afterwards,
Tom mourned for his poor old mother as if she had been a
youthful
bride. He has a kind heart.
Tom's passion was hunting; and although this had been
dutifully
restrained while his mother required his services, when she
was gone he found relief in indulging it to the uttermost. Whole
weeks would he be absent, and at length return with only the
skins of the deer and other animals that he had killed, and perhaps
a small supply of food for an interval of rest. So expert was he
in woodcraft that this course secured him all that his simple mode
of life required. The cottage that had been his mother's home
continued to be his; and the forty on which it stood was called
his farm, though I believe the deer roamed as freely there as any
where else in the forest. He has shot foxes and raccoons from
his window. Yet he was accounted rich, for his log house was a
good one and better furnished than most; and he had planted fruit
and made various improvements for his mother's sake, which he
would have been slow in making for his own; and, besides, he was
known for so able and ingenious a hand that his services were
much in request, and always commanded the highest price in the
market. Such is our primitive estimate of the elements of
worldly
success, that Tom, take him all in all, was considered quite a
speculation in the matrimonial way.
But a roving hunter is no mark for the blind boy's
butt-shaft
.
Our damsels might have saved themselves the trouble
of curling their beau-killers, and slipping off their aprons as he
approached. He never seemed to see them; but inquired,
Polly
,
where's your father? or Abby, does your mother want
some venison? without taking off his cap or putting down his
rifle. The girls had well nigh given him up as a hopeless case
before he announced his intention of travelling to see the world;
and, when this was known, it was guessed by shrewd mothers
that Tom meant to bring home a more stylish bride than any
which our humble bounds afforded.
Tom went first to York Statethat being the natural bent
and limit of our travelsand after having been absent only
about three weeks, he came back to his own house very
composedly
during a violent storm, and got ready to go hunting again.
Neighbours felt a good deal of curiosity to learn what had sent
him back so soon, but he only said the East was not what it was
cracked up to be, and went on his old course. Ere long he was
missing again, and no one could tell anything of his intentions,
or of the probable length of his absence. His nearest neighbour
took care of his cow and pigs, for every one liked to do Tom a good
turn; and nobody broke his windows or pulled the shingles off his
roof to make fishing-lights or quail-traps, because he might come
back any day, and would not be likely to impeticos such
gratuities
very kindly. The whole long winter passed, and nothing
was seen or heard of Tom Oliver.
During this time, an event of unwonted importance gave a stir
to our villagenothing less than the addition of two new families,
and those not of a stamp likely to slip unnoticed into so small a
community. Widows guided them both, and each boasted a
young lady; but if the mistresses might be cited in proof that
the genus vidder has many varieties, so no less might we
quote damsels as specimens of the distinct orders that are
observable
in young ladyhood.
Mrs. Levering was a thrifty dame, with one grown up son and
ever so many little ones, and one only daughter, a lovely girl of
seventeen or so, who wrought day and night with the patience of
the gentle Griselidis, and seemed to feel that she was but labouring
in her vocation. Her mother, a most devout believer in the
lawful
supremacy of the stronger sex, had brought up Emma to
think that she was born to work for the boys; and so potent is
habit, that the young girl, fair as she was, and worthy of a softer
lot, had never learned to wish it otherwise. A plain house
plainly
furnished, and a moderate farm moderately stocked, formed
the little all of the Leverings; and so completely were their time
and attention absorbed by the cares of life, that Emma and her
mother did not join the sewing society, nor the young man the
hunting parties which alone constituted the winter's gayety. Yet
everybody liked Emma, and many a wish was expressed that she
would let her rosy cheeks be seen somewhere else besides in
the meetin'-house.
The other lady was a more marked person than any of the
Leverings. Mrs. Purfle, widow of the celebrated Doctor Purfle,
who performed so many curestime and place not specifiedof
diseases both before and since considered incurablewas
somewhat
past her prime, indeed had probably for some time been so.
Yet she maintained much splendour of appearance; and having
flourished as a milliner at the South, she had the advantage of
possessing, in the remnants of her professional stores, more
unmatched
and unmatchable articles of finery than often find their
way to this utilitarian West. She had also, as we may suppose,
profited by the Doctor's professional researches; since she
assured
those of the young ladies whom she especially favoured, that
washing spoils the complexion, and that her own somewhat
shadowy
hue was owing to her having discovered this cosmetic
secret
late in life. Add to all this that Mrs. Purfle is a woman of
property, having a clear income of an hundred and fifty dollars
per annum, (so says Rumour,) and a marriageable niece who is
her decided heiress, and it will readily be imagined that the little
green-blinded tenement which shelters Mrs. Purfle and her fair
charge, was an object of no small interest in the eyes of the
village
.
Miss Celestina Pye, (called Teeny by her aunt, except on
solemn occasions,) was scarcely taller than Mrs. Purfle's
high-backed
rocking-chair, but of a most bewitching
embonpoint
.
Her complexion was of that kind which reminds one of a
fat stewed oysterwhite, soft, and unmeaningprobably a
monument
of the success of her aunt's hydrophobic plan. Her eyes
were blue, what there was of them; her cheeks boasted each a
spot of pink which looked like hectic; and her mouth was so
pursed up that it seemed at first glance as if she must always
have been fed with a quill. Yet upon proper inducement Miss
Celestina could draw out her lips to a becoming simper, beyond
which she never ventured, not having good teeth. She wore the
longest bodice and the largest bustle that had ever been seen west
of Detroit; and her curls were so innumerable that certain of
the ruder beaux compared her to an owl in an ivy-bush. In
short the young lady had been brought up for a belle and a
beauty, and both herself and Mrs. Purfle considered the work
crowned in the result.
We have among us so few people that live on their money,
that we look up to such with an instinctive reverence. Whether
Mrs. Purfle's income had been exaggerated (as many were
inclined
to suspect,) was a matter of frequent discussion; but all
the world joined in paying her the same attention and deference
as if its amount had been ascertained beyond a doubt. She was
considered as a leader of the
ton
on all occasions, and being
naturally
of a gay as well as of a sentimental turn, she helped to
enliven
the village not a little.
One little peculiarity of Mrs. Purfle, only worth telling as it
develops the tenderer elements of her character, has not yet been
mentioned. Her morning-roomindeed, her only parlourwas
fitted up in a style so unique that the visitor was naturally led to
inquire as to the casue of Mrs. Purfle's partiality for a colour not
usually much in favour with the ladies. To begin with the
principal
ornament, the lady herselfshe sat always in a tall yellow
rocking-chair, dressed in a buff gown and a cap trimmed with
paradise ribbons. Nankeen slippers graced her feet, and these,
by way of contrast, bore a meandering embroidery in
straw-coloured
worsteds. Her windows were draped with orange
moreen
;
the cover of her work-table was a monument of her
housewifely
ingenuity, having been dyed with turmeric by her own
thrifty fingers. Her pincushion, founded on a brick, and of
course of respectable dimensions, was covered with well-saved
triangles of yellow flannel, and edged with a tarnished gold lace.
Yellow tissue-paper clothed the frames of the numerous coloured
engravings which adorned the walls; and a splendid apron of the
same hid the fire-place all summer, and was pinned before the
book-shelf in winter. Upon Mrs. Purfle and all these golden
accompaniments waited a little yellow boy, whom she had
brought from the South with her, and whose name she had
changed
from Belzy to Brimstone, that he might be in keeping with the
rest of the furniture.
The widow's preference for the colour of jealousy was not
without a reason and a pertinent one, although her deceased lord
had been a person of unsuspected constancy during the six months
of their married life. There are some sentiments which can give
tenderness even to yellow. Doctor Purfle had been settled in the
city of New Orleans and his wife's comfortable house only a
single
season, when he fell a victim to the prevailing fever. From
this time forward did his faithful relict vow herself to the most
odious of hues. He was all yaller, she would pensively
observe
,
and I'll be yaller too! And, besides, she had been
known to add, when speaking to a confidential friend, it came
very handy, for my yaller things hadn't sold as well as I
expected
.
Having been so happy in her married life, we shall excite no
surprise when we confess that Mrs. Purfle's darling object was to
secure a husband for her niece. Her own individual objects in
life were answered; she had been married, she had changed her
name, (very advantageously too, for her own used to be Bore
she always insists that those long tippets the ladies used to wind
round their necks were named after her,) she had kept her
property
,
and also acquired in addition the Doctor's cupping-glasses,
his saddle-bags, and many other useful articles; and now her sole
care was the fortunate disposal of the fair Celestina. Some years
had passed since the commencement of her efforts, and Miss Pye
did not seem any nearer to the goal than at first; but Mrs. Purfle
was not discouraged, for she had, as she said, almost given up,
herself, when the Doctor came along, all in a minute like, and she
was married without any trouble at all. Hoping for some such
windfall, she and Miss Teeny persevered, and, meanwhile, amused
themselves as well as they could.
In the interest excited by these two new familiesone so busy,
and the other so independentwe had almost forgotten Tom
Oliver
,
when some observant eye espied a smoke issuing from his
chimney as calmly as if no interval had occurred in its owner's
housekeeping; and the neighbour who peeped in to ascertain
whether there was a mortal and an honest tenant, found Tom
boiling his venison with potatoes, as usual, in a huge pot which
held at least a week's provision, and sent forth a savoury steam.
Why, Tom! is that you? said neighbour Brumbleback.
Flesh and blood, and blue veins, was the laconic reply.
When did you get home? pursued the inquirer.
Just as the east was cracking for daylight.
Where in the world have you been this time?
In the world! Why, bless your soul! I've been to Saint
Peter's.
You don't! was he to hum?
Tom looked up and laughed.
Brumbleback, said he, there ain't many saints in the army.
They call a fort after Saint Peter, away off on the Mississippi
river.
What notion sent you there?
I went after my cousin, John Hanford.
Do tell! was he a goin' to help you any?
I don't want any help. I only went to see him. He was at
Kalamazoo, and he wrote me it was rather a busy place, and I
thought I'd go out there and take a hand with the rest. You
know I tried York State a while last summer?
Yes, said Brumbleback, I know you did, and I expected
you'd come back so big that a man couldn't touch you with a ten
foot pole. But you didn't stay long enough to get uppish. What
sent you back so soon? I've always wanted to know.
Oh! I found it was no place for me. I went to see my
uncle
in Jefferson County, and he wanted me to stay with him in
place of a son he'd lost; but when I came to try the woods, I gave
it up at once. You never saw such mean hunting. I might
walk all day without a sight. And there's no room to shoot
when you do see any thing. I came within one of shooting the
prettiest girl I ever laid eyes on. She was out in the woods
looking
for wintergreens. I never shall forget how she looked. I
thought she was dead, but she had only fainted away, and when I
saw she was coming to life, I ran like a
painter
.
[5]
[5]
Panther.
I would not have
met her eyes for the world. I sent some one else to see to her.
And didn't you see her again?
Not I! I thought I had discovered that the East was no place
for me, so I just gathered myself together, shook hands with my
uncle, and made tracks westward. I wouldn't have taken the
old man's stony farm for a gift. I can make five dollars here
where I can one there.
Well! and what took you to Kalamazoo? said Brumble
back, who had never before found Tom so communicative.
10
Why, John Hanford wrote me that they were going to have
a bear-hunt out there, and that, besides, there was a good deal to
do, so I thought I'd try my luck. When I got there I found a
heavy rain had spoiled the bear-hunt, and my cousin had gone to
St. Joseph's to keep a boarding-house. I went on to St. Joseph's,
and there found that John had changed his mind, and started three
days before for Chicago. I had got into the humour of travelling
now, so I thought I'd go too and not give up since I'd come so far
to see John. So off I went, but would you believe it! John had
just started with a party to Rock River to see what was doing
there. I was determined not to be distanced, so I gave chase
again. At Rock River I missed him just as I had done before.
He had had a better offer to go to Galena and work among the
lead mines. I felt sure of him now, so I stayed a few days at
Rock River to see what I could, and rest myself a little, and then
started for Galena. Lo and behold! John was off to
Wheat-Diggins
,
because he wanted to see a place where they never cut
their corn, but turned in their hogs to fat themselves according to
their own notion. I'd half a mind to give up, but I thought I'd
like to see such curious work too, so off I streaked to
Wheat-Diggins
.
Do you believe, John was off before I got there!
Well, perhaps; but you warn't fool enough to follow him any
further?
Wasn't I! By that time I'd got so gritty, I'd have followed
him to the Pacific, rather than have given up. He had gone
over the prairies with a party of young men, and there was
another
party just ready to start, so I was glad of the chance to go
with themfor I had never seen a real prairieand a fine hearty
set of fellows they were.
How did you like the prairies?
Right well! There were seventy miles of the way without
a house, so we camped out. One prairie that we crossed was
twenty-six miles long, sometimes level as a floor, and then again
rolling. At times we could see neither tree nor bush, but just a
great lake like, frozen over and covered with snowfor it began
to be cold by that time. There would be timber-patches that
looked at first no bigger than your hand, but when you'd come
up to 'em, you'd find they covered four or five acres, and some
times fifty or an hundred. These patches looked exactly like
islands. We camped in these for the sake of shelter and
firewood
.
After supper we lay down and slept with our feet to the
fire; but we did not dare to sleep long, for fear of getting numb
with the cold. So every hour or so we'd get up and wrestle a
spell, and then lie down and take another nap. Oh! we had
grand times!
But what did you do for money?
I didn't need much, for generally I couldn't get people to take
pay for my lodging. They were glad to see any body from the
settlements, and they would ask a great many questions; and by
talking round we generally found that I knew somebody they
knew, and then they would never take a cent. They would give
me a bit of paper with their name and where they lived, to give
to their acquaintance when I went back. Once they did that
when I did not know the man they asked about, but had only
heard him preach. Yet when I reached St. Peter's, two thousand
miles from home, I had only two dollars in my pocket.
But I
found my cousin!
Shy game,
I
tell ye! said Brumbleback; but how did
you get home?
Oh, they were building a saw mill not far from there, and
John engaged as a hand, and they offered me twenty dollars a
month and my board, if I'd stay too. I did not let them know
how low I was in pocket, but kept a stiff upper lip, and made as
if I didn't care whether I worked or no. At length I told 'em if
they'd give me thirty dollars, I'd stay. So they agreed, and I got
enough to pay my passage home, buy a new suit of clothes at
Chicago, and leave a nest-egg in my pocket after all.
[6]
[6]
If Tom's yarn seems a tough one, I can only say it was taken down
from his own lips, and preserved as being characteristic of the habits of the
country.
When Tom had finished his recital he inquired in his turn as
to the course of things at home during their absence. He was
duly informed of the accession to our population and many other
interesting particulars. Brumbleback's account of the two new
belles was not very fascinating. The chunky one, said he,
is fixed off like a poppy-show, and never lets the draw-strings
out of her lips. T'other gal is likely enough, but the mother's a
blazer! Whoever marries Emmy, had better look out for his
ears. The mill-clack is nothing to the old woman's tongue.
Tom stayed at home long enough to clean his rifle and eat his
dinner, and then went out hunting to rest himself after his
journey
.
He was passing by a cranberry-marsh about half a mile
from the village, when he heard, quite near him, the sound of
feminine distress, loud and real. He dashed in among the
tangled
bushes, and found a young lady sticking in the half-frozen
mud. It was Miss Celestina Pye, and she certainly had no
draw-strings
in her lips just then. Tom observed afterwards, (with
less than his usual gallantry,) that nothing but a pig in a gate
ever beat her. He extricated her very ablya lamentable
figureher dress torn by the inconsiderate briers, and her prim
face unshaped by the agony of her terror. She had been
searching
for those choicest of cranberries which are found still on the
bushes after the winter is past. The water in which they chiefly
grow is often frozen over, deceptively enough, so that a plunge
is not unusual. But Miss Pye's eastern fears of rattlesnakes
were still in full force, and as soon as she found herself in the
marsh, she jumped to the conclusion that she was bitten to death
as a matter of course.
After her rescue occurred the difficulty of presenting such a
figure on her walk through the village. Here Tom's natural
politeness suggested a short cut, to facilitate which he took down
a part of the rail-fence and pointed out to the young lady a path
by which she might reach the back of her aunt's domain without
betraying her disaster to the public.
During all this, it is not to be supposed that Miss Celestina,
though her eyes were small and somewhat obscured by mud, had
not managed to perceive that her deliverer was a young man, a
stranger, and one whose splendid proportions and fine face would
have commanded notice any where. She looked through her
torn green veil and her multitudinous curl-papers (for she was
cranberrying incog.) at our hero's dark eyes, and found herself
very much in love, as was quite natural and proper under the
circumstances.
That evening at sunset Tom presented himself at Mrs. Purfle's
door with a buck nicely dressed, inquiring whether the lady
wished to purchase.
How much? asked Mrs. Purfle.
A dollar, said the hunter.
That's too much, observed Mrs. Purfle. It's more than
you ought to ask, young man, she said, very solemnly, and with
an air of reproof.
The deer weighed some sixty or seventy poundsperhaps more.
Tom moved onward.
Can you let me have half of it for fifty cents?
Never cut, said Tom, who seldom wasted words in such
cases.
Just then Miss Pye made her appearance. She was very
smart, and her head quivered with subdivided ringlets. When
she saw Tom with the venison at his feet, she took it for granted
that he had called to inquire after her health, and that the game
was an offering to her charms. What wonder that the
advancing
smile was a gracious one! Or what wonder that the corners
of her mouth took a downward curve when Tom flung his buck
upon his shoulder and walked off without looking at her!
Why, aunt! said Miss Teeny, dolefully, that's the very
one!
What one? said Mrs. Purfle.
Why the one that helped me out of the marsh! I dare say
he came to see me. If I had had my other frock on he would
have known me.
Now it was so well understood between Mrs. Purfle and her
niece that a
beau
for the latter, (technically speaking,) was the
one thing needful, that it was no longer ranked among subjects
debateable. There was nothing to be said about it, even by Mrs.
Purfle. So she stood and looked after Tom in silence, musing
upon the ill-timed thriftiness that had driven so fine a young man
from the vicinity of Miss Pye's attractions.
Teeny! she said at length, with her eyes still travelling
down the street.Teeny! it is a long while since you called
upon Emma Levering. Get your things, quick! and go down
there!
This speech began
moderato
, but the
crescendo
was so rapid
10
that the close was
prestissimo
. Miss Pye, following the direction
of her aunt's eye, saw that Tom had stopped at Mrs. Levering's,
and she lost not a breath in getting her bonnet.
At Mrs. Levering's gate stood Mrs. Levering herself, her cap
border blown back by the chill wind, and her tongue in full
activity
,
enlightening the young hunter's mind as to the true and
proper value of venison out here in the woods.
It costs you nothing at all, she said, but just the powder
and ball it takes to shoot 'em, and that can't be much, for
powder's
only six shillings a pound, and as for shot, you can put in
old buttons or any thing.
Tom was looking at the speaker with an eye that said as
plainly
as eye could speak, Have you almost done? But he waited,
for he was too civil to walk off while a lady was speaking, and it was
difficult to catch a moment when Mrs. Levering was
not
speaking.
Miss Pye, with the first breath she could command, asked for
Emma, and Mrs. Levering called her. Tom was taking the
opportunity
to move off, but ere he had shouldered his burthen he
caught sight of a face that charmed him to the spot. Had he
indeed
seen it before? Miss Teeny, scarce greeting Emma, turned
at once to the handsome hunter, and in her choicest terms thanked
him for his assistance in extricating her from her perilous situation.
Tom could with difficulty be induced to comprehend what she
meant, for it was not easy to recognize in the rainbow-tinted
speaker the muddy heroine of the morning. And then he seemed
to feel himself in a scrape, and to be puzzled for a suitable
reply to so much gratitude.
I thought I never
should
have got out! said Miss Teeny,
rolling up her little eyes with a pathetic expression of self-pity.
Oh! said Tom, I've got a cow out of there before now.
Tom meant simply that he had done a much more difficult
thing than the helping of a young lady out of the marshbut the
illustration was not fortunately chosen. Yet Miss Celestina
forbore
to notice the error, and only said very graciously that her
aunt would take the venison.
Vension! said Emma; oh, mother, poor Jack said he
thought he could eat some venison if he could get it.
He shall have it and welcome, said Tom, throwing the deer
saddlewise on the rail of the little porch, and turning away
quickly. In vain did the widow and Miss Teeny call after our
retreating hero. He barely raised his cap from his brow as he
passed, and then, clearing the ground with a hunter's stride,
disappeared
round the first corner, before the trio had recovered
from their astonishment.
Very odd! exclaimed Miss Celestina Pye, when aunt said
she would take it.
Odd, indeed! responded Mrs. Levering, when he wouldn't
look at anything less than a dollar just now!
Emma said nothing, but busied herself in preparing some of
the venison for her sick brother, with possibly an occasional
recollection of the gallant hunstman.
From the period of Tom's return from the expedition to the
Mississippi, all his friends remarked a change in his appearance
and habits. Not only was his dress more cared for, but his way
of living was essentially civilized; and his manner lost that tinge
of untameableness which had formerly characterized it. He
attended the singing-school regularly, and often escorted home
some of the fair ones who brightened these evening gatherings.
He never indeed went so far as to volunteer a call, but he would
sometimes accept an invitation to a tea party, though he generally
amused himself on such occasions by playing with the dog, or
with the baby if there was no dog. He was seldom caught
looking
at a young lady; but if he did look at any one, it was at
Miss Celestina Pye. She even thought that she had discovered
the costume which best pleased him, for he never looked at her
so much as when she was dressed in her buff calico with large
purple sprigs. So she used to put on this dress very frequently,
with a suitable accompaniment of thready curls and gay ribbons.
Emma Levering all this time, the mere drudge of the most
thrifty and exacting of mothers, was in a manner forgotten by
all. She was the only pretty girl in the village circle that Tom
Oliver never was seen to look at, although he was unceasing in
his attentions to her sick brother, whom he supplied with the
choicest game the woods afforded. Tom was an odd fellow,
and everybody but Miss Pye and Mrs. Purfle thought that he was
resolved to be an old bachelor.
About these days, Mrs. Purfle, who was of an active and
enterprising
turn of mind, and something of a diplomatist withal,
thought proper to give a large partyno unusual expedient to
enhance one's importance, and to make one's acquaintance
coveted. Everybody was invited and great preparation made,
though there was unfortunately no possibility of enlarging the
small parlour, nor any of the suite of apartments of which that
capped the climax. But if our good lady had been initiated into
the fashionable notion of a feed, she could not have provided
more bounteously for those who were to be squeezed within her
walls. Tom had a note of course; and he was further favoured
with a P. S., asking if he could as well as not provide Mrs.
Purfle with game for the occasion. What he sent would have
made the fortune of a city supper; and, in addition to this, there
were days' works of cake, and pies, and custards, not to speak of
an unspeakable variety of minor adjuncts. The very gathering
of the cups and saucers, and plates, and knives, and spoons, was
a serious business. In the country it is still customary to provide
for as many guests as you inviteanother proof that we are
behind the age.
Two o'clock came, and with it a good portion of the company.
Even from the neighbouring settlements whole wagon-loads were
imported, whose bustling Sunday clothes filled Mrs. Purfle's
yellow
parlour, borrowed chairs and all. At first the silence was
prodigious; then would be heard an occasional burst of giggle,
quickly smothered; but gradually rose a continuous hum, which
swelled ere long into an undistinguishable clatter, enlivened ever
and anon by such explosions of laughter as are heard only at the
West. During all this time Tom Oliver did not make his
appearance
.
It grew duskthree candles were lighted on the
mantelpiece
,
in front of a great many black profiles; the tea (secretly
put back) was at length madeMiss Pye's eyes were anything
but auspiciouswhen in came Tom, dressed in his Chicago suit,
and looking handsomer than ever. Oh, how the room brightened
in Miss Celestina's eyes! It was as if all three of the candles
had been snuffed at once!
Our bashful hero had scarcely time to cast a glance about him
(over the heads of most of the company) when he was called
upon by Mrs. Purfle to lead the way into the other room, as
the kitchen was modestly denominated. Tom had not ascertained
who was and who was not present, so he gave his hand, at a
venture
,
to Miss Polly Troome, the blacksmith's tall daughter,
gallantly
handing her to the long tea-table, and seating her opposite
to a promising bowl of apple-sauce. Other ladies were soon
seated, and when every corner of the board (and they were many,
since no two tables in the neighbourhood matched in size or
shape,) was filled, it became the duty of the beaux to play the
part of waiters, which devoir was performed with various grace
by the various youths concerned. A roast pig was to be carved
and a huge chicken-pie distributed; bowls of pickles, and plates
of hot biscuits were to be handed about; and, worse than all, a
ceaseless succession of cups of tea required all the skill and
discretion of the
preux chevaliers
. Some scalding there was, but
not serious; much pretty shrieking, and not a little unrefined
laughter. Miss Pye's new blue silk apron was the recipient of a
saucer of pudding; old Mrs. Spindle made her usual disparaging
remarks about the strength of tea, in an audible whisper; poor
little Brim was trodden upon and tumbled over by everybody
but upon the whole, the party presented the true party aspect,
saving and excepting some few conventional prejudices as to the
dress of the company and the nature of the refreshments.
But in the midst of the feast a blank occurredfelt more
particularly
by one of the gay assemblage, yet perceived by
numerous
others. Tom Oliver was missing. What could this mean?
Was he preparing something characteristically odd, to help along
the general hilarity? This was thought of, but conjectures died
away after a while, for the young hunter appeared no more.
The usual amusements went on; all sorts of forfeits were played
scorn and criminal, and whatever gives an excuse for
some little romping and kissing, but all was begun and finished
without Tom. This was like a sprinkling of cold water, for Tom
had become a general favourite with the young people.
But it is time to account for our hero. It had been whispered
about that Emma Levering could not come, on account of the
illness
of her brother, but no one thought of the circumstance in
connection with Tom's disappearance. Yet it was to the busy
widow's that he had gone from the gay assembly, and there, while
all was gayety at Mrs. Purfle's grand party, he was already
established
as a watcher for the night, while the weary family had gone
quietly to bed, trusting to his well-known reputation as a nurse.
This was the last thing his young companions would have
guessed
,
yet it was the most natural thing in the world for Tom to
think of. We hardly think that the fair face of Emma had any
share in originating the benevolent impulseat least there is no
testimony to this effectbut we doubt not there was a sympathy
for her overtasked condition. Tom was a practical man, and
Mrs. Levering's exactions were notorious. If he had but known
what pity is akin to, we think he might perhaps have eschewed
it; but Tom read no poetry.
This generosity, however, was like much that passes for such
it was at the cost of another. Tom cared nothing about the
party, but poor Miss Teeny felt that all her pains had been
thrown away, since the handsome hunter had slighted the
occasion
so cruelly. When she had heard what called him away, she
was disposed to be vexed with her unpretending neighbour; but
she very soon ascertained that Emma had been sent to bed
immediately
on Tom's arrival, so that they had scarcely even met.
So she was encouraged again, feeling sure that her own attractions
must be victorious in fair field. Much did she walk for her
health during that rainy spring, and numerous were the errands
which took her to Mrs. Brumbleback's, the way to whose house
lay directly past Tom's gate. Yet she found the huntsman very
hard to encourage. If he was standing by his door when she
passed, he was very apt to go in and shut it without waiting to
bow to her; and if he happened to be at his well, he would go on
drawing water without once turning his head. It was very odd
that he should be so bashful.
Tom's well was a model of a wellfor a new country we
mean. It was curbed at the top with a cut from a hollow
buttonwood
tree, about four feet in diameter on the inside, and perfectly
smooth, inside and out. This curb rested on a layer of plank
some two feet within the ground, and from this floor downward
the well was built of brick in the neatest manner, and the clear
water filled it almost to the platform. It was partly roofed over,
and provided with a great trough of white wood
au naturel
, well
befitting the beauty of the whole structure.
[7]
[7]
A well precisely similar to Tom's may be seen near the door of an inn,
some twelve miles west of Detroit, on the Grand River road.
This was an object of just pride to the owner, for it was the
work of his own hands, and he had been the fortunate finder of
the tree which had afforded curbs for several wells in the
neighbourhood
.
It was placed near his cottage under the shadow of
an elm which chanced to grow just in the right place.
To this well came Tom one afternoon just as the sun was
setting
,
driving a pair of two-year-olds, and singing very audibly
and in no bad taste, Some love to roam, which he had caught
from Mr. Russell's own lips as that vocalist passed, like a
musical meteor, through our far-away state. He was just
executing
A life in the woods for me! with an attempt at the
original cadenza, when he looked over his beautiful well-curb
and saw
Mercy on mewhat an exclamation, Tom! How would that
sound at the East?
It was Miss Celestina Pye, standing on the planks, and looking
upward with a piteous glance.
Oh, Mr. Oliver! I'm so scar't! I'm almost out of my
senses!
And in her distraction she adjusted her curls, and threw back
her green veil.
What's scar't you this time? said Tom, with odious
coolness
.
Why, I thought I heard a bull! I'm sure I thought I did;
and if you only knew how 'fraid I am of a bull! Aunt says I
ought never to walk out alone, I'm so timid!
I should think she was right, observed Tom, drily.
And now, continued Miss Celestina Pye, how I am to get
out of this placeI'm sure I don't know.
How did you get in?
Oh! I was so frightened, you see, that I climbed over that
low place by the trough. I'm afraid you'll have to lift me out!
I feel so very weak.
Wait a moment, said Tom; and Miss Pye waited a good
many moments, expecting the return of her squire. By and bye,
when she had begun to find the well rather chilly, she heard a
footstep.
Oh! here you are at last, said she.
Yes, here I be! answered Brumbleback's gruff voice, and
here's my ox-chain for you to climb up by, and he lowered the
ox-chain, looped, having the ends fastened outside. There!
you can climb up by that, easy enough! observed this squire of
dames; you needn't be afeared, for it would bear five ton.
But where's Mr. Oliver? asked the doleful Celestina.
He's off! he thought he heard something in the wheat field,
and he told me to help you out.
Miss Pye's walk homeward was not a pleasant one; she was a
little damp and dreadfully crestfallen; but Mrs. Purfle assured
her that she was certain Tom felt so he could not venture to
take her out, for fear of letting her down the well.
The oil of her aunt's flattery served once more to trim the
lamp of hope in Miss Teeny's heart; aunt had gone through it
all, and surely she ought to know. So Miss Pye refreshed her
array, and sat down to her knitting, Mrs. Purfle thinking it
probable
,
considering all things, that Tom would call.
Miss Teeny had picked up the lamp-wick with a pin several
times, and begun to yawn pretty frequently, when she heard
Tom's ringing laugh as he passed the window. He
was
coming,
after all!
Alas! he had only been to carry a brace of prairie-hens to
Jack Levering. Miss Celestina Pye put her curls in twenty-two
papers, and then went desperately to bed.
With the morning light, however, came a ray of mental
illumination
.
That song! the gallant hunter was fond of music!
Miss Teeny had something called a piano, which, though lacking
several important strings, still was capable of an atrocious noise
which passed with some for music. This had never yet been
brought to bear upon Tom; but the summer was coming and such a
resource must no longer be neglected. Among the poetical scraps
in Miss Pye's album was the following
Music hath charms to soothe the savage
beast
How much more then one who only hunted such animals! So
the tinkling torment was put in requisition, and Mons Meg
herself
could scarcely have been more noisy. Oh! come with
me! Meet me by moonlight! Leave me not! were the
pathetic adjurations which now arrested the attention of the
passers-by
;
but, as ill-luck would have it, just about that time Tom
got a habit of going to town by the back street. However, the
weather had now become pleasant, and Mrs. Purfle happening to
be in the garden at the time he usually passed, politely invited
him in, saying that Celestina had been tuning up the piano quite
nice. Tom could not refuse, and once in, he underwent the
whole without flinching. Miss Pye's voice was not exactly a
contralto
, indeed it was puzzling to determine the class; since
what there was of it was so strained and filtered through a very
small mouth, and a most miserably pinched nose, that it resembled
the chirping of a mouse in a cheese. But the accompaniment
was loud enough to make up for that. This was extemporaneous
entirely, but when she confined her bass to the key-note, she made
out pretty well for uninstructed ears. It was only when she
became
enthusiastic and branched out into involuntary chromatics,
that it grew absolutely unendurable. This pass had been nearly
attained when Tom asked for Fare thee well! This not
being
on Miss Teeny's list, he was about taking his leave when she
volunteered Faithless Emma. Tom sat down again, heard
the song through, asked a repetition, and then seized his cap
resolutely
.
Are you going to singing-school to night?
I
am, said Miss
Teeny, all in a breath.
I don't know whether I shall or no, said stony-hearted Tom,
and he bolted rather unceremoniously.
Well, I declare! said Mrs. Purfle, that fellow is the
hardest
to manage!
The fact is, that the tactics of Mrs. Purfle and Miss Pye ought
to have brought Tom down long before; but he was like
Wellington
at Waterloo, and did not know when he was beaten. He
must have borne a charmed life, to walk unharmed within
pointblank
range of such formidable artillery; but we are unable to
furnish our readers with the recipe. Gay's sweet ballad says,
Love
turns the balls that round me fly,
Lest precious tears should fall from Susan's eye.
But Tom had as yet paid Love no homage, and we well know
that wicked power does nothing for nothing. Our conjectures as
to Tom's safeguard point indeed toward that bewitching face
which his rifle had so nearly marred, but would a roving hunter
remember one look so long?
But Miss Pye's ammunition was not yet exhausted. The very
next Sunday saw her, laced almost to extinction, on her way to
meeting, arrayed in her most seducing paraphernalia, her face
white and her hands shining purple through their lace gloves,
from the energy with which she had striven to be delicate. She
had seen a belle faint in public at the East; she had observed
the solicitude of her attendant knight; and she did not know why
such things might not be done by some people as well as others.
So she took her seat on the women's side of the narrow passage
which divides the two rows of benches in our school-room,
determined
to find the vulnerable part in Tom's heart, if indeed there
was onewhich she began to doubt.
This mode of parting the rougher from the gentler sex in
public
,
prevails wherever seats are common propertythe why is not
so easy to determine. If designed to prevent stray thoughts, it is
quite a mistake, for by this arrangement eyes are left at full
liberty, nay, are placed under a sort of necessity for
encountering
.
If to secure attention to the speaker, it is still more
unfortunate
,
for the deadly cross-fire from the sides is far more
effective
than the scattering fire from the platform. But it suited Miss
Teeny's purpose, for it brought her face to face with her
indomitable
enemy.
She had done her work so effectually at home that there was
little to be done in meeting. The fainting had very nearly come
off in earnest, and her face began to look deadly blue very soon
after the commencement of the sermon. At length she fell back
on the desk before which she was sitting.
All was now confusion and dismay, for we are not accustomed
to such things. Mrs. Purfle bustled about, and called upon Mr.
Oliver to help her take her niece in the open air. But the minister,
with a solemn air of reproof, just then requested the congregation
to sit down, adding, in an authoritative and awful manner,
Deacon Grinderson! will you help that young woman out?
So poor Teeny was carried out, not very gracefully, by Deacon
Grinderson and a young clodpole whom he summoned to his aid;
and it required but very little water dashed in her face to bring
her to her senses, and particularly to the sense that it was no
go, as Tom would have said if he had understood the affair.
Now cut her binder, and she'll do, said Deacon Grinderson's
assistant, borrowing a figure from the wheat field, as was quite
natural, seeing that Miss Teeny's contour, exclusive of the
supplementary
bustle, was not unlike that of a stout sheaf. But
there was very little spirit in her just now.
We know not that Miss Teeny could ever have been inspired,
even by the powerful afflatus of her aunt's flattery, to make
another attempt at so inaccessible a heart; but, ere long, fate
threw in her way an opportunity which skill could scarcely have
commanded. She had succeeded in reducing herself by sighing,
pickles, and silk braid, to something nearer a sentimental outline,
when our part of the country was enlightened by a visit from a
nephew of Dr. Purfle's, whom his lady had known at the South
a decided genius, and one of the universal kind. This
individual
had had the misfortune to lose both his feet by exposure at
the North, and he would have been at his wits' end for a living
if those wits had been only as comprehensive as the wits of
common
people. But he managed to live very much at his ease,
having a man to wait on him and supply the only deficiency of
which he had ever been conscious. Mr. Ashdod Cockles came
among us in the character of an artist, having his wagon loaded
with wax-figures, puppets, magic-lanterns, and all those
temptations
which the pockets of western people, lank as they are,
always find irresistibleincluding a hand-organ of course; and
he put up at Mrs. Purfle's.
Most exhilarating were the preparations, which now filled
everybody's
mouth. The village ball-room was to be the scene of
the grand exhibition of Mr. Cockles' glory; and the stairs which
led to that honoured chamber were well worn during that day of
ceaseless bustle and excitement. Not that the common eye was
permitted to get even a glimpse of the mysteries within, for a
thick curtain was suspended inside, so that the assistants could
pass in and out a hundred times without one's getting a single
peep. But the boys and idlers still thought they
should
see
something
;
so there they stayed from morning till nightscarcely
taking time to eat.
But while all promised so fair for the multitude, what was the
surprise and grief of Mr. Ashdod Cockles to find that one of his
wax figures, nay, the one of all others that he could worst spare,
had been completely crushed by the superincumbent weight of
the hand-organ. The Sleeping Beauty! That
she
should have
been lost! What is a wax-work without a Sleeping Beauty!
Dire was the disappointment of Mr. Cockles, and loud his
lamentations
,
(in private,) and much did he try to make his
factotum
acknowledge that he had erred in the packing. Nick
knew his business too well for that; but he nevertheless
condescended
to suggest a remedyviz.: that Mr. Cockles should
induce
some pretty girl of the village to be dressed in the glittering
drapery of the crushed nymph, and perform the part for that
night only. This seemed the more feasible that the figure was
to be covered up in bed, and the performance would thus involve
no fatigue. So it only remained to obtain the handsome face,
and touching this delicate point Mr. Cockles consulted Mrs.
Purfle.
Miss Emmy's the prettiest! said Brim, who stood by
grinning
from ear to ear.
Get out, Brim! said Mrs. Purfle, accompanying the hint
with a resounding box on the ear; get out! you're a fool!
Then turning to the artist with a bland smile, she
communicated
to him in a whisper her belief that Celestina would undertake
the part, if she was properly requested.
Ahem! said Mr. Ashdod Cockles, who was troubled with a
cold; ahem! yes, ma'ambut it would be asking quite too
much of your niece. I think we had better
Not at all, not at all! insisted the lady; Teeny is so
obliging she'll not think anything of it. I'll ask her at once.
But, persisted Mr. Cockles, fidgeting a good deal, she is
really quite too short for the character. A taller figure
Oh! you forget she is to be conveyed under the quilt! I'll
manage all that, said the zealous diplomatist, I'll dress her,
and everything.
And she left the room and returned in a very short time with
Miss Pye's unhesitating consent. So Mr. Cockles could not but
be very much obliged; and Mrs. Purfle, in the highest spirits,
sent Brim off at once to Mr. Oliver's, to tell him he must be sure
to come to the exhibition. And Brim, she added, if you tell
him a word about you know what, I'll skin ye! A favourite
figure of speech of Mrs. Purfle's.
What exhibition? said Tom, who had but just returned
from the woods.
Oh, every thing in the world! said Brim, who was as much
excited as any body; and Miss Teeny but here he thought
of his skin, and no persuasions of Tom could extort another word
on that point, though he was fluent on the main subject.
The evening came at last, and the weather chanced to be
pleasanter than it generally is on great occasions. The
ball-room
was elegantly fitted up with suspended crosses of wood stuck
with tallow candles,rather drippy, but you must keep out of their
way,(I have seen gentlemen's coats completely iced with
spermaceti
,
which, if more genteel, is also more destructive.) Instead
of glass cases, a screen or medium of dark-coloured gauze was
interposed between the eye and the wax figures, in order to
produce
the requisite illusion. The puppets and the magic-lantern
came first in order, and so great was the delight of the spectators
that it would seem that any after-show must have been an
anti-climax
;
but the experienced Mr. Cockles knew better. It was
not until all this was done, that he ordered Nick to draw aside
the baize which had veiled the grand attraction. Great clapping
and rapping ensued, and it was some time before Mr. Cockles
could venture to begin, this being a part of the exhibition in which
he expected to shine personally.
This, ladies and gentlemen, he began, at the upper end of
the room, this is the New Orleans beauty; she was engaged
to be married to two gentlemen at once, and to avoid the torments
of jealousy, they settled it between 'em, and first shot her and
then each other through the heart! and they're all buried in one
tomb; and I should have had the tomb too, only it was rather
heavy to carry.
Every body crowded to this interesting sight.
This, continued the exhibiter, in a high-toned and theatrical
voice, waving at the same time a gilded wand, which excited
much admiration, is the celebrated Miss M`Crea and her
murderers
,
from likenesses taken on the spot by an eye-witness.
A shudder ran through the throng at this announcement, and
the grinning Indians were closely scrutinized, and the fierceness
and many evil qualities of their race commented on in an under
tone.
Here is a revolutionary character, ladies and gentlemen,
Mr. Cockles went on, as his familiar edged him along on his
wheel-chair; and he pointed to a stumpy old man in a blue coat
faced with red, who brandished a wooden sword as high as the
ceiling would allow.
This was one of my forefathers, observed the orator, with
no little swell; my great-great-grandfather, or some such
relation
.
He was a man by the name of Horatio Cockles, that cut
away the bridge at Rome just as the British was coming across
it. You've all heard of Rome, I suppose?
A murmur of assent went round; and one man observed, I
was born and brought up within five
mile
of it, but I never heard
tell o' that 'ere feller!
Ay, yes! maybe not, said Mr. Cockles, quite undisturbed,
but do you understand history?
The objector was posed, and the orator proceeded.
This is Lay Fyett, and this is Bonypart, with a man's head
that he has just cut off with his sword. He used to do that
whenever
he got mad.
A shudder, with various exclamations.
But here, said Mr. Cockles, drawing aside with a
flourishing
air, a mysterious-looking curtain, which had excited a good
deal of curiosity during the evening, this here is the Sleeping
Beauty. Her infant daughter got broke a-coming.
And there lay a female figure, in whose well-rouged cheeks
and dyed ringlets no one recognized the heiress of Mrs. Purfle's
worldly substance. Even the eyebrows, which nature had left
white, were entirely altered by the experienced skill of the artist,
who had felt himself at liberty to put them on where he thought
they would look best, the original ones being invisible by
candlelight
.
A very elegant cap, full trimmed with artificial flowers,
had been arranged by Mrs. Purfle; and the sky-blue pillow
fringed with gold, and the purple quilt which belonged to the
character, made altogether a very magnificent affair, though Mr.
Ashdod Cockles had not thought it prudent to suspend more than
a single candle within the chintz curtains and the gauze blind.
Just as the concealing screen had been withdrawn, and while
a buzz of admiration was still in circulation, Tom Oliver, who
had been in no haste to obey Mrs. Purfle's hint, made his way
into the room. He took a momentary glance at the attractions
which lined the walls, and then sought the object which now fixed
the eager crowd. It took a good look to satisfy him; but with
the help of Brim's hint and certain potent recollections, the truth
came upon him at once; and with a very audible pshaw! he
turned on his heel and made for the door. The string by which
the Sleeping Beauty's candle was suspended passing along near
the ceiling, caught Tom's cap in his hasty retreat, and ruin
ensued
.
In an instant Miss Teeny's gay head-dress was all in a
blaze, and one whole side of her curls was burnt off before the
cruel flames could be smothered. Tom was among the most
active
in endeavouring to repair the mischief he had done, and then,
much mortified, darted out of the room. As his evil stars must
have decreed, he met Emma Levering at the top of the stairs,
and if ours were of the fashionable single-flight order, broken
bones would have certainly ensued. But most fortunately there
was a saving platform, which received Tom and his victim, in
time to prevent so serious a catastrophe. As it was, however,
the pretty Emma was a good deal hurt, and to Tom's eager
questions
she could only answer with a burst of tears. So Tom,
without
ceremony, caught her up in his arms, and ran with her to her
mother's, which was not far distant; and then, after more
apologies
than he ever made before in the whole course of his life,
he took his leave, and hid his head beneath his own roof.
Before Emma's bruises got well, it was all over with Tom.
The barriers about his heart seemed to have been fractured by
the fall; and Cupid is not slow in making the most of such
advantages
.
Tom Oliver forgot to hunt, but occupied his time
instead
,
in building an addition to his house, and putting a new fence
about his door-yard. What arguments he may have found
necessary
to overcome Emma's resentment against him, we are not
informed; but we are assured that it was not until he was obliged
to own she had wounded his heart that he mustered courage to
tell her that he came very near being beforehand with her, away
off in Jefferson County. The fact of their betrothment became
known in due time by the lamentations of Mrs. Levering, who
thought it very unkind in Emma to be willing to leave her for
any body else. Few of the neighbours could conscientiously
agree with her in this view of Emma's choice. Most people
thought it very natural; and Emma succeeded in reconciling her
mother to the change by the suggestion that Tom could fill the
place which Jack's ill-health prevented him from taking.
Miss Pye's ringlets were a long time growing, during which
interval she remained much at home, in rather low spirits.
Emma
is benevolently waiting until the fair Celestina is presentable,
in order that she may stand bridesmaid, at her own urgent
request
.
Mrs. Purfle is understood to have been so much
discouraged
by the ill success of her efforts in behalf of her niece,
that she declares it her fixed determination to let her take her
chance in future. This resolve, if adhered to, gives hopes that
history may yet record a happy termination of all Miss Pye's
anxieties; since, whether in town or country, no labour is more
apt to defeat itself than that which has for its object the
acquisition
of the grand desideratuma husband.
OLD THOUGHTS ON THE NEW YEAR.
Il
mondo invecchia
E invecchiando intristisce.
Tasso's Aminta
.
The world is growing older
And wiser day by day:
Every body knows beforehand
What you're going to say!
We used to laugh and frolic;
Now we must behave!
Poor old Fun is dead and buried
Pride dug his grave.
Free Translation
.
There
are doubtless many new things to be said about the
New Year, if one had wit enough to think of them; but an' if
it be not so, may we not think over our last year's thoughts, or
those which pleased us ten years ago? It is certain that
Providence
sends us this holiday season, with all its stirring influences,
once every year; and doubtless intends it should be enjoyed by
thousands who never had an original thought in their lives. So
we will write down our roving fancies as they rise, and leave
them to be woven into the fire-light reveries of just such
comfortable
people.
What does `holiday' mean, George? said we once to a
shouting urchin of some seven years standing, as he was tossing
up his cap and huzzaing at the thought of a vacation. What
does `holiday' mean?
He stopped, looked serious, and then replied
WhyI don't knowbutI always thought it was because
the boys holla so when they are let out of school.
We predicted on the spot that George would write a dictionary
11
if he lived long enough. A decidedly etymological genius, and
quite original; for he owed but little to books, to our certain
knowledge.
We cannot hope to make as lucky a guess on the origin of the
New Year festival; but we will venture to say, nothing could be
more natural than the disposition to observe this way-mark on
life's swift-rolling course. In proof of this, the practice of
noticing
anniversaries has prevailed from the earliest times. It is only
in these wondrously wise days, that the notion has arisen that it
is being too minute and vulgar to recognize occasions so revered
by our fathers:
We take no note of time save by its loss,
in another sense than that of the poet. We are disposed to cut
holidays, as we do other antiquated worthies. Then again the
young and gay, in the levity of their hearts, think it tedious to
mingle with their joyance any touch of old-time remembrances.
We admit that the New Year, though a season for placid and
hopeful smiles, is scarcely one for laughter; yet we might (under
privilege of our gravity,) inquire whether an element of sobriety
may not sometimes be profitable, even in our pleasure. The
bereaved
and sorrowful tell us that the habit of commemorating
particular days only makes more striking the chill blanks in the
social circle; pointing out the vacant chair; recalling the
missing
voice, already but too keenly remembered. This is true;
but while sorrow is yet new and fresh, what is there that does
not
bring up the beloved? And after the great Consoler has
done his blessed office, and grief is mellowed into sadness, do we
not attach a double value to whatever awakens most vividly the
cherished memory?
Gifts and keepsakes and little surprises used to be a pretty part
of the holiday season; and in Europe the New Year is still the
time of all others for
cadeaux
, and
souvenirs
, and
gages d'amiti
,
and
gages d'amour
. But the increase of luxury and the
cultivation
of pride have almost spoiled all these pleasant things for us.
I fear we have leavened such matters with the commercial spirit.
Presents are made a sort of traffic, or a device of ostentation.
When emulation begins, sentiment is lost. The moment we
admit
the idea that our generosity or our splendour will attract
admiration
;
the moment we think that our friend, if poor, will
receive
our new-year gift as payment for some past kindness, or, if
rich, that he will be sure to give something still more elegant in
return, the present is degraded into an article of merchandise.
Indeed, costliness is no proper element of a mere present, since a
symbol is all we want.
In England the celebration of New Year is almost lost in that
of Christmas, which is a high and universal festival; whether
kept exactly in accordance with its true meaning and intent we
shall not here stop to inquire. Be this as it may, its approach
arouses the fast-anchor'd isle to its very heart. Even
threadbare
court-gaiety receives an accession of something like sentient
life; and maids of honour new furbish their languid smiles, and
gentlemen-in-waiting pocket their scented 'kerchiefs, no longer
needed to veil inadmissible yawns. If high life brighten, how
much more the common folk, always so wisely ready to be
pleased! The housekeeper spends her evenings for six weeks
stoning plums in preparation for prelatic mince-pies and
national
puddings. Huge sirloins of beef jostle at the corners of the
streets. The confectioner gives an additional touch of
enchantment
to his sparkling paradise, which needed not this to make it
irresistible to the longing eyes that linger round it, unconsciously
endowing each individual temptation with the dazzling beauty
of the whole, and so really coveting all, though wishing only for
a modest portion. Christmas taxes all the invention of all the
artists in Pleasure's train for the production of novelties and
excellences
in their several departments, and as there is not time
for a renewal of energy before New Year, they blend the two
occasions, and rejoice double tides. Even the poet, though not
always in the way when money is to be made, finds his services
now in request, and enjoys the farther delight of hearing his
darling
verses chanted by the far-sounding throat of the street-singer:
true fame this, and not posthumous, like that of most poets.
Verses like those which follow, married to airs well deserving
such union, awaken the Queen's subjects earlier than they like
on Christmas morning:
The moon shines bright
And the stars give a light
A little before 'tis day,
And bid us awake and pray.
Awake! awake! good people all!
Awake and you shall hear...
The life of Man
Is but a span,
And cut down in his flower.
We're here to-day and gone to-morrow;
We're all dead in an hour.
O teach well your children, men,
The while that you are here;
It will be better for your souls
When your corpse lie on the bier.
To-day you may be alive, dear man,
With many a thousand pound;
To-morrow you may be dead, dear man,
And your corpse laid under ground;
With a turf at your head, dear man,
And another at your feet;
Your good deeds and your bad ones
They will together meet.
God bless the ruler of this house
And send him long to reign;
And many a happy Christmas
May he live to see again.
My song is done, I must be gone;
I can stay no longer here;
God bless you all, both great and small,
And send you a jovial New Year.
So runs a Christmas carol, entitled Divine Mirth, bought
in the streets of London not many years ago. But we are like
our transatlantic neighboursletting Christmas swallow up New
Year. To return from these specimens of English poetry.
We
Knickerbockers
date our New-Year festivities from our
honoured Dutch progenitors; and it should be considered treasor
even to propose the discontinuance of such time-honoured
commemorations
.
Among the innovations of the day, few try our
patience more severely than those pseudo-refinements upon
pleasure
,
which have been devised by the little great and the meanly
proud of our land, who in their agonizing efforts after a superiority
to which neither nature nor education has given them a claim,
hesitate not to sacrifice much for which they will never offer an
equivalent to society. An adherence to ancient usages belongs
to those who are accustomed to the enjoyments of wealth, and
covet the heightening power of association; who feel their
position
to be secure, and therefore enjoy it with dignity, and make
no feverish efforts at display. These still keep up the social
round on the first day of the year, with its cordial greeting, its
hospitable welcome, and its whole-souled
abandon
, symbolical at
least of a forgetting of all causes of feud, and a renewing of
ancient
good-will, however interrupted. There is a primitive relish
about these things to those who understand them; but to the
merely fashionable, who think only of the quantity of plate which
it is possible to exhibit on the occasion, the splendour and
costliness
of the refreshments, and above all, the number of
stylish
names which may be enrolled among the hundreds of unmeaning
visiters, it is
caviare
indeed. Their spirit is a profane one; it
fancies that money will buy every thing.
We would not insist upon the full adherence to primitive
customs
;
since that would include rather more stimulus than accords
with our notions of propriety; and we have heard too that the
Knickerbocker
practice of presenting each guest with a
shieldlike
cookie, though an excellent one for the bakers, was wont to
prove rather inconvenient to some thorough-going visiters, who
were in danger of meeting with the fate of the damsel of old,
who was crushed under the weight of gifts somewhat similar.
Tradition informs us that the Dutch Dominies, who were especial
favourites, used to be obliged to leave whole pyramids of splendid
cookiessuns, moons, General Washington, Santa-Claus, and all
at the houses of tried friends, to be sent for next morning. We
would not ask so minute an observance of the customs of
Nieuw-Amsterdam
,
but we plead for the main point, the festival, with
the hearty, social feeling that gives value to it. This may be
unfashionable in some quarters, but it is human, and gives
occasion
for one of the too few recognitions of a common nature and
a common interest. But, strange power of fancy! here we are
carried back to all the bustle and excitement of a New-Year's
day in the city. What a contrast to the realities around us!
This bright, soft-singing wood fire, crackling occasionally with
that mysterious sound which the good vrouws call treading
snow, and which they hold to foretell sleighing; the cat coiled
up cozily on the hearth-rug, fast asleep; even the sounds which
but just reach the ear when the ground is dry and bare, now
hushed by the thick covering of snow out of doors; now and
then a low, black sled moving silently along the road; and still
more seldom a solitary foot-passenger, with his rifle or his axe
on his shoulder; how can we imagine to ourselves the thronging
crowds that make the very stones resound under the thousand
vehicles
and quick trampling feet in the great thoroughfares? Not
Imagination but Memory lends her aid in this instance; Memory,
never more faithful than when she recalls to the emigrant the
home-scenes of former days. Yet we ought hardly to call her
faithful, for she always reverses rules in her pictures, placing her
brightest tints in the back-ground. Brilliant lights, with only
shadow enough to bring them out, characterize her distant views,
and this is no true perspective, though we are prone to put faith
in it. We must not use such views for
studies
.
Far removed from all the pleasurable associations of this period,
we too hail the New Year, but not with the old feeling. We wish
each other a happy new year as usual, but there is a touch
of sadness in our greeting. Our new homes have not yet the
warmth of the old; there is a chill hanging about them still,
especially at these seasons when we recall the warm grasp of
early friends. The young only are thoroughly gay here. They
dwell not on the past; they trouble not their heads about the
future. They have an ever-welling fount of happiness within;
while we, their elders, are compelled to dig deep, and sometimes
even then strike no vein. To them, sport in the wilds is as good
as sport any where else. They skate, they slide, they run races;
they take the hill-side with their rough, home-made sleds, and
they ask nothing better. This for the younger scions. Those a
step more advanced, get up shooting-matches, or dancing-matches;
pleasure on a more dignified scale. We will not describe that
vile form of the shooting-match, wherein a poor turkey is tied to
a post, to be mangled in cold blood by the boobies of the
neighbourhood
;
those who never fired a shot in their lives taking the lead; as
when a number of lawyers are to speak on the same side, those
who are not expected to hit at all are placed first. This is a cruel,
unmanly, un-western sport, and should be scorned by the forester.
He has been driven to it by the unnatural lack of all decent and
proper amusement. The true shooting-match, when conducted
on the large scale, affords famous sport. Two parties, matched
and balanced as nearly as may be in skill and numbers, and each
commanded by a leader chosen on account of his general
qualifications
,
social as well as sporting, set out at break of day, in
different directions; it makes but little difference which way,
since game is plenty at all points. A time and place of
rendezvous
are appointed, and certain kinds of game prescribed as
within the rules; and each party, collectively or severally, as
circumstances may require, makes as wide a search as time will
allow, and brings down as many deer, partridges, quails, etc., as
possible; horses being in attendance to bear home the fortune of
the day. At the place appointed the whole is examined, counted
and judged, according to the rules and rates agreed on, and
umpires then award the palm of victory. To the victors belong
the spoils of course; so the vanquished furnish the evening's
entertainment, except that the game is common property. This
makes no contemptible New Year's day for the young men; and
choice game is not despised as the substantial part of the supper
which succeeds or rather divides what we mentioned awhile ago
a dancing-match.
This, we should think, must be more laborious even than the
shooting-match; at least it is more like steady, serious,
unremitting
work. Two in the afternoon is not too soon to begin, nor six
in the morning too late to finish. Now if this be not a trial of
strength, what is? It proves so; for only the most resolute hold
out through the whole time. Even they would doubtless flag
were it not for the supper at which we have hinted above, of
which (to their honour be it spoken) our rustic damsels are not
too affected to be willing to partake with good will and without
mincing. They dance the old year out and the new year in,
sometimes; but usually the ball closes the sports of New-Year's
day, and you may see them as the sun is rising on the second
day of the year, sleigh-load after sleigh-load, going home as
merry as larks, under the care of their stout beaux, not half so
tired as a city belle is after walking through a cotillon.
Sometimes the snow is so fine that a grand sleigh-ride takes the
place of the grand hunt on this day. As many as possible are
engaged, and they go off some fifteen or twenty or thirty miles,
with as many strings of bells as can be raised for the occasion,
and have an impromptu supper and dance, and return home by
moonlight. One indispensable condition of such a party is an
exact
pairingan Adam and Eve division of the company; so that
if a single nymph or swain be missing before the day arrives, and
no one is found to supply the vacancy, the counterpart shares the
misfortune, and remains at home. We have known companies
where an approach to this rulea belle to every beauwould
have been convenient, and saved some sour looks. Here it is all
in good faith, and the appropriation very strict, for the time being;
and particular attention or graciousness to more than one of the
party is contrary to etiquette. The pairs speak of each other as
my mate, with all the gravity imaginable.
After all, these are the people who taste the true sweets of
pleasure, strictly so called. They enjoy themselves freely and
heartily, caring nothing for what those very dignified and rather
dull people who call themselves the world may think of their
dress or their dancing. It would not give them a moment's
concern
to be told that people a hundred miles off thought them half
savages. And nothing would be so odious to them as the
ceremony
,
the constraint, the clatter, and the stupidity of many an
unmeaning fashionable party. They would hardly believe you
if you should tell them that people really do get together at great
cost and trouble to look at each other's dresses and a decorated
supper-table, and go home again. What! no music! no
dancing
!
no nothing! Awful! I'd ruther spin wool all day!
To those of us who have done with all these things; whose
dancing days are over, and who are studying the difficult art
of growing old gracefully, the coming of another year brings
reflection, if not sadness. What shadows we are, and what
shadows we pursue! Who can stand upon the verge of another
era, without emotion? Who does not feel, as this change passes
before him, something of the awe that thrilled the veins of him who
saw an image but could not discern the form thereof?
How little can we guess of this turning leaf in our destiny! If
the heart be light, we read on the dim scroll words of soft and
sweet promise, traced by the ready fingers of Hope. If there be
a cloud on the spirit, we can discern only characters gloomy as
any that remain of memory's writing; while perhaps that Eye
from which nothing is hidden, sees Death sweeping with his dark
wing all that fond imagination had presented to our view, leaving
our part in this life's future, one chill blank. Blessed be God that
our eyes are holden! To
Him
who has controlled the past in
love and mercy, we may safely commit the future.
THE SCHOOLMASTER'S PROGRESS.
Master William Horner
came to our village to keep school
when he was about eighteen years old: tall, lank, straight-sided,
and straight-haired, with a mouth of the most puckered and
solemn
kind. His figure and movements were those of a puppet
cut out of shingle and jerked by a string; and his address
corresponded
very well with his appearance. Never did that prim
mouth give way before a laugh. A faint and misty smile was
the widest departure from its propriety, and this unaccustomed
disturbance made wrinkles in the flat skinny cheeks like those in
the surface of a lake, after the intrusion of a stone. Master
Horner
knew well what belonged to the pedagogical character, and
that facial solemnity stood high on the list of indispensable
qualifications
.
He had made up his mind before he left his father's
house how he would look during the term. He had not planned
any smiles, (knowing that he must board round), and it was
not for ordinary occurrences to alter his arrangements; so that
when he was betrayed into a relaxation of the muscles, it was
in such a sort as if he was putting his bread and butter in
jeopardy.
Truly he had a grave time that first winter. The rod of
power was new to him, and he felt it his duty to use it more
frequently than might have been thought necessary by those upon
whose sense the privilege had palled. Tears and sulky faces,
and impotent fists doubled fiercely when his back was turned,
were the rewards of his conscientiousness; and the boysand
girls toowere glad when working time came round again, and
the master went home to help his father on the farm.
But with the autumn came Master Horner again, dropping
among us as quietly as the faded leaves, and awakening at least
as much serious reflection. Would he be as self-sacrificing as
before, postponing his own ease and comfort to the public good?
or would he have become more sedentary, and less fond of
circumambulating
the school-room with a switch over his shoulder?
Many were fain to hope he might have learned to smoke during
the summer, an accomplishment which would probably have
moderated his energy not a little, and disposed him rather to
reverie than to action. But here he was, and all the
broader-chested
and stouter-armed for his labours in the harvest-field.
Let it not be supposed that Master Horner was of a cruel and
ogrish naturea babe-eatera Herodone who delighted in
torturing the helpless. Such souls there may be, among those
endowed with the awful control of the ferule, but they are rare
in the fresh and natural regions we describe. It is, we believe,
where young gentlemen are to be crammed for college, that the
process of hardening heart and skin together goes on most
vigorously
.
Yet among the uneducated there is so high a respect for
bodily strength, that it is necessary for the schoolmaster to show,
first of all, that he possesses this inamissible requisite for his place.
The rest is more readily taken for granted. Brains he
may
have
a strong arm he
must
have: so he proves the more important
claim first. We must therefore make all due allowance for
Master
Horner, who could not be expected to overtop his position so
far as to discern at once the philosophy of teaching.
He was sadly brow-beaten during his first term of service by
a great broad-shouldered lout of some eighteen years or so, who
thought he needed a little more schooling, but at the same
time felt quite competent to direct the manner and measure of his
attempts.
You'd ought to begin with large-hand, Joshuay, said Master
Horner to this youth.
What should I want coarse-hand for? said the disciple, with
great contempt; coarse-hand won't never do me no good. I
want a fine-hand copy.
The master looked at the infant giant, and did as he wished,
but we say not with what secret resolutions.
At another time, Master Horner, having had a hint from some
one more knowing than himself, proposed to his elder scholars to
write after dictation, expatiating at the same time quite floridly,
(the ideas having been supplied by the knowing friend,) upon the
advantages likely to arise from this practice, and saying, among
other things,
It will help you, when you write letters, to spell the words
good.
Pooh! said Joshua, spellin' ain't nothin'; let them that
finds the mistakes correct 'em. I'm for every one's havin' a
way of their own.
[8]
[8]
Verbatim.
How dared you be so saucy to the master? asked one of
the little boys, after school.
Because I could lick him, easy, said the hopeful Joshua,
who knew very well why the master did not undertake him on
the spot.
Can we wonder that Master Horner determined to make his
empire good as far as it went?
A new examination was required on the entrance into a second
term, and, with whatever secret trepidation, the master was obliged
to submit. Our law prescribes examinations, but forgets to
provide
for the competency of the examiners; so that few better
farces offer, than the course of question and answer on these
occasions
.
We know not precisely what were Master Horner's
trials; but we have heard of a sharp dispute between the
inspectors
whether angel spelt
angle
or
angel
.
Angle
had it, and
the school maintained that pronunciation ever after. Master
Horner passed, and he was requested to draw up the certificate
for the inspectors to sign, as one had left his spectacles at home,
and the other had a bad cold, so that it was not convenient for
either to write more than his name. Master Horner's exhibition
of learning on this occasion did not reach us, but we know that
it must have been considerable, since he stood the ordeal.
What is Orthography? said an inspecter once, in our
presence
.
The candidate writhed a good deal, studied the beams overhead
and the chickens out of the window, and then replied,
It is so long since I learnt the first part of the spelling-book,
that I can't justly answer that question. But if I could just look
it over, I guess I could.
Our schoolmaster entered upon his second term with new
courage
and invigorated authority. Twice certified, who should dare
doubt his competency? Even Joshua was civil, and lesser louts
of course obsequious; though the girls took more liberties; for
they feel even at that early age, that influence is stronger than
strength.
Could a young schoolmaster think of feruling a girl with her
hair in ringlets and a gold ring on her finger? Impossibleand
the immunity extended to all the little sisters and cousins; and
there were enough large girls to protect all the feminine part of
the school. With the boys Master Horner still had many a
battle
,
and whether with a view to this, or as an economical
ruse
,
he never wore his coat in school, saying it was too warm.
Perhaps
it was an astute attention to the prejudices of his
employers
,
who love no man that does not earn his living by the sweat
of his brow. The shirt-sleeves gave the idea of a manual-labour
school in one sense at least. It was evident that the master
worked, and that afforded a probability that the scholars worked
too.
Master Horner's success was most triumphant that winter. A
year's growth had improved his outward man exceedingly, filling
out the limbs so that they did not remind you so forcibly of a
young colt's, and supplying the cheeks with the flesh and blood
so necessary where moustaches were not worn. Experience had
given him a degree of confidence, and confidence gave him
power. In short, people said the master had waked up; and so
he had. He actually set about reading for improvement; and
although at the end of the term he could not quite make out from
his historical studies which side Hannibal was on, yet this is
readily
explained by the fact that he boarded round, and was
obliged
to read generally by firelight, surrounded by ungoverned
children
.
After this, Master Horner made his own bargain. When
school-time came round with the following autumn, and the
teacher
presented himself for a third examination, such a test was
pronounced
no longer necessary; and the district consented to
engage
him at the astounding rate of sixteen dollars a month, with
the understanding that he was to have a fixed home, provided he
was willing to allow a dollar a week for it. Master Horner
bethought
him of the successive killing-times, and consequent
dough-nuts of the twenty families in which he had sojourned the
years before, and consented to the exaction.
Behold our friend now as high as district teacher can ever hope
to behis scholarship established, his home stationary and not
revolving, and the good behaviour of the community insured by
the fact that he, being of age, had now a farm to retire upon in
case of any disgust.
Master Horner was at once the pre-eminent beau of the
neighbourhood
,
spite of the prejudice against learning. He brushed
his hair straight up in front, and wore a sky-blue riband for a
guard to his silver watch, and walked as if the tall heels of his
blunt boots were egg-shells and not leather. Yet he was far from
neglecting the duties of his place. He was beau only on
Sundays
and holidays; very schoolmaster the rest of the time.
It was at a spelling-school that Master Horner first met the
educated eyes of Miss Harriet Bangle, a young lady visiting the
Engleharts in our neighbourhood. She was from one of the
towns in Western New York, and had brought with her a
variety
of city airs and graces somewhat caricatured, set off with
year-old French fashions much travestied. Whether she had been
sent out to the new country to try, somewhat late, a rustic chance
for an establishment, or whether her company had been found
rather trying at home, we cannot say. The view which she was
at some pains to make understood was, that her friends had
contrived
this method of keeping her out of the way of a desperate
lover whose addresses were not acceptable to them.
If it should seem surprising that so high-bred a visiter should
be sojourning in the wild woods, it must be remembered that more
than one celebrated Englishman and not a few distinguished
Americans have farmer brothers in the western country, no whit
less rustic in their exterior and manner of life than the plainest
of their neighbours. When these are visited by their refined
kinsfolk, we of the woods catch glimpses of the gay world, or
think we do.
That great medicine hath
With its tinct gilded
many a vulgarism to the satisfaction of wiser heads than ours.
Miss Bangle's manner bespoke for her that high consideration
which she felt to be her due. Yet she condescended to be amused
by the rustics and their awkward attempts at gaiety and
elegance
;
and, to say truth, few of the village merry-makings
escaped
her, though she wore always the air of great superiority.
The spelling-school is one of the ordinary winter amusements
in the country. It occurs once in a fortnight, or so, and has
power to draw out all the young people for miles round, arrayed
in their best clothes and their holiday behaviour. When all is
ready, umpires are elected, and after these have taken the
distinguished
place usually occupied by the teacher, the young people
of the school choose the two best scholars to head the opposing
classes. These leaders choose their followers from the mass, each
calling a name in turn, until all the spellers are ranked on one
side or the other, lining the sides of the room, and all standing.
The schoolmaster, standing too, takes his spelling-book, and gives
a placid yet awe-inspiring look along the ranks, remarking that
he intends to be very impartial, and that he shall give out nothing
that is not in the spelling-book
. For the first half hour or so he
chooses common and easy words, that the spirit of the evening
may not be damped by the too early thinning of the classes.
When a word is missed, the blunderer has to sit down, and be a
spectator only for the rest of the evening. At certain intervals,
some of the best speakers mount the platform, and speak a
piece, which is generally as declamatory as possible.
The excitement of this scene is equal to that afforded by any
city spectacle whatever; and towards the close of the evening,
when difficult and unusual words are chosen to confound the
small number who still keep the floor, it becomes scarcely less
than painful. When perhaps only one or two remain to be
puzzled, the master, weary at last of his task, though a favourite
one, tries by tricks to put down those whom he cannot overcome
in fair fight. If among all the curious, useless, unheard-of words
which may be picked out of the spelling-book, he cannot find
one which the scholars have not noticed, he gets the last head
down by some quip or catch. Bay will perhaps be the sound;
one scholar spells it bey, another, bay, while the master
all the time means ba, which comes within the rule, being
in
the spelling-book
.
It was on one of these occasions, as we have said, that Miss
Bangle, having come to the spelling-school to get materials for a
letter to a female friend, first shone upon Mr. Horner. She was
excessively amused by his solemn air and puckered mouth, and
set him down at once as fair game. Yet she could not help
becoming
somewhat interested in the spelling-school, and after it
was over found she had not stored up half as many of the
schoolmaster's
points as she intended, for the benefit of her
correspondent
.
In the evening's contest a young girl from some few miles'
distance, Ellen Kingsbury, the only child of a substantial farmer,
had been the very last to sit down, after a prolonged effort on
the part of Mr. Horner to puzzle her, for the credit of his own
school. She blushed, and smiled, and blushed again, but spelt on,
until Mr. Horner's cheeks were crimson with excitement and
some touch of shame that he should be baffled at his own
weapons
.
At length, either by accident or design, Ellen missed a
word, and sinking into her seat, was numbered with the slain.
In the laugh and talk which followed, (for with the conclusion
of the spelling, all form of a public assembly vanishes,) our
schoolmaster said so many gallant things to his fair enemy, and
appeared so much animated by the excitement of the contest, that
Miss Bangle began to look upon him with rather more respect,
and to feel somewhat indignant that a little rustic like Ellen
should absorb the entire attention of the only beau. She put on,
therefore, her most gracious aspect, and mingled in the circle;
caused the schoolmaster to be presented to her, and did her best
to fascinate him by certain airs and graces which she had found
successful elsewhere. What game is too small for the
close-woven
net of a coquette?
Mr. Horner quitted not the fair Ellen until he had handed her
into her father's sleigh; and he then wended his way homewards,
never thinking that he ought to have escorted Miss Bangle to her
uncle's, though she certainly waited a little while for his return.
We must not follow into particulars the subsequent intercourse
of our schoolmaster with the civilized young lady. All that
concerns us is the result of Miss Bangle's benevolent designs
upon his heart. She tried most sincerely to find its vulnerable
spot, meaning no doubt to put Mr. Horner on his guard for the
future; and she was unfeignedly surprised to discover that her
best efforts were of no avail. She concluded he must have
taken a counter-poison, and she was not slow in guessing its
source. She had observed the peculiar fire which lighted up his
eyes in the presence of Ellen Kingsbury, and she bethought her
of a plan which would ensure her some amusement at the
expense
of these impertinent rustics, though in a manner different
somewhat from her original more natural idea of simple coquetry.
A letter was written to Master Horner, purporting to come
from Ellen Kingsbury, worded so artfully that the schoolmaster
understood at once that it was intended to be a secret
communication
,
though its otensible object was an inquiry about some
ordinary affair. This was laid in Mr. Horner's desk before he
came to school, with an intimation that he might leave an
answer
in a certain spot on the following morning. The bait took
at once, for Mr. Horner, honest and true himself, and much
smitten with the fair Ellen, was too happy to be circumspect.
The answer was duly placed, and as duly carried to Miss Bangle
by her accomplice Joe Englehart, an unlucky pickle who was
always for ill, never for good, and who found no difficulty in
obtaining the letter unwatched, since the master was obliged to
be in school at nine, and Joe could always linger a few minutes
later. This answer being opened and laughed at, Miss Bangle
had only to contrive a rejoinder, which being rather more
particular
in its tone than the original communication, led on yet
again the happy schoolmaster, who branched out into sentiment,
taffeta phrases, silken terms precise, talked of hills and dales
and rivulets, and the pleasures of friendship, and concluded by
entreating a continuance of the correspondence.
Another letter and another, every one more flattering and
encouraging
than the last, almost turned the sober head of our poor
master, and warmed up his heart so effectually that he could
scarcely attend to his business. The spelling-schools were
remembered
12
however, and Ellen Kingsbury made one of the merry
company; but the latest letter had not forgotten to caution Mr.
Horner not to betray the intimacy, so that he was in honour
bound to restrict himself to the language of the eyes, hard as it
was to forbear the single whisper for which he would have given
his very dictionary. So their meeting passed off without the
explanation
which Miss Bangle began to fear would cut short her
benevolent amusement.
The correspondence was resumed with renewed spirit, and
carried on until Miss Bangle, though not over-burdened with
sensitiveness, began to be a little alarmed for the consequences
of her malicious pleasantry. She perceived that she herself had
turned schoolmistress, and that Master Horner, instead of being
merely her dupe, had become her pupil too; for the style of his
replies had been constantly improving, and the earnest and manly
tone which he assumed promised any thing but the quiet, sheepish
pocketing of injury and insult, upon which she had counted. In
truth, there was something deeper than vanity in the feelings
with which he regarded Ellen Kingsbury. The encouragement
which he supposed himself to have received, threw down the
barrier which his extreme bashfulness would have interposed
between himself and any one who possessed charms enough to
attract him; and we must excuse him if, in such a case, he did
not criticise the mode of encouragement, but rather grasped
eagerly the proffered good without a scruple, or one which he
would own to himself, as to the propriety with which it was
tendered
.
He was as much in love as a man can be, and the
seriousness of real attachment gave both grace and dignity to his
once awkward diction.
The evident determination of Mr. Horner to come to the point
of asking papa, brought Miss Bangle to a very awkward pass.
She had expected to return home before matters had proceeded
so far, but being obliged to remain some time longer, she was
equally afraid to go on and to leave off, a denouement being
almost certain to ensue in either case. Things stood thus when
it was time to prepare for the grand exhibition which was to close
the winter's term.
This is an affair of too much magnitude to be fully described
in the small space yet remaining in which to bring out our
veracious
history. It must be slubber'd o'er in haste,its
important
preliminaries left to the cold imagination of the reader
its fine spirit perhaps evaporating for want of being embodied in
words. We can only say that our master, whose school-life was
to close with the term, laboured as man never before laboured in
such a cause, resolute to trail a cloud of glory after him when
he left us. Not a candlestick nor a curtain that was attainable,
either by coaxing or bribery, was left in the village; even the
only piano, that frail treasure, was wiled away and placed in one
corner of the rickety stage. The most splendid of all the pieces
in the Columbian Orator, the American Speaker, the
but we must not enumeratein a word, the most astounding and
pathetic specimens of eloquence within ken of either teacher or
scholars, had been selected for the occasion; and several young
ladies and gentlemen, whose academical course had been happily
concluded at an earlier period, either at our own institution or
at some other, had consented to lend themselves to the parts and
their choicest decorations for the properties, of the dramatic
portion
of the entertainment.
Among these last was pretty Ellen Kingsbury, who had agreed
te personate the Queen of Scots, in the garden scene from
Schiller's tragedy of Mary Stuart; and this circumstance
accidentally
afforded Master Horner the opportunity he had so long
desired, of seeing his fascinating correspondent without the
presence
of peering eyes. A dress-rehearsal occupied the afternoon
before the day of days, and the pathetic expostulations of the
lovely Mary
Mine all doth hangmy lifemy destiny
Upon my wordsupon the force of tears!
aided by the long veil, and the emotion which sympathy brought
into Ellen's countenance, proved too much for the enforced
prudence
of Master Horner. When the rehearsal was over, and
the heroes and heroines were to return home, it was found that,
by a stroke of witty invention not new in the country, the harness
of Mr. Kingsbury's horses had been cut in several places, his
whip hidden, his buffalo-skins spread on the ground, and the sleigh
turned bottom upwards on them. This afforded an excuse for the
master's borrowing a horse and sleigh of somebody, and claiming
the privilege of taking Miss Ellen home, while her father returned
with only Aunt Sally and a great bag of bran from the mill
companions about equally interesting.
Here, then, was the golden opportunity so long wished for!
Here was the power of ascertaining at once what is never quite
certain until we have heard it from warm, living lips, whose
testimony is strengthened by glances in which the whole soul
speaks orseems to speak. The time was short, for the
sleighing
was but too fine; and Father Kingsbury, having tied up his
harness, and collected his scattered equipment, was driving so
close behind that there was no possibility of lingering for a
moment
.
Yet many moments were lost before Mr. Horner, very
much in earnest, and all unhackneyed in matters of this sort,
could find a word in which to clothe his new-found feelings.
The horse seemed to flythe distance was half pastand at
length, in absolute despair of anything better, he blurted out at
once what he had determined to avoida direct reference to the
correspondence.
A game at cross-purposes ensued; exclamations and
explanations
,
and denials and apologies filled up the time which was to
have made Master Horner so blest. The light from Mr.
Kingsbury's
windows shone upon the path, and the whole result of this
conference so longed for, was a burst of tears from the perplexed
and mortified Ellen, who sprang from Mr. Horner's attempts to
detain her, rushed into the house without vouchsafing him a word
of adieu, and left him standing, no bad personification of Orpheus,
after the last hopeless flitting of his Eurydice.
Won't you 'light, Master? said Mr. Kingsbury.
Yesnothank yougood evening, stammered poor
Master
Horner, so stupified that even Aunt Sally called him a
dummy.
The horse took the sleigh against the fence, going home, and
threw out the master, who scarcely recollected the accident;
while to Ellen the issue of this unfortunate drive was a sleepless
night and so high a fever in the morning that our village doctor
was called to Mr. Kingsbury's before breakfast.
Poor Master Horner's distress may hardly be imagined.
Disappointed
,
bewildered, cut to the quick, yet as much in love as
ever, he could only in bitter silence turn over in his thoughts the
issue of his cherished dream; now persuading himself that Ellen's
denial was the effect of a sudden bashfulness, now inveighing
against the fickleness of the sex, as all men do when they are
angry with any one woman in particular. But his exhibition
must go on in spite of wretchedness; and he went about
mechanically
,
talking of curtains and candles, and music, and
attitudes
,
and pauses, and emphasis, looking like a somnambulist
whose eyes are open but their sense is shut, and often
surprising
those concerned by the utter unfitness of his answers.
It was almost evening when Mr. Kingsbury, having discovered,
through the intervention of the Doctor and Aunt Sally the cause
of Ellen's distress, made his appearance before the unhappy eyes
of Master Horner, angry, solemn and determined; taking the
schoolmaster apart, and requiring an explanation of his treatment
of his daughter. In vain did the perplexed lover ask for time to
clear himself, declare his respect for Miss Ellen and his
willingness
to give every explanation which she might require: the
father was not to be put off; and though excessively reluctant,
Mr. Horner had no resource but to show the letters which alone
could account for his strange discourse to Ellen. He unlocked
his desk, slowly and unwillingly, while the old man's impatience
was such that he could scarcely forbear thrusting in his own hand
to snatch at the papers which were to explain this vexatious
mystery
.
What could equal the utter confusion of Master Horner
and the contemptuous anger of the father, when no letters were
to be found! Mr. Kingsbury was too passionate to listen to
reason
,
or to reflect for one moment upon the irreproachable good
name of the schoolmaster. He went away in inexorable wrath;
threatening every practicable visitation of public and private
justice upon the head of the offender, whom he accused of having
attempted to trick his daughter into an entanglement which should
result in his favour.
A doleful exhibition was this last one of our thrice-approved
and most worthy teacher! Stern necessity and the power of
habit enabled him to go through with most of his part, but where
was the proud fire which had lighted up his eye on similar
occasions before? He sat as one of three judges before whom
the unfortunate Robert Emmet was dragged in his
shirt-sleeves
,
by two fierce-looking officials; but the chief judge looked
far more like a criminal than did the proper representative. He
ought to have personated Othello, but was obliged to excuse
himself
from raving for the handkerchief! the handkerchief! on
the rather anomalous plea of a bad cold. Mary Stuart being
i' the bond, was anxiously expected by the impatient crowd,
and it was with distress amounting to agony that the master was
obliged to announce, in person, the necessity of omitting that part
of the representation, on account of the illness of one of the
young ladies.
Scarcely had the words been uttered, and the speaker hidden
his burning face behind the curtain, when Mr. Kingsbury started
up in his place amid the throng, to give a public recital of his
grievanceno uncommon resort in the new country. He dashed
at once to the point; and before some friends who saw the utter
impropriety of his proceeding could persuade him to defer his
vengeance, he had laid before the assemblysome three hundred
people, perhapshis own statement of the case. He was got out
at last, half coaxed, half hustled; and the gentle public only half
understanding what had been set forth thus unexpectedly made
quite a pretty row of it. Some clamoured loudly for the
conclusion
of the exercises; others gave utterance in no particularly
choice terms to a variety of opinions as to the schoolmaster's
proceedings
,
varying the note occasionally by shouting, the letters!
the letters! why don't you bring out the letters?
At length, by means of much rapping on the desk by the
president
of the evening, who was fortunately a popular character,
order was partially restored; and the favourite scene from Miss
More's dialogue of David and Goliah was announced as the
closing
piece. The sight of little David in a white tunic edged with
red tape, with a calico scrip and a very primitive-looking sling;
and a huge Goliah decorated with a militia belt and sword, and a
spear like a weaver's beam indeed, enchained every body's
attention
.
Even the peccant schoolmaster and his pretended letters
were forgotten, while the sapient Goliah, every time that he
raised
the spear, in the energy of his declamation, to thump upon the
stage, picked away fragments of the low ceiling, which fell
conspicuously
on his great shock of black hair. At last, with the
crowning threat, up went the spear for an astounding thump,
and down came a large piece of the ceiling, and with ita
shower
of letters.
The confusion that ensued beggars all description. A general
scramble took place, and in another moment twenty pairs of eyes,
at least, were feasting on the choice phrases lavished upon Mr.
Horner. Miss Bangle had sat through the whole previous scene,
trembling for herself, although she had, as she supposed, guarded
cunningly against exposure. She had needed no prophet to tell
her what must be the result of a tte--tte between Mr. Horner
and Ellen; and the moment she saw them drive off together, she
induced her imp to seize the opportunity of obstracting the whole
parcel of letters from Mr. Horner's desk; which he did by means
of a sort of skill which comes by nature to such goblins;
picking
the lock by the aid of a crooked nail, as neatly as if he had
been born within the shadow of the Tombs.
But magicians sometimes suffer severely from the malice with
which they have themselves inspired their familiars. Joe
Englehart
having been a convenient tool thus far, thought it quite time
to torment Miss Bangle a little; so, having stolen the letters at
her bidding, he hid them on his own account, and no persuasions
of hers could induce him to reveal this important secret, which
he chose to reserve as a rod in case she refused him some
intercession
with his father, or some other accommodation, rendered
necessary by his mischievous habits.
He had concealed the precious parcel in the unfloored loft
above the school-room, a place accessible only by means of a
small trap-door without staircase or ladder; and here he meant
to have kept them while it suited his purposes, but for the
untimely
intrusion of the weaver's beam.
Miss Bangle had sat through all, as we have said, thinking the
letters safe, yet vowing vengeance against her confederate for not
allowing her to secure them by a satisfactory conflagration; and
it was not until she heard her own name whispered through the
crowd, that she was awakened to her true situation. The sagacity
of the low creatures whom she had despised showed them at once
that the letters must be hers, since her character had been pretty
shrewdly guessed, and the handwriting wore a more practised
air than is usual among females in the country. This was first
taken for granted, and then spoken of as an acknowledged fact.
The assembly moved like the heavings of a troubled sea.
Every body felt that this was every body's business. Put her
out! was heard from more than one rough voice near the door,
and this was responded to by loud and angry murmurs from
within.
Mr. Englehart, not waiting to inquire into the merits of the
case in this scene of confusion, hastened to get his family out as
quetly and as quickly as possible, but groans and hisses followed
his niece as she hung half-fainting on his arm, quailing
completely
beneath the instinctive indignation of the rustic public. As
she passed out, a yell resounded among the rude boys about the
door, and she was lifted into a sleigh, insensible from terror. She
disappeared from that evening, and no one knew the time of her
final departure for the east.
Mr. Kingsbury, who is a just man when he is not in a
passion
,
made all the reparation in his power for his harsh and
ill-considered
attack upon the master; and we believe that
functionary
did not show any traits of implacability of character. At
least he was seen, not many days after, sitting peaceably at tea
with Mr. Kingsbury, Aunt Sally, and Miss Ellen; and he has
since gone home to build a house upon his farm. And people
do
say, that after a few months more, Ellen will not need Miss
Bangle's
intervention if she should see fit to correspond with the
umquhile
schoolmaster.
HALF-LENGTHS FROM LIFE.
CHAPTER I.
OPERATIVE DEMOCRACY.
A theme of perilous risk
Thou handlest, and hot fires beneath thy path
The treacherous ashes nurse.
Can't
you let our folks have some eggs? said Daniel
Webster
Larkins, opening the door, and putting in a little
straw-coloured
head and a pair of very mild blue eyes just far enough to
reconnoitre
;
can't you let our folks have some eggs? Our old
hen don't lay nothing but chickens now, and mother can't eat
pork, and she a'n't had no breakfast, and the baby a'n't drest,
nor nothin'!
What is the matter, Webster? Where's your girl?
Oh! we ha'n't no girl but father, and he's had to go 'way
to-day
to a raisin'and mother wants to know if you can't tell her
where to get a girl?
Poor Mrs. Larkins! Her husband makes but an indifferent
girl, being a remarkable public-spirited person. The good
lady is in very delicate health, and having an incredible number
of little blue eyes constantly making fresh demands upon her
time and strength, she usually keeps a girl when she can get one.
When she cannot, which is unfortunately the larger part of the
time, her husband dresses the childrenmixes stir-cakes for the
eldest blue eyes to bake on a griddle, which is never at rest
milks the cowfeeds the pigsand then goes to his business,
which we have supposed to consist principally in helping at
raisings
,
wood-bees, huskings, and such like important affairs; and
girl huntingthe most important and arduous, and profitless
of all.
Yet it must be owned that Mr. Larkins is a tolerable carpenter,
and that he buys as many comforts for his family as most of his
neighbours. The main difficulty seems to be that help is not
often purchasable. The very small portion of our damsels who
will consent to enter anybody's doors for pay, makes the chase
after them quite interesting from its uncertainty; and the damsels
themselves, subject to a well known foible of their sex, become
very coy from being over-courted. Such racing and chasing,
and begging and praying, to get a girl for a month! They are
often got for life with half the trouble. But to return.
Having an esteem for Mrs. Larkins, and a sincere experimental
pity for the forlorn condition of no girl but father, I set out at
once to try if female tact and perseverance might not prove
effectual
in ferreting out a help, though mere industry had not
succeeded
.
For this purpose I made a list in my mind of those
neighbours, in the first place, whose daughters sometimes
condescended
to be girls; and, secondly, of the few who were enabled
by good luck, good management, and good pay, to keep them. If
I failed in my attempts upon one class, I hoped for somenew lights
from the other. When the object is of such importance, it is
well to string one's bow double.
In the first category stood Mrs. Lowndes, whose forlorn
log-house
had never known door or window; a blanket supplying the
place of the one, and the other being represented by a crevice
between the logs. Lifting the sooty curtain with some timidity, I
found the dame with a sort of reel before her, trying to wind
some dirty, tangled yarn; and ever and anon kicking at a basket
which hung suspended from the beam overhead by means of a
strip of hickory bark. This basket contained a nest of rags and
an indescribable baby; and in the ashes on the rough hearth
played several dingy objects, which I suppose had once been
babies
.
Is your daughter at home now, Mrs. Lowndes?
Well, yes! M'randy's to hum, but she's out now. Did you
want her?
I came to see if she could go to Mrs. Larkins, who is very
unwell, and sadly in want of help.
Miss Larkins! why, do tell! I want to know! Is she sick
agin? and is her gal gone? Why! I want to know! I thought
she had Lo-i-sy Paddon! Is Lo-i-sy gone?
I suppose so. You will let Miranda go to Mrs. Larkins, will
you?
Well, I donnow but I would let her go for a spell, just to
'commodate 'em. M'randy may go if she's a mind ter. She
needn't live out unless she chooses. She's got a comfortable
home, and no thanks to nobody. What wages do they give?
A dollar a week.
Eat at the table?
Oh! certainly.
Have Sundays?
Why noI believe not the whole of Sundaythe children,
you know
Oh ho! interrupted Mrs. Lowndes, with a most disdainful
toss of the head, giving at the same time a vigorous impulse to
the cradle, if that's how it is, M'randy don't stir a step! She
don't live nowhere if she can't come home Saturday night and
stay till Monday morning.
I took my leave without farther parley, having often found this
point the
sine qua non
in such negotiations.
My next effort was at a pretty-looking cottage, whose
overhanging
roof and neat outer arrangements, spoke of English
ownership. The interior by no means corresponded with the
exterior aspect, being even more bare than usual, and far from
neat. The presiding power was a prodigious creature, who
looked
like a man in woman's clothes, and whose blazing face,
ornamented
here and there by great hair moles, spoke very
intelligibly
of the beer-barrel, if of nothing more exciting. A daughter
of this virago had once lived in my family, and the mother met
me with an air of defiance, as if she thought I had come with an
accusation. When I unfolded my errand, her
abord
softened a
little, but she scornfully rejected the idea of her Lucy living with
any more Yankees.
You pretend to think everybody alike, said she, but when
it comes to the pint, you're a sight more uppish and saucy than
the ra'al quality at home; and I'll see the whole Yankee race
to
I made my exit without waiting for the conclusion of this
complimentary
observation; and the less reluctantly for having
observed
on the table the lower part of one of my silver teaspoons, the
top of which had been violently wrenched off. This spoon was
a well-remembered loss during Lucy's administration, and I knew
that Mrs. Larkins had none to spare.
Unsuccessful thus far among the arbiters of our destiny, I
thought I would stop at the house of a friend, and make some
inquiries
which might spare me farther rebuffs. On making my
way by the garden gate to the little library where I usually
saw Mrs. Stayner, I was surprised to find it silent and
uninhabited
.
The windows were closed; a half-finished cap lay on the
sofa, and a bunch of yesterday's wild-flowers upon the table. All
spoke of desolation. The cradlenot exactly an appropriate
adjunct
of a library scene elsewhere, but quite so at the West
was gone, and the little rocking-chair was nowhere to be seen. I
went on through parlour and hall, finding no sign of life, save the
breakfast-table still standing with crumbs undisturbed. Where
bells are not known, ceremony is out of the question; so I
penetrated
even to the kitchen, where at length I caught sight of the
fair face of my friend. She was bending over the bread-tray,
and at the same time telling nursery-stories as fast as possible, by
way of coaxing her little boy of four years old to rock the cradle
which contained his baby sister.
What
does
this mean?
Oh! nothing more than usual. My Polly took herself off
yesterday without a moment's warning, saying she thought she had
lived out about long enough; and poor Tom, our factotum, has
the ague. Mr. Stayner has gone to some place sixteen miles off,
where he was told he might hear of a girl, and I am sole
representative
of the family energies. But you've no idea what
capital
bread I can make.
This looked rather discouraging for my quest; but knowing
that the main point of table-companionship was the source of
most of Mrs. Stayner's difficulties, I still hoped for Mrs. Larkins,
who loved the closest intimacy with her help, and always took
them visiting with her. So I passed on for another effort at Mrs.
Randall's, whose three daughters had sometimes been known to
lay aside their dignity long enough to obtain some much-coveted
article of dress. Here the mop was in full play; and Mrs.
Randall
,
with her gown turned up, was splashing diluted mud on the
walls and furniture, in the received mode of these regions, where
stained-glass windows are made without a patent. I did not
venture in, but asked from the door, with my best diplomacy,
whether Mrs. Randall
knew
of a girl.
A gal! no; who wants a gal?
Mrs. Larkins.
She! why don't she get up and do her own work?
She is too feeble.
Law sakes! too feeble! she'd be able as anybody to thrash
round, if her old man didn't spile her by waitin' on
We think Mrs. Larkins deserves small blame on this score.
But, Mrs. Randall, the poor woman is really ill and unable
to do anything for her children. Couldn't you spare Rachel for
a few days to help her?
This was said in a most guarded and deprecatory tone, and
with a manner carefully moulded between indifference and undue
solicitude.
My gals has got enough to do. They a'n't able to do their
own work. Cur'line hasn't been worth the fust red cent for hard
work ever since she went to school to A.
Oh! I did not expect to get Caroline. I understand she is
going to get married.
What! to Bill Green! She wouldn't let him walk where
she walked last year!
Here I saw I had made a misstep. Resolving to be more
cautious
,
I left the selection to the lady herself, and only begged for
one of the girls. But my eloquence was wasted. The Miss
Randalls had been a whole quarter at a select school, and will
not live out again until their present stock of finery is
unwearable
.
Miss Rachel, whose company I had hoped to secure, was
even then paying attention to a branch of the fine arts.
Rachel Amandy! cried Mrs. Randall at the foot of the
ladder
which gave access to the upper regionsfetch that thing
down here! It's the prettiest thing you ever see in your life!
turning to me. And the educated young lady brought down a
doleful-looking compound of card-board and many-coloured
waters
,
which had, it seems, occupied her mind and fingers for some
days.
There! said the mother, proudly, a gal that's learnt to
make sich baskets as that, a'n't a goin' to be nobody's help, I
guess!
I thought the boast likely to be verified as a prediction, and
went my way, crestfallen and weary. Girl-hunting is certainly
among our most formidable chores.
CHAPTER II.
INTRODUCTIONS AND REMINISCENCES
Ah! what avails the largest gifts of heaven
When drooping health and spirits go amiss?
How tasteless then whatever may be given!
Health is the vital principle of bliss,
And exercise of health.
Thus
unsuccessful, it was for rest more than for inquiry that
I turned my steps toward Mrs. Clifford's modest dwellinga
house containing only just rooms enough for decent comfort, yet
inhabited by gentle breeding, and feelings which meet but little
sympathy in these rough walks. Mrs. Clifford was a widow,
bowed down by misfortune, and gradually sinking into a sort of
desperate apathy, if we may be allowed such a terma
condition
to which successive disappointments and the gradual fading
away of long-cherished hopes, will sometimes reduce proud
yet honourable minds. The apathy is on the surface, but the
smouldering fires of despair burst forth at intervals, in spite of
their icy covering. Exertion had long since been abandoned by
this unfortunate lady, and she sat always in her great arm-chair,
seeming scarce alive to common things, yet starting in agonized
sensitiveness when the tender string of her altered fortunes was
touched by a rude hand. This total renunciation of effort had
done its work upon her mind and body. Mrs. Clifford had
become
a mere mountain in size, while her pale face and leaden
eye told of anything but health and enjoyment. She read
incessantly
,
seeking that oblivious antidote in books, which coarser
natures are apt to seek in less refined indulgences. She lived in
a world of imagination until she had insensibly become unfit for
a world of reality. Who can find anything charming in common
life, after a full surrender of the mind to the excitements of
fiction
?
Who ever relished common air after a long draught of
exhilarating gas?
To the looker-on, this poor lady, broken down and dispirited
as she was, seemed to have much left for which to be grateful.
Her two daughters and their manly brother were patterns of duty
and devoted affection. Through the whole sad period of the
downfall of their fortunes, and the gradual withdrawal, from
various causes, of almost the very means of existence, Augustus
Clifford shrank from nothing which promised advantage to his
mother's condition. While she had yet an income, he was her
very efficient and accurate man of business; and when the
misfortunes
of banks, and the assiduity of defaulters had made
this office a sinecure, he turned his hand to the plough, and was
the patient log-man of a poverty-stricken household. He had
seen with unavailing distress the sad decay of his mother's
energies
,
and done all that a son may, to avert the ill consequences
of her indolent habits; but finding matters only growing worse,
he had left home at the urgent entreaty of his sisters, a few
weeks before the time when our story commences, to seek
employment
in the city, where abilities like his are so much more in
request than in the woods.
Of the two daughters, Rose, the elder, was in feeble health,
and, though gentle and unassuming, and much beloved at home,
not particularly attractive elsewhere. She was said to have
been crossed in love, and her subdued and rather melancholy
manner seemed to confirm the report. But Anna Clifford had
beauty and grace of a rare order, though in a style not always
appreciated by those who admire that fragility of form which is so
coveted by our own fair countrywomen. She was taller than
most women, but so beautifully proportioned that this would not
occur to you until you saw her measured with others.
Magnificent
is the epithet for her beauty; and much intercourse with
polished society had given a free and finished elegance to her
manners, while it had detracted nothing from the truth and
simplicity
of her character. Born to fortune, and having the further
advantages of connections high in place, it is not surprising that
she should have found many admirers. Indeed we have the
satisfaction
of knowing that our forest judgment of her charms had
been borne out by the homage rendered to our fair neighbour by
various young men of acknowledged taste who had bowed at her
shrine in happier days. But it may not be so easy to believe
that her heart was still her own. Perhaps the careless gayety of
her spirits had proved her shield, since all passion is said to be
serious. However this may be, she declared she would not
marry till thirty, adding, with the deep determination of
twenty-one
,
and also with the tone which befits the inheritrix of certain
prejudices, that then the happy man should be neither a Yankee,
a Presbyterian, nor a widower.
We have omitted to mention that these our friends were from
Englandone forgets that friends are foreigners. Mrs. Clifford,
whose income at home had diminished from various causes, was
attracted to this country by the far higher interest to be obtained
on money; and during some years that she resided in one of the
great cities, her expectations of increased income were more than
realized, and she and her family had enjoyed all that the best
American circles afforded to the wealthy and the accomplished of
whatever land. When the dark days came, and Mrs. Clifford
found herself left with scarcely a pittance, the Westthen an
El Doradooffered many attractions to the sanguine mind of
Augustus, and he persuaded his mother to withdraw, while yet
she might be able to purchase a little land where land is almost
given away. What had been the result of this enterprise, we
have already seen. Mrs. Clifford was too old to bear
transplanting
.
A high aristocratic pride was the very soul of her being.
In the present condition of her circumstances, she felt not only
inconveniencethat was unavoidable under a complete revulsion
of habitsbut degradation; an idea which common sense and
self-respect should have scouted. And the very thing that should
have made present sacrifices easy, served but to embitter them.
The Cliffords had expectations from England, on the demise of
some long-lifed uncle or aunt; a fortune, of course, since an
English legacy always passes for a fortune, an involuntary
compliment
,
I suppose, to the well-known wealth of our magnificent
mother. However, the Cliffords said expectations, which we
will leave to be limited, or unlimited, by the imagination of the
reader.
This much by way of introductionan indispensable
ceremony
,
always attended with some awkwardness. Our present one
has been circumstantial and minute, after the fashion of the
country
,
e. g.:
Miss Wiggins, let me make you acquainted with an uncle of
His'n
, just come down from Ionia county, the town of
Freemantle
,
village of Breadalbanecome away up here to mill, (they
ha'n't no mills yet, up there.) Uncle, this is Miss Wiggins,
John Wiggins's wife, up yonder on the hill, t'other side o' the
mashyou can see the house from here. She's come down to
meetin'.
CHAPTER III.
THE HARROWS.
In brave poursuitt of honourable deede,
There is I know not what great difference
Between the vulgar and the noble seede
Which unto things of valorous pretence,
Seem to be borne by native influence.
This
same introduction has unavoidably called for so many
words, that we must hasten over some minor points in the
character
and situation of our young friends. It would require a
long story to express fully the difficulties under which these
sweet girls laboured, in trying to soften for their mother a lot
which they could cheerfully have endured themselves. Mrs.
Clifford's habits were imperative, her prejudices immoveable.
All that had yet occurred had failed to make her perceive that it
was necessary to do without everything but the bare requisites
of subsistence; and to keep this sad necessity from her eyes had
been the constant study of her children. She had, indeed, no
idea of their efforts and sacrifices, or of the real condition of the
household.
Where is the silver chocolate-pot, Anna? Mrs. Clifford
inquired
one morning at breakfast.
You, know, mamma, the handle was loose, and I took it to
the village.
But what a length of time it has been gone! Pray inquire
for it! I do so hate this earthen thing!
The poor lady would have been without chocolate, and without
tea also, if the
chocolatire
had not been transferred, at least
pro.
tem.
to the possession of our village dealer-in-all-things. But
the idea of such a transaction would almost have crazed her;
and she had so far lost the train of cause and effect, that she
thought the last bank-note brought in by Augustus had sufficed
for six weeks' family expenses. The girls never gathered
courage
to enlighten their mother's views as to pecuniary matters,
though they were sometimes obliged to run away to hide their
tears when she would remark the meanness of their dress, and
fear they were contracting habits which would unfit them to enjoy
better fortune. Anna Clifford and her sister, forced by suffering
to learn a premature prudence, often wished, in the grief of their
hearts, that no prospect of an inheritance had prevented their
mother from accommodating her ideas to her present condition.
This waiting for dead men's shoes is proverbially enervating
to the character.
When I entered the little parlour, I was somewhat startled by
the sight of two rough-looking men, one fanning himself with his
hat, the other drumming on the table with his long, black, horny
nails, and both taking a deliberate survey of the apartment and
all that it contained. In the accustomed chair sat Mrs. Clifford,
a purple spot on each cheek, and a look of helpless anger in her
eye, while her daughters, one on either side of her, stood, pale as
death, gazing on these strange guests.
Well! I guess we may as well levy, if you've nobody to stay
judgment, said the straw hat, who seemed to be principal.
Mr. Grinder told us the money or the things. That's the hang
of it. No mistake. Turn out what you like, or we'll take what
we
like. No two ways about it! You ha'n't hid nothing, have
ye? If you have, you'd better rowst it out at once't! We've a
right to sarch.
Mrs. Clifford gasped for breath.
Who sent you here? she said.
Oh! we're for Grinder. That bill, you know. Your son
there confessed judgment. I s'pose he thought levyin' time would
never come. We want a hundred dollars, or goods to that amount.
You've got a good deal more than the law allowsnow what'll
you turn out? Come, be lively, gals, for we can't wait!
This was said quite facetiously.
Couldn't you grant a little time, till we can hear from my
brother? said Anna, who seemed more self-possessed than her
mother or Rose.
Can't go it! No fun in waitin'. Hearin' from him won't do
no good, unless he sends money. Do you expect money?
Yesthat iswe hope
Ha! ha! hope starved a rattlesnake! We can't eat nor
drink hope. Come, Woodruff, they a'n't a goin' to turn out any
thing but talk. Go ahead!
Our poor friends were overwhelmed, but seeing no present
remedy, they could only sit quietly looking on while the officers
proceeded to execute this trying process of law. I must do Mr.
Beals and his assistant the justice to say that, allowing for their
rude natures, they were not wilfully insulting, but performed
their duty with as few words as possible. Indeed, nothing can
be more foreign to the character of the men of this country than
any thing like intentional rudeness to a woman. We must not
blame them for not respecting feelings which they could not
understand
.
When they had departed, Mrs. Clifford's pride came to the
rescue. In reply to the words of sympathy which one cannot
help offering in such cases, she said it was a thing of no
importance
at all. My son will come or send before these people
actually proceed to sell our property! It can never be that the
very furniture of my house is to be taken away by a low person
like Grinder! I cannot imagine why Augustus does not write!
I expected he would have sent us funds long ago!
It would have been unavailing to convince the poor lady that
her son might not probably find it very easy to pick up money,
even in the city, in these times; so we turned the discourse
gradually
to other things. I stated the purpose of my long walk and
its ill success; and after some attempts at conversationlaboured
enough when all hearts were full of one subject, and that, one
that did not bear handlingI invited Mrs. Clifford with her
daughters
to remove to our house until Augustus should return.
The old lady's manner was stately enough for Queen
Elizabeth
.
She thanked me very graciously, but felt quite too sad, as
well as too infirm, she said, to think of quitting home. And with
this reply I was about to take my leave, when Anna, suddenly
turning to her mother, declared she should like very much to
accept
the invitation.
It was as easy to read high displeasure in the countenance of
the mother as most painful surprise in that of the gentle Rose.
But Anna, though her cheek was flushed and her lip quivering
with emotion, persisted in her wish.
You will return with me now?
Not just now, but this evening.
And I promised to send.
What
must
you have thought of me? said the dear girl as I
welcomed her. But you could not suppose for a moment that
I really coveted a visit when my poor mother's heart was so
cruelly
wrung! Ah no! it was a lucky thought that struck me
when you said Mrs. Larkins wanted a servant. It flashed upon
me that in that way I might earn a pittance, however small, on
which mamma and Rose can subsist until we hear from Augustus.
You see what these horrid debts come to, and we are absolutely
without present resources. Ah! I see what you are going to
say; but do not even speak of it! Mamma would rather die, I
believe! Only get me in at Mrs. Larkins', and you shall see
what a famous maid I'll make! I have learned
so
much since
we came here! And I have arranged it all with Rose, that
mamma
shall never discover it. Mamma is a little deaf, you know,
and does not hear casual observations, and Rose will take care
that nobody tells her. Poor Rose cried a good deal at first, but
she saw it was the best thing I could do for mamma, so she
consented
.
She can easily do all that is needed at home, while my
strong armsand here she extended a pair that Cleopatra might
have envied, so round, so graceful, so perfectmy strong arms
can earn all the little comforts, that are every thing to poor
mamma
!
Won't it be delightful! Oh, I shall be so happy! There
is only one sad side. My mother will thinktill Augustus
returns
that
I have selfishly flown from her trials. And at the
thought she burst into tears, for the remembrance of her mother's
displeasure weighed sorely upon her.
I have not thought it necessary to record the various
interruptions
which I could not help making to this plan. Anna's warmth
overpowered all I could say, and she succeeded in convincing my
reason at least, if not my feelings, that it was the best thing for
the present. Her eyes did not allow of close application to the
needle, and the uncertainty of that most laborious of all ways of
earning a poor living, was a further objection. In the country
few persons undertake needlework as a business. Sometimes a
widow with children, or a wife whose husband frequents the
tavern
,
earns a scanty and ill-paid addition to her means in this way,
and with such it seems hardly right for the young and healthy
to interfere. But girls are universally in request, and get as
well paid and much better treated than schoolmistresses, with far
less wearing employment. I knew that at Mrs. Larkins' Anna
would meet with decent treatment, and be sure of a punctual
dollar
per week; since Mr. Larkins hates mixing griddle-cakes too
much ever to lose a girl for want of this essential security.
The thing was settled, and all I could do was to procure the
introduction.
Mrs. Larkins was at first a little afraid of such a lady for
a help, but after a close and searching examination, she
consented
to engage Miss Clifford for a week.
I left Anna in excellent spirits, and, during several evening
visits which she contrived to make me in the course of this her
first week of servitude, she declared herself well satisfied with
her situation, and only afraid that Mrs. Larkins would not care
to retain one who was so awkward about many things required in
her household. But she must have underrated her own skill, for
on the Saturday evening, Mr. Larkins put into her hands a silver
dollar, with a very humble request for a permanent engagement.
The spending of that dollar, Anna Clifford declared to me was
the greatest pleasure she could remember.
CHAPTER IV.
CHARACTERISTICS.
That maid is born of middle earth,
And may of man be won.
That
blessed privilege of the state of girlhood in the
country
the
undisturbed possession of Sundaynot falling to the lot
of Miss Clifford, she could only snatch a moment to visit her
mother
and sister, and deposit with the latter the various little
matters
which were the fruit of her first earnings. She went,
however
,
in high spirits. Poor Rose will be so happy! she said.
When she returned, a cloud sat on her beautiful brow, and her
cheeks bore the marks of much weeping. Mamma received
me very coldly, she said; she thinks I am enjoying myself
with you! But I must bear thisit is a part of my duty, and I
thought I had made up my mind to it. 'Twill be but a little
while! When Augustus comes, all will be well again.
Strong in virtuous resolution, Anna returned to her toil.
Another
week or two passed, and the Larkinses continued to esteem
themselves the most fortunate of girl-hunters. Anna's active
habits
,
strong sense, and high principle, made all go well; and the
influence which she soon established over the household, was such
as superior intellect would naturally command, where there was
no idea of difference of station. Mrs. Larkins would have thought
the roughest of her neighbours' daughters entitled to a full
equality
with herself; and she treated Miss Clifford with all the
additional
respect which her real superiority demanded. It has been
well said that the highest intellectual qualifications may find
employment
in the arrangements of a household; and our friends
the Larkinses, young and old, if they had ever heard of the
doctrine
,
would, I doubt not, have subscribed to it heartily, for they
will never forget Miss Clifford's reign. Without dictating, like
good Mrs. Mason, in the Cottagers of Glenburnie, (whose benefits,
I have sometimes thought, must have been harder to bear than
other people's injuries,) she continued to introduce many
excellent
improvements, and indeed a general reform throughout.
The beds were shielded from public view; the family ablutions
were no longer performed in an iron skillet on the hearth, or a
trough under the eaves; and Mrs. Larkins solemnly burnt the
willow switch which had hitherto been her only means of
government
,
declaring the children never required it under Miss
Clifford's
excellent management. Thus encouraged by her success
in the process of civilization, Anna told me laughingly that she
did not despair of the highest stepto induce Mrs. Larkins to
boil corned beef instead of frying it, and Mr. Larkins to leave off
tobacco. And far from feeling degraded by her labours, she said
she was quite raised in her own opinion by the discovery of her
power of being useful.
I own I suspected a little the solidity of this boast of
independence
.
We sometimes say such things for a double purposeas
a boy passing through a church-yard at night whistles partly to
show he is not afraid and partly to keep up his courage. Anna's
position with regard to the people with whom she lived, was
indeed
,
as we have said, one of decided superiority. To see her
maid well drest and at leisure every afternoon, seated in the
keepin'-room ready to be introduced to any one who should
call; to give her always the lady-like title of Miss, and to
share with her whatever was laborious or unpleasant in the daily
businessthis Mrs. Larkins considered perfectly proper in all
cases, and to Miss Clifford she gladly conceded more in the way
of respectful observance. But in this vulgar world, spite of all
that philosophers have said and poets sung, there lurks yet a
certain
degree of prejudice, which makes real independence not one
of the cheap virtues.
All lots are equal, and all states the same,
Alike in merit though unlike in name.
Yet if we look for a recognition of this truth any where out of
the woods, we shall probably be frowned upon as very wild waifs
from dream-landvisionaries, who, in this enlightened age, can
still cling to the antiquated notion, that theory should be the mould
of practice. So, in my pride of worldly wisdom, I took upon me
to doubt whether my friend Anna was indeed the heroine she
thought herself. The matter was not long doubtful.
Among the gentlemen who had been disposed to play the
agreeable
to Miss Clifford, was a certain Captain Maguire, an Irish
officer, who had met her in Montreal. From Anna herself one
would never have learned that her beauty had found a solitary
adorer; but the tender and unselfish Rose could not help boasting
a little, in her quiet way, of the triumphs of her sister's charms.
She had thought well of the Captain's pretensions, and rather
wondered that his handsome person and gallant bearing had not
made some impression upon Anna, who was the object of his
devoted
attention.
But Anna thought him a coxcomb, she said, and never
gave him the least crumb of encouragement; so, poor fellow! he
gave over in despair.
Now, as it would happen, just at the wrong time, this
unencouraged
and despairing gentleman chanced to be one of a party
who made a flying pilgrimage to the prairies; and being thus far
favoured by chance, he took his further fate into his own hands,
so far as sufficed to bring him to the humble village which he had
understood to be shone upon temporarily by the bright eyes of
Miss Clifford. He went first to her mother's, of course, and
during
a short call, ascertained from the old lady that her youngest
daughter was on a visit to us. The Captain was not slow in
taking advantage of the information, and he was at our door
before Rose had at all made up her mind what should be done in
such an emergency.
I was equally embarrassed, since one never knows on what
nice point those things called love affairs may turn. However, I
detained the Captain, and wrote a note to Miss Clifford. What
was my surprise when a verbal answer was returned, inviting
Captain Maguire and myself to Mrs. Larkins'. There was no
alternative, so I shawled forthwith; but I really do not know how
I led the young gentleman through the shop into the rag-carpeted
sitting-room of Mrs. Larkins. The scene upon which the door
opened must have been a novel one for fashionable optics.
Anna Clifford, with a white apron depending from her taper
waist, stood at the ironing-table, half hidden by a clothes-frame
already well covered with garments of all sizes. Mrs. Larkins
occupied her own, dear, creaking rocking-chair; holding a little
one in her lap, and jogging another in the cradle, while blue-eyed
minims trotted about or sat gravely staring at the strangers.
Get up, young 'uns! said Mrs. Larkins, hastily, as Captain
Maguire's imposing presence caught her eye, and Miss Clifford
came forward to welcome him; Jump up! clear out! And
as she spoke she tipped one of the minims off a chair, offering the
vacated seat to the gentleman, who, not noticing that it was a
nursing-chair, some three or four inches lower than usual,
plumped
into it after a peculiar fashion, a specimen of bathos far less
amusing to the young officer than to the infant Larkinses, who
burst into a very natural laugh.
Shut up! said the mother, reprovingly; you haven't a
grain o' manners! What must you blaat out so for? Then
turning to the Captain with an air of true maternal mortification,
she observed, I dare say you've noticed how much worse
children
always behave when there's company. Mine always act
like Sancho! How do you do, sir, and how's your folks?
This civility was delivered with an indescribable drawl, and
an accent which can never be expressed on paper.
Captain Maguire replied by giving satisfactory assurance of
his own health; but having a large family connection and no
particular home, perhaps thought it unnecessary to notice the
second branch of Mrs. Larkins' inquiry.
Miss Clifford meanwhile asked after friends in Montreal and
elsewhere, and entertained her dashing beau with all the ease and
grace that belonged to the drawing-rooms in which they had last
met. It was most amusing to note the air with which Anna ran
over the splendid names of her quondam friends, and contrast it
with the puzzled look which would make itself evident, spite of
power of face, in the countenance of her visitor. Never was
man more completely mystified.
At the very first pause, Mrs. Larkins, who was particularly
social, and who had seemed watching a chance to put in, asked
the Captain, with much earnestness, if he knew a man by the
name of Maguire, who had been in Canady in the last war
Was he any relation to the Captain? He used to peddle some
among the sojers around Montreal and those parts.
The Captain declared he did not recollect the gentleman, but
he had hundreds of Irish cousins, and thought it highly probable
that Mrs. Larkins' friend might be one of them.
Oh! he wasn't an Irishman at all! He was a very
respectable
man! said the lady.
Ah then! remarked the Captain, with perfect gravity, I'm
quite sure he can't be one of my cousins!
And Mrs. Larkins gravely replied, No, I dare say he wasn't;
but I thought I'd ask. What are you a cracklin' so between your
teeth? continued she, addressing Daniel Webster.
Oh! the bark of pork, replied the young gentleman.
Rind
, Webster, said Anna; you should say
rind
.
Well! rind, then, was the reply.
Mr. Larkins now brought in a huge armful of stove-wood,
which he threw into a corner with a loud crash.
Will there be as much wood as you'll want, Miss Clifford?
said he.
Yesquite enough, thank you, said Anna, composedly; I
have nearly finished the ironing.
At this, the Captain, with a look in which was concentrated the
essence of a dozen shrugs, took his leave, declaring himself quite
delighted to have found Miss Clifford looking so well.
We were no sooner in the open air than he beganand I did
not wonder
May I askwill you tell me, Madam, what is the meaning
of Miss Clifford's travestie? Is she masquerading for some
frolic
?
or is it a bet?for I know young ladies do bet,
sometimes
Neither, sir, I replied. Miss Clifford is, in sad and sober
earnest, filling the place of a servant, that she may procure the
necessaries of life for her family. More than one friend would
gladly offer aid in an emergency which we trust will be only
temporary, but Miss Clifford, with rare independence, prefers
devoting
herself as you have seen.
Bless my soul! what a noble girl! What uncommon spirit
and resolution! I never heard anything like it! Such a
splendid
creature to be so sacrificed! These and a hundred other
enthusiastic
expressions broke from the gay Captain, while I
recounted
some of the circumstances which had brought Mrs.
Clifford's
family to this low ebb; but as he pursued his trip to the
prairies the next morning without attempting to procure another
interview with the lady he so warmly admired, I came to the
conclusionnot a very uncharitable one, I hopethat Anna had
shown her usual acuteness in the estimate she had formed of his
character.
Perhaps the Captain thought his pay too trifling to be shared
with so exalted a heroine. But we must not complain, for his
mystified look and manner at Mrs. Larkins' affords us a
permanent
income of laughter, which is something in these dull times;
and I have learned, by means of his visit, that there is one really
independent woman in the world.
CHAPTER V.
DARKNESS AND LIGHT.
Time and tide had thus their sway,
Yielding, like an April day,
Smiling noon for sullen morrow,
Years of joy for hours of sorrow.
As levying day had come before it was expected, so selling
day, the time so dreaded by the affectionate daughters, came duly
on, and no tidings yet of Augustus. Many letters had been
forwarded
to his address in New York, and no answers arriving, the
anxiety of the family had been such as almost to drown all sense
of the hopeless, helpless destitution which now seemed to threaten
them. Being alone at this time, and wishing that whatever it
was possible to do might be done properly for Mrs. Clifford, I took
the liberty of sending for a neighbour, that is, a country
neighbour
one
who lived next door about four miles offa
gentleman
well versed in the law, though not practising
professionally
.
Mr. Edward Percival, this friend of ours, came into this
country
then
a land of promise indeedsome seven years since.
Having inherited a large tract of wild land, he chose to leave
great advantages behind him for the sake of becoming an
improver
a
plantera pioneerwhat not? There must be some
marvellous witchery in the idea of being a land-holder, if we may
judge by the number of people who undertake this wild, rough life
without the slightest necessity. Englishmen seem to be
peculiarly
attracted by the idea of unlimited shootinga privilege so
jealously
monopolized by the great in their own country; but with
our own citizens this is usually a matter of small interest. Be
the spell what it may, we shall not wish to see it reversed while
it brings us neighbours like Mr. Percival.
He came, he saw, he conqueredand Csar's victory must
pale by comparison, for Mr. Percival overcame a sheriff, and
obtained
an extension of time. I say he camethat was a matter
of course, seeing he was sent for by a lady. He sawbut I am
sadly afraid it was not the sight either of Mrs. Clifford or myself
that enlisted his sympathies so completely. He saw two very
lovely young ladiesfor Anna had easily obtained a furlough for
a day that she might comfort her mother and sister under their
trials. And Mr. Edward Percival, though no beau, was made
of penetrable stuff, and felt his heart strangely moved by the
unaffected sensibility and dutiful solicitude of those two
sad-hearted
daughters. By what particular course of strategy he
conquered
Sheriff Beals I have never learned, but I have understood
there is but one avenue to law-hardened hearts, and I suppose
some knowledge of the profession had endued Mr. Percival with
the acumen required for discovering this covered way.
The result was that Mrs. Clifford retained her fine old chased
gold watch, with its massive hook and crested seal, with several
other superfluities on which the law had laid its chill grasp;
and the two Miss Cliffords, though they did not fall at Mr.
Percival's
feet to thank him for his intervention, looked as if they
could have done so; and the gentleman himself, as he took his
leave, gave utterance to some consoling expressions, which fell
with strange warmth from lips usually very guarded. So all
was well thus far.
But Augustus came not. Anna returned to her householdry,
Mrs. Clifford to her reading, and Rose to her round of anxious
cares and painful economy. Another week wore awayanother
mail reached our Thule, and brought no tidings from the lost one.
Agonizing apprehensions were fast assuming the form of
certainties
,
and even Anna was yielding to despair, when Mr. Percival,
who had not failed to acquaint himself with the condition of
things, announced his intention of going to New York, and
offered his services in making the requisite inquiries after young
Clifford.
We have not been informed what urgent business called Mr.
Percival eastward, but conclude it to have been something sudden
and pressing, as he had returned from New York but a few weeks
before.
The suspense of our unhappy friends was destined to be
lengthened
out yet another week; but we need not detain our readers
proportionally. At the end of that period then, after Mrs. Clifford
and her daughters had renounced all thoughts but one, Mr.
Percival returned, bringing with him the long-lost son and
brother
;
or, rather, what might seem more the shadow than the
substance of the gallant youth who had left us some three months
before.
Poor Augustushis heart wrung, and his brain on the rack
when he left ushad been seized with a fever, so violent in its
symptoms, that no hotel at Buffalo would receive him, through
fear of infection. Other lodging places presenting the same
difficulty
,
he was at last placed with a poor coloured woman, on the
outskirts of the town; poverty, and perhaps a better motive,
inducing
her to overlook the danger. Here he was nursed, with the
tenderness so characteristic of that kind-hearted race, through a
course of typhus fever; and from the first he had never been
long enough himself to give the address of his friends. Tracing
him as far as Buffalo by means of the steamboat's books, Mr.
Percival had found no difficulty in discovering the place of his
retreat. The invalid was beginning to sit up a little, and had
written a few lines to his mother by the mail of that very day.
Need we say that our friends forgot even grinding poverty for
awhile?
Home, and the attentions of those we love, have wondrous
restorative
powers. Augustus gained strength rapidly, and exulted
in the change as only those who have
Long endured
A fever's agonies, and fed on drugs,
can exult, in the sunshine and the breeze. The exhilaration of
his spirits amounted almost to delirium. He would recount again
and again the kindness of his dark nurse, and in happy oblivion
of the narrowness of circumstances which drove him from home,
reiterate his schemes of gratitude to poor dear Chloeschemes
devised on a scale better befitting past than present fortunes. As
the exquisite sense of recovery subsided, however, care reasserted
her empire, and poor Augustus gradually sank into his former
condition of premature gravity.
Here, again, Mr. Percival's affairs seemed to favour our young
friend strangely; for while Augustus had been gaining strength
and losing spirits, that gentleman made the discovery that he was
in pressing want of an assistant in his business. He had great
tracts of land in far-away counties, calling for immediate
attention
;
there was a great amount of overcharged taxes which must
be argued down (if possible) at various offices; he had distant
and very slippery debtorsin short, just such a partner as
Augustus
Clifford would make was evidently indispensable; and,
Augustus got well.
Anna had come home to help nurse her brother, but with such
positive promise of return, that Mr. Larkins did not go
girl-hunting
,
but mixed griddle-cakes and dressed the children unrepiningly
during the interregnum. When Augustus recovered, the secret
of the weekly dollar was confided to him, and Anna prepared for
going back to her place. The brother was naturally very
averse to this, and laboured hard to persuade her that he should
now be able to make all comfortable without this terrible sacrifice.
But she persisted in fulfilling her engagement, and, moreover,
declared that it really was not a sacrifice worth naming.
Look at your hands, dear Anna! said Rose.
Oh! I do look at thembut what then? Of what possible
use are white satin hands in the country? I should have browned
them with gardening, if nothing else; and when once Uncle
Hargrave's
money comes, a few weeks' gloving will make a lady of
me again.
But Mr. Percival, I am sure Rose tried to whisper, but
Anna would not hear her, and only ran away the faster.
By and by, Uncle Hargrave's legacy did come, and whether
by a gloving process or not, it was not long before Anna's hands
recovered their beauty. Mrs. Larkins lost the best help she
ever had, and Anna at length told all to her mother, who learned
more by means of this effort of her daughter, than all her
misfortunes
had been able to teach her.
The legacy, like many a golden dream, had been tricked out
by the capricious wand of Fancy. In its real and tangible form,
14
far from enabling Mrs. Clifford to return to city splendour, it
proved so moderate in size that she was obliged to perceive that a
comfortable home even in the country would depend, in some
degree, on economy and good management. Certainty being
thus substituted for the vague and glittering phantom which had
misled her, and helped to benumb her naturally good
understanding
,
she set herself about the work of reform with more vigour
than could have been anticipated; and an expression of quiet
happiness again took possession of faces which had long been
saddened by present or dreaded evils.
Strange to say, Mr. Edward Percival, by nature the most frank,
manly, straightforward person in the world, seems lately to have
taken a manuvring turn. After showing very unmistakable
signs of an especial admiration of Mrs. Larkins' girl, he
scarce ventures to offer her the slightest attention. At the same
time, his interest in the ponderous mamma is remarkable, to say
the least. Hardly a fine day passes that does not see a certain
low open carriage at Mrs. Clifford's door, and a grave but gallant
cavalierhandsome and well-equippedsoliciting the old lady's
company for a short drive. This is certainly a very delicate
mode of mesmerizing a young lady, but it is not without effect.
Anna does not go to sleepfar from it! but her eyelids are
observed to droop more than usual, and choice flowers, which
come almost daily from the mesmerizer's green-house, are very
apt to find their way from the parlour vase to the soft ringlets of
the lovely sleep-waker. What these signs may portend we must
leave to the scientific.
Mr. Percival came from the very heart's core of Yankeeland;
he may say with Barlow,
All my bones are made of Indian corn
he is a conscientious Presbyterian, and he has been four years a
widower. All these disabilities have been duly represented to
Miss Clifford; nayI will not aver that they may not even have
been wickedly dwelt uponthrown in her teeth, as it were, by
one who loves to tease such victims; and I have come to the
conclusion, which Anna herself suggested to me the other day,
hiding at the same time her blushing face on my shoulder, after a
confidential chit-chat, There certainly is a fate in these things.
AN EMBROIDERED FACT.
All
the stories in this volume are from the lifeeither in facts
or characters, or both; but the one which succeeds is as nearly
a transcript of actual reality, as could well be without giving
names and dates. The ride and its objectthe suspicionthe
pursuitthe arrestand the denouementwere described to
me by the hero himself, ere yet the memory of the toilsome
winning
of his beautiful bride had lost any of its freshness.
What the phrenologists call approbativeness is an excellent
development, but we may have it too full. People born without it
are intolerablethose who have a superabundance, pay dearly
enough for being agreeable. They win, without conscious effort,
instinctively, as it were,golden opinions from those with
whom they associate; and too good a reputation is sometimes a
severe tax in more ways than one. As with other luxuries, it
costs a good deal to support it. One of our friends got rid of his,
inadvertently. We have the story from himself, only adding some
explanations of our own.
George Elliott had, from his childhood, been the model of all
excellence
among his own family. His parents had other children,
and they all did very much as they pleased, not having set out
with a character to support. They did not always please to
prefer
what was wisest; and then they were sure of a lecture, to
which George's prudence and self-government afforded the text.
George must have been really a good fellow, for his brothers
loved him in spite of his position; and as for his sisters, they
thought no mortal man, and hardly even Thaddeus of Warsaw,
approached
him in excellence. He was, in truth, less spoiled by this
general homage than was to be expected. The shape of his head
was not improved by the cultivation of a faculty which shows
itself
in squaring out the head just on each side the crown; but
his black hair hid the superfluity, and the ceaseless good humour
that beamed from his eyes, joined to a fine ruddy complexion and
white teeth, made him an Adonis in the eyes of all the young
ladies
of the neighbourhood. Not a house but was open to him
not a mamma but smiled upon him. He was already well to
do, and such qualities as his promised constant bettering.
But here, again, George experienced the disadvantage of
being
too well liked. The invariable welcome which awaited him,
the capital footing on which he stood with the mammas and papas,
and the fear that whenever he should select a special partner, it
would be at the expense of a large amount of friendship and
attention
,
had kept him undecided until five-and-twenty; and, we fear,
a little too well satisfied with himself to promise uncommonly well
as a husband.
Among his perfections,in his father's eyes, at least,was a
strict and energetic attention to matters of business. He was the
factotum in every affair requiring peculiar skill and discretion.
He travelled, he negotiated, he advised. Never was there an
eldest son on whose indomitable prudence a father could rely so
completely
.
Was a hard thing to be said, George must say it
because
George could say it without hurting any body's feelings.
Was a slippery debtor to be approached, George was the
messenger
;
and if it proved necessary to follow the defaulter to
Texas, he never flinched, and generally returned with man or
money. We will not say that such trusts were always
agreeable
;
indeed, we have already hinted that our friend sometimes
found his reputation rather costly. But developments are fate,
and his approbativeness kept on growing.
Once upon a time, when affairs called George from home, he
was about to pass the night in a village, about sixty-five miles
from his father's residence. There was no one to visit, for he
knew none but the gentleman with whom his business lay; and
he strolled out after tea, as men will when they have nothing else
to do, not exactly seeking adventure, but in a mood of mind to be
well pleased with any thing that should occur, to help off the
evening. He paced the bank of the noisy little privilege that
turned the grist-mill, the carding machine and the trip hammer,
which formed the wealth of the village, until the light had faded
to that pleasant gray which we poetically call dusk; and he was
about returning to the inn to read the newspaper over again, when
a wild-looking girl, with a shawl over her head, accosted him.
They want you, up yander, she said, in a mumbling and
embarrassed tone.
George's eyes followed the direction of the thick red finger,
and rested upon a pretty cottage on the side of a hill, at no great
distance.
Who wants me? There must be some mistake.
The girl stood perfectly still, staring straight forward.
Who is it that wishes to see me? repeated George. Whom
were you told to ask for?
You're the one, said the messenger, confidently. I've
forgot
the name.
Was it Elliott? asked George.
Yes, said the messenger; they want you right off.
Musingly did George follow the girl up the hillside, perfectly
convinced of the impracticability of getting any thing more out
of her, and tolerably certain that he could not be the person in
requisition. Why did he go then? We have already said that
he was born to oblige, and also that he found the Templeville
hotel
somewhat dull.
The clumsy-footed emissary turned into a little court, full of
spring flowers, and passing through a porch shaded to perfect
darkness by climbing plants, opened a door on the right. The
room thus disclosed was a pretty rural parlour, on the sofa of
which lay a young girl in a white wrapper, with an elderly lady
sitting by her side.
Here he is, said the girl; I've fetched 'um.
The young lady startedthe elder screamed outright.
Who is this? said the more ancient, turning to the girl with
an annihilating frown, and seeming entirely to forget that the
young man
might
be innocent, and was therefore entitled to decent
treatment.
I perceive there has been some mistake, madam, began our
discomfited incomparable.
Mistake! Oh yes, I dare say! muttered the guardian,
with a most unbelieving air. Then turning to the stupid maid,
she proceeded to scold her in an under tone, but with
inconceivable
rapidity and sharpness, while George stood most uneasily
waiting the result. He felt inclined to disappear at once, but that
course seemed liable to further misconstruction; and he was,
moreover, rather attracted by the invalid, who, though
embarrassed
,
lost not her ladylike self-possession.
The girl is newly come to us, and quite ignorant, she said,
in rather a deprecatory tone. She was sent for our physician,
and must have mistaken you
Oh, very likely, interrupted the elder lady, who forgot to
scold the maid as soon as the young lady ventured to speak to
George. Doctor Beasley, with his bald head and one eye, is
exceedingly like this gentleman! Quite probable that Hetty
mistook the one for the other!
The air of incredulity with which this was said could not be
mistaken; but the implication was one which it was impossible
to notice under the circumstances; and George concluded that
the only course left for him was to make his bow and leave his
character behind him.
As he turned, with his hat in his hand, a letter fell from it to
the floor, unobserved by him in his embarrassment. He had not
cleared the porch, when the maid ran after him with it.
Here, Mister, they say they don't want none of yer letters.
George looked in his hat, found he must have dropt a letter,
and took it, though it was now too dark to examine it. Here
was a new confirmation of the evident suspicions of the
lady-dragon
as to some designs upon her fair charge.
Is it singular that a conviction began to dawn upon his mind
that the said charge must possess considerable attractions?
Don't touch that thing upon the table, says grandmamma, to
the little one who is quietly playing on the floor.
No, grandma, says the youth, and immediately leaves his
play to get up and walk round and round the table, trying to
reach the prohibited article.
George the prudent slept little that night. The young lady's
eyes and voice, the delicate and languid grace of her figure, as
she lay extended in evident feebleness on the sofa, rather unhinged
his philosophy; and he was, besides, not a little troubled by the
recollection of the spiteful air of the duenna, and the probability
that the error had cost the fair invalid some discomfort.
Altogether
,
there was food for reverie; and a hasty, unrefreshing
morning slumber had not made amends for a wakeful night,
when he was aroused by the breakfast bell.
Inquiries respecting the people of the cottage elicited only the
interesting information, that there was an oldish woman, and a
young gal, which added little to George's knowledge. The
innkeeper guessed they were pretty likely folks, but couldn't
say, as they had not been there long.
George went home, but said nothing of his adventure. He
said he did not think it worth while. But he thought it worth
while, two weeks afterwards, to travel the sixty-five miles which
lay between his home and Templeville, just to try whether the
landlord might not have discovered something beyond the
interesting
facts before ascertained as to the young gal and her
duenna.
But the innkeeper had added nothing to his store of information
on this point, except the conclusion that the people on the hill
were fore-handed folks, and that there was a man who came
once in a while to see them and brought them lots of things.
A man! said George. Ah yes, (very unconcernedly, of
course;) of what ageabout?
Oh, he always comes in the evening, and is off again early
in the morning. Their help guesses he's an uncle or something.
Not much enlightened, even yet, George adopted the desperate
resolution of trying boldly for an acquaintance. He judged it
absolutely necessary to inquire after the health of the invalid.
So, writing a civil card of inquiry, he walked up to the pretty
cottage, and, after reconnoitering a little, rapped at the door, and
awaited the coming of the stupid maid, with a trepidation quite
new to his quiet and well-assured frame of mind.
What was his dismay when the aunt herself, with a face of
iron, opened the door.
George was completely at a loss for the moment. The card
was in his hand, but he could not offer it to the lady, so he
stammered
out something of his wish to inquire after the health of the
family, and to express his regret for the misunderstanding on the
former occasion.
Rigid was the brow with which the careful dame heard this
announcement, and wiry were the muscles which held the door
half shut, as if defying a forty-young-man power of getting in
without consent of the owner.
We're all quite well, I thank you, she said, closing her lips
as tightly as possible as soon as she had communicated the
information
.
George stood still, and the lady stood as still as he. She looked
at the distant hills, and he at the door which had once disclosed to
him the reclining figure in white. At length, finding it in vain to
attempt wearying the grim portress into an invitation to enter this
enchanted castle, he turned off in despair, when the young lady
came through the gate, as if just returning from a walk.
George darted towards her, but the elder lady scarce allowed
time for a word.
Come, Julia, she said, it is quite time you came in.
The young lady looked at George with a scarce perceptible
smile, and such a comical expression, that their acquaintance
seemed ripened in a moment.
I must say good morning, said she, in a rather low tone, but
so decidedly, that George, perceiving any attempt for a longer
interview to be hopeless, put his card into her hand and departed
not without a secret vow that he would yet baffle the duenna.
The sixty-five miles seemed rather long this time, and his father
remarked upon the difficulties which he must have encountered,
to account for a two days' absence, and such a worn-out air.
Yet all this time George persuaded himself that it was not
worth
while
to mention his new acquaintance. He, with his old head
upon young shoulders,pattern of nice young men!to find
himself interested in a chance acquaintanceto be suspected by
an ancient lady of designs upon her niece, and what was worse,
to be conscious of a strong desire to furnish some foundation for
such suspicions! Oh, it was too much! Pattern people find it
so hard to come down to a neighbourly level with common, erring
mortals! George found it easier to learn to perform the
Templeville
trip in the space of twenty-four hours, although it was, in
reality, pretty good work for twice that time. In truth, it began
to be necessary for him to take Templeville in his way to any
point of the compass; and, at last, chance, or some other power
that favours the determined, gave him an unexpected advantage.
It was the elder lady's turn to be an invalid, and, while she
was, perhaps, enjoying an interview with the veritable Dr.
Beasley
,
his former unwitting representative espied the now blooming
cheeks of the young lady among other roses in a pretty little
arbour in the garden.
The garden walls are high, and hard to climb, said Juliet
once; and the pretty Julia of our story might have said much
the same thing of the picket fence which separated her from her
new friend. But George was on the other side of it before she
could have had time to quote the line.
Could two young people, who met in this romantic sort of way,
in these unromantic times,and after many a momentary
interview
,
cut short by the cares of a duenna, too,fail to find some
very particular subjects of conversation? We ask the initiated,
not pretending to be
au fait
in these matters. However this may
be, it must have been that very visit that enlightened George
Elliott as to the young lady's position.
She was the prospective heiress of a bachelor uncle, who, in
consequence of a violent prejudice against matrimony, had vowed
all practicable vengeance in case she ventured to engage herself
before the mature age of twenty-five, full six years of which were
yet to come. A very liberal provision, which this same odd uncle
allowed to the elder lady, Mrs. Roberts, who was his sister only
by marriage, was made dependent upon the same point.
Now, the natural consequence of all this was, first, an
irresistible
inclination on Julia's part to fall in love, just for the sake of
seeing whether her uncle would keep his word; and, secondly,
from the extreme prudence of the aunt leading her to take up
her residence in a region of clodhoppers, an inevitable proclivity
of the damsel to fancy the very first tall, dark-eyed, personable
youth who should come in her way. We are not sure that Julia
told George all this. We give it merely as a comment of our
own, by way of
avis au lecteur
.
The garden interview was prolonged until the ruddy-fingered
serving-maid was sent to seek Miss Julia; and as George was,
on that occasion, put behind a thicket of lilacs for the moment,
we infer that a considerable degree of intimacy had by this time
been established between the young people.
Peaches were like little green velvet buttons when George was
first mistaken for Dr. Beasley, and before they were ripe, he had
learned to think it a small matter to ride one hundred and thirty
miles in twenty-four hours, for the sake of spending an hour or
two in the cottage garden at Templeville, and occasionally getting
a cup of tea from the unwilling fingers of Mrs. Roberts.
He had, in the mean time, become the object of much remark
at home. He had always been fond of a good horse, and rather
celebrated for his equestrian skill; but people began to call him
a jockey nowso many fine animals did he purchase, and so
many did he discard again after only one trial on the Templeville
road. The difficulty of breaking the subject at home had become
greater with every visit, and our mirror of prudence had nearly
persuaded Julia that her uncle's fortune was of no sort of
consequence
,
and a six year's probation quite out of the question,
before he could resolve to tell his father that he was about to
marry a penniless young lady and her not very agreeable aunt
Mrs. Roberts being, of course, to be taken (fasting) with her niece.
While the disclosure was yet to make, a letter came for Mr.
George Elliott, postmarked Templeville, and directed in a
prodigious
scrawl with a very fine pena young-lady-like attempt
at disguise which could not but draw attention at a country
post-office
,
if any body could have suspected so prudent a youth of
clandestine proceedings. This epistle, being opened, was found
to contain only a few lines, most cautiously worded, to inform Mr.
George Elliott that suspicions of treachery and fears of
consequent
calamity made a friend of his very miserable. Further
specifications, diplomatically urged, gave Mr. Elliott to understand
that the uncle was expected, and that there was reason to suppose
he had been induced to plan a sudden removal of the cottagers to
a far distant and (of course) inaccessible part of the country.
The rising sun of the next morning saw Elliott making
tracks for Templeville, most literally; for the fierce pace of his
gallant steed indented itself upon the moist soil in a striking
manner
.
He must reach there in the afternoon at all hazards; and,
although he had more than once performed the same feat before,
he was now so anxious lest some accident should cause delay,
that he pushed on with unwonted vehemence. He had twice
changed horses, and had passed through a small village about
twenty miles from Templeville, when the people on the road
noticed
that he was closely pursued by two horsemen in fiery haste.
George rode like the Wild Huntsman, and his pursuers were
nearly as well mounted. At every point they inquired how far
the maker of those dashing tracks was in advance of them, and
their breathless questions were always answered in such terms as
induced them to hope their chase was nearly at an end. They
spared neither whip nor spur, therefore; but their horses were
not so well used to that rate of travel, and one of them gave out
entirely just as they entered Templeville, with our tired hero full
in sight.
George reached the tavern, and went, as was his wont,
immediately
to the stables, to see his horse cared for. He examined
several stalls before he chose one, and was giving his directions
to the ostler when he was rather roughly accosted by two
persons
,
who took their places on either side of him, and began in
very aggressive style asking him various questions. Our
prudent
friend was not, we regret to say, a member of the peace
society
;
and he responded to these inquiries in a way which
threatened difficulties in the pursuit of knowledge.
The crowd increased every moment. The whole town of
Templeville seemed congregated in the stable-yard. There he
is! That's him! That's the chap! I'd know him for a
thief, anywhere! were the cheering exclamations that met
Elliott's
ear on every side.
Not to dwell unnecessarily on particulars, we may say at once
that the elder of these gentlemen had been robbed of a
pocketbook
,
containing a large sum of money, and that circumstances
favoured the idea that the thief had taken the Templeville road.
George's hard riding pointed him out as the delinquent; and his
having gone into several stalls on his first arrival, led the
bystanders
to suppose he had been seeking for a place to secrete his booty.
We need not notice Elliott's indignant denials of the charge.
The old gentleman took very little notice of them, indeed. He
rather advised him (as a friend) to give up the pocket-book at
once, without attempting to deceive a person of his astuteness.
George, who was anxious beyond every thing to be on his way to
the cottage, and who, likewise, felt exceedingly unwilling to call
upon his only acquaintance in the village, knowing that would be
to insure a faithful report of the whole affair at home, offered to
submit to a search, provided it might be performed in private and
without unnecessary delay. To this, after some consultation, the
old gentleman agreed; and the landlord, (who, by the way,
disclaimed
all knowledge of the accused, except that he had made a
great many inquiries as to the people at the cottage,) was
showing
the way through the crowd to an inner room, when George
encountered Mr. Henderson, the person to whom he was known.
All chance of escaping recognition was now at an end, and it
became evident to George Elliott that, in addition to the loss of
consideration by an imprudent marriage, he must expect a good
deal of hard joking on the subject of hard riding. The gaping
crowd, commenting audibly upon every point of his physiognomy
and equipment, and agreeing,
nem. con.
, that he had state prison
written upon his face if ever a fellow had, was nothing, compared
with the keen sense of mortification which came with every
thought of home. Julia's power, however, was irresistible; and
George, perceiving that Mr. Henderson knew his accuser,
requested
an introduction, which was accordingly performed, to the
great discomfiture of the old gentleman, who became unpleasantly
sensible that his wild goose chase had led him a great way from
his lost money, ruined a fine horse, and brought him into very
unpleasant
circumstances with a young gentleman, who, upon close
examination, did not look half so much like a gallows-bird as he
had supposed.
Upon my word and honour, sir, said the old gentleman,
wiping
his forehead with an air of the greatest perplexity, I am
extremely
sorry for this mistake. If I can make you any amends,
this gentleman, Mr. Henderson, will answer for me, that I shall
be happy to offer any atonement in my power.
George, of course, disclaimed any such wish, and, only
anxious
to see Julia, he shook hands with his accuser and hurried off.
Before he shut the door, the old gentleman stopped him. Will
you do me the favour to tell me, before we part, what possible
inducement
you could have for riding at such a pace?
George laughed, said he was fond of fast riding, and
disappeared
.
Julia, in tears, and all the despair of nineteen, met George
with the intelligence that her aunt, after appearing to favour
them, must have played them false, and induced the uncle to
insist
upon an immediate change of residence.
To-morrow morning, she said, we are to leave here, for
ever. My uncle has already arrived, and we should have set off
this evening, but for the circumstance of his having been robbed
on his way hither.
Robbed? said George.
Yes. He is now in pursuit of the thief, and will not
probably
return before night.
As Julia said this, sobbing all the time as if her little heart
would break, not for her uncle's loss, but her own woes, the door
opened, and George's new acquaintance walked in.
Hey-day, hey-day, here's a pretty affair! This is the nice
youth that has persuaded you to throw away your bread and
butter
,
is it?
Then, coming nearer, and taking a better look at George, who
had thrown off the India-rubber overcoat which western men are
wont to wear when showers are probable, he burst into a hearty
laugh as he recognized the object of his former suspicions.
So it wasn't my pocket-book you wanted, sir? said he.
No, sir, said George, glad of so good an opening for his suit,
No, sir; it is your niece, without any pocket-book at all.
Will you take her without?
With all my heart and soul!
In one year from this time I will not object, on those terms,
said the old gentleman.
But he probably thought he owed some reparation for his hasty
accusation, for, when the year was out, George got the niece and
the pocket-book too; but he could not regain his reputation as
the mirror of prudence. We have never heard, however, that
this detracted materially from his happiness.
BITTER FRUITS FROM CHANCE-SOWN SEEDS.
In
an attempt at mere fiction, I should scarcely have ventured
upon the invention of a chain of circumstances so improbable as
those which form the groundwork of the following sketch. We
accept the axiom that Truth is often stranger than fiction; yet
the mind instinctively refuses sympathy when fiction ventures too
far beyond the bounds of our own experience or observation.
Men are usually supposed to be actuated by sufficient motives,
and by those which correspond, in some degree, with the springs
of action in their kind at large; and where we see a striking
departure
from this general rule, we are apt to class the erratic
somewhere in the many-graded list of the insanea list which
has, of late years, been made, by some speculators, long and
wide enough to include Rousseau and Byron, as well as the
most fiendish murderer, and any divine who ventures to look
over the pale of his church.
Those who are acquainted with the peculiar tone of society in
the new country may not, perhaps, find my characters
unnatuarl
;
but it can hardly be expected that others would not doubt
the truth of a description which supposes such deep-seated enmity
towards those who had committed no offence, and such intolerable
wrongs suffered without a possibility of legal redress. In ancient
feudal times, small excuse served when the superior chose to vent
his evil passions upon those whom Fate had rendered subject to
his caprice. At this day, in the newly settled part of the
Western
country, the feudality is reversed; and it is the inferior who
has it in his power, by means of an unenlightened or corrupt
public
sentiment, (referring always with more or lese distinctness to
brute force,) to lord it over any one who, by an inconvenient
integrity
,
or an unpopular refinement, is rendered obnoxious to those
who are more disposed to resent than to imitate what pretends to
superiority. Thus much for the probability of what may
naturally
be expected to shock the credulity of the reader.
As to the main facts of the casethe character of the
Coddington
familytheir adoption of the young girlthe unprovoked
enmity
of the Blanchardstheir threats and plotsthe catastrophe
to which they contributedand the unsatisfactory result of the
effort to obtain justicethese were all communicated to me
circumstantially
,
(by an intelligent friend who had resided near the
spot where the occurrences took place,) as a sort of psychological
problem which, even in that country it was not easy to solve.
The same friend afterwards sent me a newspaper published in
the same county, in which various details were given, to which
details was appended a public protest of the aggrieved party, with
other matters touching the caseall which remained
uncontradicted
so far as I have ever heard.
I should not have occupied so much time with these
explanatory
remarks, but for objections which have been made to the
probability of my story. The old man, though sketched from life,
is introduced here arbitrarily, to supply what was wanting as to
the origin of the young girl who exhibited traits so remarkable.
Nothing of her parentage has reached me; but it seems natural
to suppose that a soul which partook of the passionate and poetic
energy of a Sappho, must have been moulded by no common lot.
One can scarcely imagine the descendant of a line of sober
farmers
,
kindling into a love as ideal as that of Petrarch, and
pouring
out her feelings in poetic measures like an Improvisatrice, in
a mental climate too frigid to call into life any but irrepressible
germs of genius. Smothered fire there must have been
some-where
,
among our Julia's rough ancestry. I have supposed it to
descend to her through the old Indian-killer, from the more
genial
and impulsive South.
CHAPTER I.
Eyes which can but ill define
Shapes that rise about and near,
Through the far horizon's line
Stretch a vision free and clear;
Memories feeble to retrace
Yesterday's immediate flow,
Find a dear familiar face
In each hour of long ago.
Milnes
.
In
wandering through the woods where solitude seems to hold
undivided reign, so that one learns to fancy companionable
qualities
in the flowers, and decided sympathetic intelligence in the
bright-eyed squirrel, it is not uncommon to find originals odd
enough to make the fortune of a human menagerie, such as will
doubtless form, at no distant day, a new resource for the curious.
If any of the experimental philosophers of the day should
undertake
a collection of this nature, I recommend the woods of the
West as a hopeful field for the search. Odd people are odder in
the country than in town, because there is nothing like collision
to smooth down their salient points, and because solitude is the
nurse of reverie, which is well known to be the originator of many
an erratic freak. There is a foster relationship, at least between
solitude and oddity, and nowhere is this more evident than in the
free and easy new country. A fair specimen used to thrive in a
certain green wood, not a thousand miles from this spot; a veteran
who bore in his furrowed front the traces of many a year of
hardship
and exposure, and whose eyes retained but little of the
twinkling
light which must have distinguished them in early life, but
which had become submerged in at least a twilight darkness,
which scarce allowed him to distinguish the light of a candle.
His limbs were withered, and almost useless; his voice shrunk to
a piping treble, and his trembling hands but imperfectly performed
their favourite office of carrying a tumbler to his lips. His tongue
alone escaped the general decay; and in this one organ were
concentrated (as it is with the touch in cases of blindness,) the
potency of all the rest. If we may trust his own account, his
adventures had been only less varied and wonderful, than those
of Sinbad or Baron Munchausen. But we used sometimes to
think distance may be the source of deception, in matters of time
as well as of space, and so made due allowance for faulty
perspective
in his reminiscences.
His house was as different from all other houses, as he himself
was from all other men. It was shaped somewhat like a beehive;
and, instead of ordinary walls, the shingles continued in
uninterrupted
courses from the peak to the ground. At one side was a
stick chimney, and this was finished on the top by the remnant
of a stone churn; whether put there to perform the legitimate
office of a chimney-pot, or merely as an architectural ornament, I
cannot say. It had an
unique
air, at any rate, when one first
espied it after miles of solitary riding, where no tree had fallen,
except those which were removed in making the road. A
luxuriant
hop-vine crept up the shingles until it wound itself around
this same broken churn, and then, seeking further support, the
long ends still stretched out in every direction, so numerous and
so lithe, that every passing breeze made them whirl like
greenrobed
fairies dancing hornpipes about the chimney, in preparation
for a descent upon the inhabitants below.
At the side opposite the chimney, was a sort of stair-case,
scarcely more than a ladder, leading to the upper chamber,
carried
up outside through lack of room in the little cottage; and
this airy flight was the visible sign of a change which took place
in the old man's establishment, towards the latter part of his life.
A grand-daughter, the orphan of his only son, had come to him
in utter destitution, and this made it necessary to have a second
apartment in the shingled hive; so the stairs were built outside
as we have said, and Julia Brand was installed in the wee
chamber
to which it led. She was a girl of twelve, perhaps, at this
time, and soon became all in all to her aged relative. But we
will put her off for the present, that we may recall at more length
our recollections of old Richard Brand. The race of rough old
pioneers, to which he belonged, was fast passing away; and
emigration
15
and improvement are sweeping from the face of the land,
every trace of their existence. The spirit by which they were
animated has no fellowship with steamboats and railroads; their
pleasures were not increased but diminished by the rapid
accession
of population, for whom they had done much to prepare
the way. The younger and hardier of their number felt
themselves
elbowed, and so pressed onward to the boundless prairies
of the far West; the old shrunk from contact with society, and
gathered themselves, as if to await the mighty hunter in
characteristic
fashion. Old Brand belonged to the latter class. He
looked ninety; but much allowance must be made for winter
storms and night-watches, and such irregularities and exposure as
are sure to keep an account against man, and to score their
demands
upon his body, both within and without.
We have said that the house had a wild and strange look, and
the aspect of the tenant of the little nest was that of an old wizard.
He would sit by the side of the door, enjoying the sunshine, and
making marks on the sand with the long staff which seldom
quitted his feeble hands, while his favourite cat purred at his feet,
or perched herself on his shoulder, rubbing herself against his
grey locks, unreproved. Weird and sad was his silent aspect;
but once set him talking, or place in his hands his battered violin,
and you would no longer find
silence
tiresome. One string was
generally all that the instrument could boast; but that one, like
the tongue of the owner, performed more than its share. It
could say,
Hey, Betty Martin, tip-toe, tip-toe,
Hey, Betty Martin, tip-toe fine:
Can't get a husband to please her, please her,
Can't get a husband to please her mind!
as plain as any human lips and teeth could make the same
taunting
observation; but if you ventured to compare the old magician
to Paganini, Humph! he would say, with a toss of his little
grey head, ninny I may be, but pagan I a'n't, any how; for do
I eat little babies, and drink nothing but water?
Nobody ever ventured to give an affirmative answer to either
branch of this question; so the old man triumphed in the
refutation
of the slander.
Directly in front of the door by which old Brand usually sat,
was a pit, four or five feet deep, perhaps, and two feet in diameter
at the top, and still wider at the bottom, where it was strewn with
broken bottles and jugs. (Mr. Brand had, by some accident,
good store of these.) This pit was generally covered during the
day, but for many years the platform was at night drawn within
the door, with all the circumspection that attended the raising of
a draw-bridge before a castle gate in ancient times.
Is that a wolf-trap? inquired an uninitiated guest. An
explosion
of laughter met this truly
green
question.
A wolf-trap! O! massy! what a wolf-hunter you be! You
bought that 'ere fine broadcloth coat out of bounty money, didn't
ye? How I should laugh to see ye where our Jake was once,
when he war'n't more than twelve year old! You'd grin till a
wolf would be a fool to ye! I had a real wolf-trap then,
I
tell
ye! There had been a wolf around, that was the hungriest
critter
you ever heard tell on. Nobody pretended to keep a sheep,
and as for little pigs, they war'n't a circumstance. He'd eat a
litter in one night. Well! I dug my trap plenty deep enough,
and all the dirt I took out on't was laid up o' one side,
slantindicler
,
up hill like, so as to make the jump a pretty good one; and
then the other sides was built up close with logs. It was a sneezer
of a trap. So there I baited and baited, and watched and waited;
but pigs was plenty where they was easier come at, and no wolf
came. By-and-by our old yellow mare died, and what does I do
but goes and whops th' old mare into the trap. `There!' says I
to Jake, says I, `that would catch th' old Nick; let's see what
the old wolf 'll say to it.' So the next night we watch'd, and it
war'n't hardly midnight, when the wolf come along to go to the
hog-pen. He scented old Poll quick enough; and I tell ye! the
way he went into the trap war'n't slow. It was jist as a young
feller falls in love; head over heels. Well! now the question
was, how we should kill the villain; and while we was a
consultin'
about that, and one old hunter proposin' one thing, and
another another, our Jake says to me, says he, `Father,' says he,
`I've got a plan in my head that I know'll do! I'll bang him
over the head with this knotty stick.' And before you could say
Jack Robinson, in that tarnal critter jump'd, and went at him.
It was a tough battle,
I
tell ye! The wolf grinned; but Jake he
never stopped to grin, but put it on to him as cool as a cowcumber,
till he got so he could see his brains, and then he was satisfied.
`Now pull me out!' says little Jake, says he, `And I tell ye what!
if it
a'n't
daylight, I want my breakfast!' And Jake was a show,
any how! What with his own scratches and the spatters of the
wolf's blood, he look'd as if the Indians had scalped him all over.
But what is
this
hole for? persisted the visiter, who found
himself as far from the point as ever.
Did you ever see a Indian? said the wizard.
No! oh yes; I saw Black Hawk and his party, at
Washington
Black Hawk! ho, ho, ho! and Tommy Hawk too, I 'spose!
Indians dress'd off to fool the big bugs up there! But
I
mean
real
IndiansIndians at home, in the woodsdevils that's as
thirsty for white men's blood as painters!
[9]
[9]
Panthers.
Why, when I come
first into the Michig
an
, they were as thick as huckleberries.
We didn't mind shooting 'em any more than if they'd had four legs.
That's a foolish law that won't let a man kill an Indian! Some
people pretend to think the niggers haven't got souls, but for my
part I
know
they have; as for Indians, it's all nonsense! I was
brought up right in with the blacks. My father own'd a real
raft on 'em, and they was as human as any body. When my
father died, and every thing he had in the world wouldn't half
pay his debts, our old Momma Venus took mother home to her
cabin, and done for her as long as she lived. Not but what we
boys helped her as much as we could, but we had nothing to
begin
with, and never had no larnin'. I was the oldest, and father
died when I was twelve year old, and he hadn't begun to think
about gettin' a schoolmaster on the plantation. I used to be in
with our niggers, that is, them that used to be ours; and though
I'd lick'd 'em and kick'd 'em many a time, they was jist as good
to me as if I'd been their own colour. But I wanted to get some
larnin', so I used to lie on the floor of their cabins, with my head
to the fire, and so study a spellin'-book some Yankees had gi'n
me, by the light of the pine knots and hickory bark. The
Yankee
people was good friends to me too, and when I got old enough,
some on 'em sent me down to New Orleans with a flat, loaded
with flour and bacon.
Now in them days there was no goin' up and down the
Mississippi
in comfort, upon 'count of the Spaniards. The very first
village I came to, they hailed me and asked for my pass. I told
'em the niggers carried passes, but that I was a free-born
American
,
and didn't need a pass to go any where upon airth. So I
took no further notice of the whiskerandoes, till jist as I turn'd the
next pint, what should I see but a mud fort, and a passel of sojers
gettin' ready to fire into me. This looked squally, and I come to.
They soon boarded me, and had my boat tied to a tree and my
hands behind my back before you could whistle. I told the boy
that was with me to stick by and see that nothing happened to the
cargo, and off I went to prison; nothing but a log-prison, but
strong as thunder, and only a trap-door in the roof. So there I
was, in limbo, tucked up pretty nice. They gi'n me nothing to
eat but stale corn bread and pork rinds; not even a pickle to
make it go down. I think the days was squeez'd out longer, in
that black hole, than ever they was in Greenland. But there's
an end to most everything, and so there was to that. As good luck
would have it, the whiskerando governor came along down the
river and landed at the village, and hearin' of the Yankee, (they
call'd me a Yankee 'cause I was clear white,) hearin' that there
was a Yankee in the man-trap, he order'd me before him. There
he jabber'd away, and I jabber'd as fast as he did; but he was a
gentleman, and gentlemen is like free-masons, they can
understand
each other all over the world. So the governor let me go,
and then he and the dons that were with him, walk'd down with
me to my craft, and gave me to understand they wanted to buy
some o' my fixins. So I roll'd 'em out a barrel of flour, and flung
up a passel of bacon, till they made signs there was enough, and
then the governor he pull'd out his gold-netted purse to pay me.
I laughed at him for thinkin' I would take pay from one that had
used me so well; and when he laid the money upon a box slily,
I tied it up in an old rag and chucked it ashore to him after I
pushed off; so he smil'd and nodded to me, and Peleg and I we
took off our hats and gi'n him a rousin' hurrah, and I thought
that was the last I should see on him. But lo and behold! when
I got to New Orleans, there was my gentleman got there before
me, and remitted all government costs and charges, and found
buyers for my perduce and my craft, and like to have bought
me too. But I lik'd the bush, so I took my gun and set off afoot
through the wilderness, and found my way home again, with my
money all safe. When I come to settle with the Yankees, there
was a good slice for me and mother, so I come off to buy a tract
in the Michig
an
. I come streakin' along till I got to the Huron
river, and undertook to swim that with my clothes on and my
money tied round my neck. The stream was so high that I come
pretty near givin' up. It was `pull devil, pull baker,' with me,
and I was glad to ontie my money and let it go. That was before
these blessed banks eased a fellow of his money so slick, and you
had to carry hard cash. So mine went to the bottom, and it's
there yet for what I know. I went to work choppin' till I got
enough to buy me an eighty; and I bought and sold fourteen
times before I could get a farm to suit me; and like enough may
try again before I die.
But you were going to tell me about this hole.
Oh, the hole! yesthat 'ere hole! You see, when I first
settled, and the Indians was as thick as snakes, so that I used to
sleep with my head in an iron pot for fear they should shoot me
through the logs, I dug that hole and fix'd it just right for 'em, in
case they came prowlin' about in the night. I laid a teterin'
board over it, so that if you stepped on it, down you went; and
there was a stout string stretch'd acrost it and tied to the lock of
my rifle, and the rifle was pointed through a hole in the door; so
whoever fell into the hole let off the rifle, and stood a good
chance for a sugar-plum. I sot it so for years and never caught
an Indian, they're so cunning; and after they'd all pretty much
left these parts, I used to set it from habit. But at last I got
tired of it and put up my rifle at night, though I still sot my
trap; and the very first night after I left off puttin' the rifle
through the hole, who should come along but my own brother
from old Kentuck, that I hadn't seen for twenty year! He went
into the hole about the slickest, but it only tore his trowsers a
little
;
and wasn't I glad I hadn't sot the rifle?
CHAPTER II.
Ragion? tu m'odii; ecco il mio sol misfatto.
Alfieri
.
Old
Brand's hatred of the Indians had not always expended
itself in words. When war in its worst shape ravaged the
frontiers
,
there were, besides those regularly commissioned and paid
to destroy, many who took the opportunity of wreaking personal
wrongs, or gratifying that insane hatred of the very name of
Indian
,
which appears to have instigated a portion of the original
settlers. These were a sort of land privateers;the more
merciless
and inhuman that their deeds were perpetrated from the
worst and most selfish impulses, and without even a pretence of
the sanction of law. We may look in vain among the horrors of
savage warfare for any act more atrocious, than some of those
by which the white man has shown his red brother how the
Christian can hate.
The achievement of which the old trapper boasted loudest was
the burning of an Indian wigwam. He would recount, with
circumstantial
minuteness, every item of his preparation for the
murderous deed; the stratagem by which he approached the
place unobserved: and the pleasure that he felt when he saw the
flames curling round the dry bark roof on four sides at once. He
laughed when he told how the father of the family burst through
the pile of burning brush which barricaded the only door, and
how he was shot down before he had time to recognise his cruel
enemy. Then the agonized shrieks of the women and children;
their fleeing half naked and half roasted into the forest; and the
mother and babe found dead in the path the next day,these
were never-failing topics; and, strange to say, old Brand, though
not born a fiend, could exult in the recollection of such
exaggerated
wickedness. War, the concentrated essence of cruelty and
injustice, gave the opportunity, and some wrong, real or
pretended
,
committed by the red man, the excuse; and the outrage was
only remembered as one of the incidental horrors of a border
contest.
As Richard Brand became more infirm, his garrulity seemed
rather to increase, and his grand-daughter, who was his constant
attendant, used to sit for hours drinking in his wild stories, and
imbibing unconsciously, something of the daring and reckless
spirit of the reciter. She grew up to be a tall, majestic-looking
girl, with the eye of Sappho herself; proud and high-spirited,
impatient of control, and peculiarly jealous of any assumption of
superiority in others; yet capable of attachment of the most
ardent
and generous kind to those from whom she experienced
kindness
and consideration. With these qualities she became an
object
of a good deal of interest in the neighbourhood, and none the
less that her grandfather was known to have saved property enough
to be accounted rich where all are nearly alike poor.
Julia Brand had just completed her fourteenth year when her
aged relative failed suddenly; as people who have led rough
lives are apt to do; and his mind and body became so much
enfeebled
that it was thought advisable to remove him to the
vicinity
of more competent aid in case of illness, as well as to more
comfortable shelter than the old shingled hive could now afford.
More than one offer was made by the neighbours, and the old
man, though seeming at first scarcely to understand or accede to
the plan, yet showed a gleam of his former acuteness by making
choice voluntarily of Allen Coddington's house as his future home.
This Coddington was a man whose early advantages had been
such as to place him far above the ordinary class of settlers in
point of intelligence and ability. He was an industrious and
thriving farmer, whose education, begun at one of the best New
England academies, had been furthered by a good deal of solid
reading, and made effective by a habit of observation without
which reading can be of but little practical utility. He stood
decidedly in the first rank among the citizens of his town and
county. He was among the earlier adventurers in that region,
and, having had the wisdom or the forethought, during the time
of extravagant prices, when producers were few and consumers
many, to bestow his whole attention on raising food for the
gold-hunters
,
who forgot to plough or to plant, and yet must eat, he
had turned the speculating mania to good account, and become
comparatively wealthy. His house was ample in size, and well
provided with ordinary accommodations, and his farm presented
the somewhat rare spectacle (in new country experience,) of a
complete supply of every thing requisite for carrying on business
to the best advantage.
Whether Allen Coddington was naturally of a self-satisfied and
exclusive temper, or whether he had become somewhat
overbearing
through success and prosperity, or whether his good
fortune
,
and that alone, had had the effect of rendering him an object
of jealousy and ill-will,he was certainly no favourite in his
neighbourhood
.
He had a certain influence, but it was that which
arises from a sense of power, and not from a feeling of confidence
and attachment. People found his advice valuable, but they
complained that his manner was cold and unsympathizing; and
they remembered the offence long after the benefit was forgotten.
Mr. Coddington's family were still less liked than himself, in
consequence
of their retired habits, which were supposed to argue a
desire to keep themselves aloof from the society about them.
To one man in particular the whole house of Coddington was
an object of the bitterest hatred and envy. This man was their
nearest neighbour; a person of violent passions, and an ambitious
and designing mind, capable of almost any extreme of malignity,
when his pride was hurt, or his favourite objects thwarted.
Blanchard
was not habitually an ill-tempered man. He had often
proved himself capable of great kindness towards those whom he
liked; but he belonged to a class emphatically termed good
haters
a
dreadful anomaly in this erring world, where every man
stands so much in need of the forbearance and kindness of his
fellow man. Whoever had the misfortune to excite his vindictive
feelings was sure of a life-long and uncompromising enmity; and
though prudence might restrain him from overt acts, yet he was
not above many mean arts and secret efforts to lower those
against whom he had conceived any dislike.
To such a man as Blanchard the peaceful and softening
counsels
of an amiable and judicious wife would have been
invaluable
.
Many a ruthless and violent character is kept within
bounds by a gentle influence, which is not the less powerful for
being exerted in a manner unperceived by all but the person most
interested; perhaps unacknowledged even by him. Blessed,
indeed
,
are such peace-makers, and all who belong to them! But
Mrs. Blanchard was a spirit of another tone. Wholly
uneducated
,
both in mind and heart; tormented with a vague and vulgar
ambition to be
first
, without reference to means or ends; and
especially
jealous of the pretence to superior delicacy and
refinement
,
which she conceived to be implied in the quiet and secluded
habits of Mrs. Coddington and her childrenthis woman's soul
was consumed with bitterness; and her ingenuity was constantly
exercised to discover some means of pulling down what she called
the
pride
of her neighbours;a term with which we sometimes
deceive ourselves, when in fact we mean only their superiority.
As was the accusation of witchcraft in olden timesa charge
on which neither evidence, judge nor jury, was necessary to
condemn
the unfortunate suspected,so with us of the West is the
suspicion of pridean undefined and undefinable crime,
described
alike by no two accusers, yet held unpardonable by all.
Once establish the impression that a man is guilty of this high
offence against society, and you have succeeded in ruining his
reputation as a good neighbour. Nobody will ask you for proof;
accusation is proof. This is one of the cases where one has no
right to be suspected. The cry of Mad dog! is not more
surely destructive.
This powerful engine was put in operation by the Blanchard
family, into every member of which the parental hatred of the
Coddingtons had been instilled. They made incessant complaints
of the indignities which they suffered from the
pride
of people
whose true offence consisted in letting them alone, until the whole
neighbourhood had learned from them to look upon the
Coddingtons
as covert enemies.
When Richard Brand made choice of the great house as an
asylum for himself and Julia, he unconsciously gave yet another
tinge of bitterness to the hatred of the Blanchards. They had
been among the most urgent of the inviters, and they felt the
preference given to their detested neighbour as a new insult to
their own pretensions. We have said that old Brand had shown
a glimmering of his ancient sagacity in the decision. The
establishment
to which he was removed was one of extreme
regularity
,
industry and order; the Blanchards were known to be
careless, wild, passionate, and rather thriftless people; whose
business
was done by violent efforts at intervals, instead of habitual
application and method. Their children were ill-governed, and
their eldest son bore a character which was by no means to be
coveted, although he maintained an exterior of decency, and
even affected with some success the manners of a squire of
dames.
Martha Coddington was a sweet, gentle girl; lovely in
appearance
and manners, and in all respects a most desirable
companion
for Julia, whose education had not been such as was
calculated
to endow her with all the feminine graces, although she was
far from being deficient in the stronger and more active qualities
which are no less valuable if something less attractive. Martha
was in very feeble health, and confined almost entirely to
sedentary
occupations; and she had thus enjoyed opportunities for
mental cultivation which would scarcely have fallen to her rustic
lot if she had been blest with full health and strength. It was
partly with a view to constant companionship for this beloved
daughter, that Mr. Coddington had been induced to offer a home
to Richard Brand. The old man himself was becoming almost
a nonentity, and Julia had that indescribable something about her
which attracts the attention and awakens interest without our
being able to define satisfactorily the source of the fascination.
Her manners were singularly simple, child-like and trustful:
while her eye had a power and her step a firmness which
betokened
her ability to judge for herself, and to read the thoughts
of others. She was as yet almost totally undeveloped; but it
was impossible not to perceive at a glance that there was
abundance
of material, either for good or evil, as after circumstances
might sway the balance of her destiny.
Once established in Mr. Coddington's family, Julia enjoyed all
the privileges of a daughter of the house, and shared with
Martha
,
and one or two younger children, the occasional instruction
of the parents. Her quickness of apprehension was remarkable;
and the activity of her habits and the cheerfulness of her temper
made her a valuable assistant to Mrs. Coddington in the various
departments of householdry which would have fallen to Martha's
share if she had been stout like the rest. So that the
arrangement
was one of mutual advantage, and the evening of Richard
Brand's life bid fair to be as calm as its morning had been
boisterous
.
The Blanchards made many attempts at something like
intimacy
with Julia, but these were quietly discouraged by her
protectors
,
probably from a sincere belief that such association would
be unprofitable for her. They were at this time not at all aware
of the deep enmity of the Blanchards, although they had not been
blind to various indications of ill will. So, in silence and
secrecy
grew this baleful hatred! as the deadly nightshade becomes
more intensely poisonous when sheltered from the sun-light and
the breeze. Imagination is the most potent auxiliary of the
passions
.
Nothing so effectually moderates personal dislike as
personal
intercourse. Any circumstance which had thrown these
neighbouring families into contact, in such a way as to bring into
action the good qualities of either, would have done away with
much of their mutual aversion. What a world of misery would
thus have been spared to both!
CHAPTER III.
The undistinguish'd seeds of good and ill
Heav'n in its bosom from our knowledge hides;
And draws them in contempt of human skill,
Which oft for friends mistaken foes provides.
So the false spider, when her nets are spread,
Deep ambushed in her silent den does lie;
And feels afar the trembling of the thread
Whose filmy cord should bind the struggling fly.
Dryden
.
Nearly
three years had Julia Brand passed in Mr.
Coddington's
family; years, for the most part, of quiet happiness and
continual improvement. No care had been omitted by her kind
friends to make her all that a woman should be; and Julia had
imbibed instruction eagerly, and repaid all their efforts by her
attachment
and her increasing usefulness. To Martha she was as
a dear younger sister, whose buoyant spirits had always the
power to cheer, and whose kind alacrity could make even the
disadvantages of ill-health appear less formidable. Yet the
untamed
quality of her earlier nature broke forth sometimes in
starts of strange fierceness, which struck the gentle invalid with
dismay. These flashes of passion almost always originated in
some unpalatable advice, or some attempt at judicious control on
the part of Mrs. Coddington, who had learned to feel a mother's
love for the beautiful orphan; and, although such storms would
end in showers of tears and promises of better self-government,
they were a source of much grief to both Martha and her mother,
who felt the dangers of this impetuosity when they reflected that
no one but the imbecile grandfather possessed a natural right to
direct the course of Julia's actions.
These, however, were but transient clouds. Peace and love
reigned in this well-ordered household, and the old man, now
reduced
to absolute second infancy, received from the family all
the attention that would have been due from his own children
Every fine morning saw his easy chair wheeled into the orchard,
and there, in the pleasant shade, and with Julia at his side, he
would hum fragments of his ancient ditties, or touch, with aimless
finger, the old violin held up for him by Robert Coddington, a boy
about Julia's age, who shared with her much of the care of her
helpless charge. The old man's life was certainly prolonged by
the circumstances of ease and comfort which attended its setting;
to what good end, we might perhaps be disposed to inquire, were
it not that he was, in his present condition at least, so like a
human
grasshopper, that we may suppose he was allowed existence
on the same terms. His dependent state afforded certainly most
ample opportunity for the exercise of kindly feeling in those
about him; and we must believe this to be no unimportant object,
since one part of the lesson of life is to be learned only by such
means.
Julia, loved and cherished, full of ruddy health, and exalted
by intellectual culture, opened gradually into splendid
womanhood
;
her eye deepened in expression by a sense of happiness,
and her movements rendered graceful by continual and willing
activity. Even in the country, where such beauty and grace as
hers are but little appreciated, she could not pass unnoticed.
Though necessarily much secluded, both by the requisite
attendance
on her aged relative, and by the habits of the family of
which she formed a part, her charms were a frequent theme with
the young people of the neighbourhood, and it was sometimes
said, half jest, half earnest, that the Coddingtons kept her shut up,
lest she should take the shine off their sickly daughter. The
Blanchards in particular, took unwearied pains to have it
understood
that poor Julia was a mere drudge, and that all their own
efforts to lighten the weary hours of their fair neighbour were
repelled
by her tyrants, who evidently feared that Julia might be
induced to throw off their yoke if she should have an opportunity
of contrasting her condition with that of other young persons.
There seems to be in the forming stages of society, at least in this
Western country, a burning, restless desire to subject all habits
and manners to one Procrustean rule. Whoever ventures to
differ
essentially from the mass, is sure to become the object of
unkind
feeling, even without supposing any bitter personal
animosity
,
such as existed in the case before us. The retired and
exclusive habits of the Coddington family had centered upon them
almost all the ill-will of the neighbourhood.
As a proof of this we may mention, that when a large barn of
Mr. Coddington's, filled to the very roof with the product of an
abundant harvest, chanced to be struck by lightning and utterly
consumed, instead of the general sympathy which such
occurrences
usually excite in the country, scarce an expression of
regret
was heard. Mr. Blanchard, who was not averse to
making
capital of his neighbour's misfortunes, declared his solemn
belief that this loss was a judgment upon the Coddingtons, and
one which their pride richly deserved. He even went so far, in
private, before his own family, as to wish it had been the house
instead of only one of the barns. The tone of feeling cultivated
in that house may be judged by this specimen. Evil was the
seed, and bitter the fruit it was destined to produce!
Mr. Coddington felt the loss as any farmer must; and he
would still more keenly have felt the unkind sentiment of the
neighbourhood if he had become aware of it. But he was on the
point of revisiting his native State with his family; and in the
bustle of preparation, and the anxiety that attended Martha's
declining health, which formed the main inducement to the
journey
,
the venomous whispers were unheard. He left home
supposing
himself at peace with all the world, always excepting his
nearest neighbour, whose enmity had evinced itself in too many
ways to pass unregarded.
Julia and her grandfather were left in possession of the house,
with the domestics necessary to carry on the affairs of the farm;
and she prepared for a close attention to the household cares, and
a regular course of intellectual improvement, which should make
the long interval of comparative solitude not only profitable, but
pleasant. Mrs. Coddington had learned such confidence in Julia,
that she scarcely thought it necessary to caution her as to her
conduct during her absence. Far less did she exact a promise
as to the long-settled point of free intercourse with the Blanchard
family. She gave only the general advice which a mother's
heart suggests on such occasions, and bade farewell to her
blooming
pupil in full trust that all would go on as usual under Julia's
well-trained eye.
But the Blanchard family, one and all, had settled matters far
otherwise. The very first time that old Brand's chair was
wheeled
into the orchard after the departure of the Coddingtons, a
bunch of beautiful flowers lay on the rude seat beneath the tree
where Julia usually took her station. When she snatched it up
with delight and wonder, she was still more surprised to find
under
it a small volume of poetry. Julia loved flowers dearly, but
poetry was her passion; and she not only read it with delight,
but had herself made some not ungraceful attempts at verse, which
had elicited warm commendations from her kind protectors. Here
was a new author, and one whose style gave the most fascinating
dress to passionate and rather exaggerated sentiment. Julia's
attention
was enchained at once. When she first opened the
volume
her only feeling was a curious desire to know whence it
had come; but when she had read a page she thought no more
of this. The poetry to which alone she had been accustomed,
was not only of a high-toned and severe morality, but of an
abstract
or didactic cast; calculated to quicken her perceptions of
right, rather than to call forth her latent enthusiasm of character.
Cowper and Milton, and Young and Pollok had fed her young
thoughts. But here was a new world opened to her; and it was
not a safe world for the ardent and unschooled child of genius,
who found in the glowing picturings of a spirit like her own, a
power which at once took prisoner her understanding, aroused
her sensibilities, and lulled that cautious and even timid
discrimination
,
with which it had been the object of her friends to inspire
her. She finished the reading at a sitting, and as she returned to
the house with her grandfather, the excitement of her imagination
was such that the whole face of nature seemed changed. A new
set of emotions had been called into play, and the effect was
proportioned
to the wild energy of her character. Poor Julia! she
had tasted the forbidden fruit.
In the afternoon she repeated the pleasure; and it was only
when she laid the volume under her pillow before she retired for
the night, that the question as to the appearance of the book
recurred
to her. It surely could not have been any of the
Blanchards
,
she thought; yet who else had access to the orchard,
which divided the two domains? The next day solved the doubt.
Julia was sitting by the side of her charge, holding with one
hand the old violin, and clasping in the other the source of many
a fair dream, in the shape of the magic volume, when a step
broke the golden meshes of her reverie. She looked up, and
young Blanchard stood before her. She started and blushed, she
knew not why, for she had seen the young man a thousand times
with no other emotion than a vague feeling of dislike.
Have you been pleased with the book my sisters took the
liberty
of sending you, Miss Brand? he said; they wished me to
offer you another, knowing you were fond of reading.
Julia expressed her pleasure eagerly, and received the new
volume with a thrill of delight; accompanied, however, with some
misgiving as to the propriety of obtaining it just in that way.
Blanchard, encouraged by her manner, proceeded to say that
his sisters would have brought the books themselves, if they had
supposed a visit would be agreeable. Having accepted the civility
in one shape, Julia felt that she could not decline it in another,
and the invitation was given, and the visit made.
16
CHAPTER IV.
Virtue, and virtue's rest,
How have they perish'd! Through my onward course
Repentance dogs my footsteps! black Remorse
Is my familiar guest!
Indelibly, within,
All I have lost is written; and the theme
Which Silence whispers to my thought and dream
Is sorrow stilland sin.
Praed
.
The
accomplishment of the first visit by the Blanchards was
only the first step of a regular plan of attack. Each successive
day witnessed successive advances; and the bewildering influence
of poetry, music, and yet sweeter flattery, made rapid inroads
upon Julia's prudence. Still she declined all invitations to visit
at Mr. Blanchard's, knowing how disagreeable such a step would
be to her absent friends; and the young man and his sisters found
they had reached the limit of their power over her, before they
had ventured upon any direct effort to alienate her from her
protectors
.
Whether they would have relinquished the attempt in despair
we cannot tell, for the depths of malice have never yet been
sounded; but a new and potent auxiliary now appeared, who all
unconsciously favoured their plans by attracting Julia's attention
in a remarkable degree. This was a young clergymana
nephew
of Mrs. Blanchard'swho had injured his health by study,
and had come to the country to recruit. He was a tall,
well-looking
young man, with no very particular attractions, except a pale
face, dark, melancholy eyes, and a manner which betokened very
little interest in anything about him. He spent his time
principally
in reading; but he played the flute very well, and was
invited
by the young Blanchards to join them in their visits to their
pretty neighbour in the orchard.
This young clergyman, who had seen something of society, was
not unobservant of Julia's beauty and talent; and although he
does not appear to have had the slightest wish to interest her
particularly
,
the silent flattery of his manner,preferring her upon
all occasions,joined with his graceful person and delicate health,
provide more dangerous to Julia than the direct efforts of his
coarser relations. In short, he proved irresistible to Julia's newly
excited imagination, and after that time the Blanchards found
victory
easy. Before many days Julia suffered herself to be led a
willing visiter to the forbidden doors, conscious all the while that
this was almost equivalent to a renunciation of her long-tried and
still loved friends.
The main point being thus accomplished, the rest followed as
of course. We are not able to trace step by step the process by
which the Blanchards sought to root out from Julia's heart the
love and reverence with which she regarded Mr. Coddington and
his family; but sadly true it is that they succeeded in
convincing
her that far from having been benefited by their care, she had
been secluded from all natural and proper enjoyments, and
persuaded
to become a family-drudge, under the specious veil of a
desire for her improvement. A thousand reminiscences were
called up by these designing people in order to find materials for
mischief. Long-forgotten occurrences were cited and explained
in such a way as to make it appear that the Coddingtons had for
their own purposes deprived Julia of the acquaintance and
sympathy
of the neighbourhood. The seclusion in which she had
grown up was represented as the fruit of a sordid desire to get as
much household duty out of her as possible, while at the same
time her beauty and talents were prevented from appearing to the
disadvantage of the sickly Martha. These things cunningly
insinuated
were like juice of cursed hebenon in Julia's ears. In
her days of calm and healthful feeling she would have scorned
such vile constructions; but under such influences as we have
described, and especially wrapt in the bewildering spell of a
passion
as violent as it was sudden, she was a transformed creature.
Her virtue would have stood the test if her judgment had
remained
clear: but the opium-eater is not more completely the
victim of delusive impressions than such a character as hers when
it is once abandoned to the power of love.
And this loveit carried shame in its very life, for was it not
unsought? Had its object by word or even look evinced a
preference
for Julia? Burning blushes would have answered if we
could have asked such questions of Julia herself. Indeed, this
Mr. Milgrove was a young man of reserved and rather
self-enclosed
habits, who, feeling himself quite superior to the people
among whom he found it convenient to remain for the time, had
given himself very little concern as to the impression he was
making. Thus was unlimited scope given to Julia's unpractised
imagination. She idolized an idea. If the object who chanced
to stand for an embodiment of her dreams had made love like a
mere mortal, her naturally keen perception of character would
have been awakened, and she would have become aware of a cold
indifference of temperament in Milgrove, with which her own
could never harmonize, and which would consequently have
disgusted
her. But such passion as hers does most truly make the
meat it feeds on, and in the exercise of this power its growth is
portentous, and all independent of the real value of its material.
It soon filled the heart of the unfortunate girl to the exclusion of
all better sentiments.
Time flew by, until nearly two months had endowed Julia's
delirium
with the force of habit. Frequent letters from her absent
friends had brought intervals of self-recollection and self-reproach;
but the intoxication was too delicious; and with a sigh over the
conscious disingenuousness, she wrote again and again without
once mentioning her intimacy with the Blanchards or the presence
of their relative. It is true, she tried to say to herself, that Mrs.
Coddington had no right to control her movements; but hers was
not a heart to satisfy itself with such fallacies. She felt deeply
guilty, and she deliberately endured the dreadful load, for the
sake of the dreams which attended it. Her fear now was the
speedy return of her best friends. That must, as she well knew,
put a stop at once to all intercourse with those malevolent
neighbours
,
and deprive her of the sight of one to whom she had devoted
her whole soul, unsought and unappreciated.
At length the period arrived when a letter from Mrs.
Coddington
announced that the family were about to return, travelling
very slowly on account of Martha's sinking state, now more
alarming
than ever before. Julia's emotions on receiving this
intelligence
were of the most violent kind. She sat with the letter
before
herher eyes fixed on the account given by the afflicted
mother of the state of her dying child; and as she gazed, her
mind may truly be said to have suffered the nature of an
insurrection
.
All her better self was roused by the thought of
Martha's
rapid decay, and a flood of tears attested the reality and the
tenderness of her affection for this excellent friend; yet, on the
other side, the fascinations of the past two months were present in
all their power; and as she reflected that these must now be
renounced
,
she groaned aloud, and grasped her throbbing temples
with both hands, as if to preserve them during the agony of the
struggle. In this condition she was found by one of the
daughters
of Mr. Blanchard, who had, by various arts, succeeded in
gaining her confidence completely.
These young women, who were in every way inferior to Julia,
derived all their interest in her eyes from their connection with
the object of her mad attachment. She saw them as she saw him
through a medium of utter delusion. The elder, more
particularly
,
was a designing and malicious girl, who hated Martha
Coddington
with a perfect hatred, and who had always assisted in
fomenting the enmity which had arisen between the two families.
Julia's state of mind rendered her incapable of any disguise.
Her passionate worship of the young clergyman had been a thing
only suspected; but she now threw herself upon Sophia
Blanchard's
neck, and bewailed herself in the wildest terms, wishing for
death to rid her of her misery, and declaring that she would not
support an existence which had become odious to her. In the
course of these frantic declarations, the whole history of her
feelings
came out, and Sophia, far from reasoning with her on the
destructive effects of such self-abandonment, artfully condoled
with her on being obliged to remain with the Coddingtons, and
urged her to break with them at once, and remove with her
grandfather
to a home where she would find welcome and happiness.
But courage for this step was more than Julia could assume.
She had suffered herself to receive unfavourable impressions of her
absent protectors, but her habitual reverence for them was such
that she dared not think of braving their ill opinion. And
besides
,
she well knew that the old man, childish as he was in
many respects, could never be persuaded to the change. So she
shook her head despairingly, and repeated her conviction that
death alone could relieve wretchedness like hers.
Sophia Blanchard, bold and designing as she was, trembled at
these words. She knew Julia well enough to believe that such
feelings, acting upon such a spirit, might not improbably result in
some rash act. Finding Julia resolute in her rejection of the
expedient
proposed, she set herself about contriving some other
which should serve the double purpose of securing Julia and
annoying
the Coddingtons.
Are there moments when all guardian angels leave us at the
mercy of the evil influences within? If it be so, such times are
surely those when we have wilfully given the rein to passion, and
avowed ourselves its slaves, to the scorn of that better principle
which watches for us as long as we allow its benign sway. Why
hath Satan entered into thine heart? Alas! do we not invite
him? Poor Julia! his emissary is even now at thine ear!
Things too wild for fiction must yet find place in a real record
of human actions. The plan which presented itself to the thoughts
of Sophia Blanchard, was probably suggested by the bitter
expressions
she had heard under the parental roof; yet it was too
outrageous to have been broached seriously by a person more
advanced
in age or better acquainted with the ordinary course of
affairs. To set fire to Mr. Coddington's house after the family
were asleep;then to give the alarm, and remove the old man
and such articles as could be savedthis was the diabolical
advice
which this ill-taught girl gave boldly to the wretched Julia,
carefully keeping out of view the promptings of her own
hereditary
spite, and making it appear that the loss would be a matter
of no vital importance to a man of Mr. Coddington's property,
while it would set Julia free to remove at once to Mr.
Blanchard's
,
where Mr. Milgrove had decided to remain for some
time.
CHAPTER V.
Blessings beforehandties of gratefulness
The sound of glory ringing in our ears
Without, our shame; within our consciences
Angels and graceeternal hopes and fears.
Yet all these fences and their whole array
One cunning BOSOM-SIN blows quite away.
George Herbert
.
Instead
of rejecting this atrocious proposal with horror, as the
Julia of purer days would have done, the unhappy girl listened in
silence to all Sophia's baleful whispers, and with this tacit
permission
the whole plan was gradually developed; Sophia's ready
ingenuity devising expedients to obviate each objection as it
presented
itself, till all was made to appear easy of
accomplishment
,
and secure from detection. Still Julia did not speak. She
sat with glazed eyes fixed upon her tempter, and not a muscle
moved, whether in approval or rejection of the plan. Frightened
by her ghastly face, Sophia Blanchard took her hand: it was cold
and clammy as that of a corpse. Thinking Julia about to faint,
she ran for water, and was about to use it as a restorative,
when her victim, rousing herself, put it back with a motion of her
hand.
Enough, Sophia, she said; no more of this now; leave me
to myself! Gogono more! and no entreaties could induce
her to say one word as to her acceptance of the proposition upon
which her adviser had ventured. Sophia Blanchard was obliged
to return home in no very easy state of mind, and all her efforts
to obtain admittance again proved fruitless. Julia resolutely
refused
to see any one of the family.
Three days passed in this sort of suspensean ominous pause,
and one which gave Sophia ample time to reflect on the step she
had taken, and to consider its consequences. The old man went
not forth to his place in the orchard. He sat whimpering in the
corner, scolding at Julia's laziness, and wishing that Robert
Coddington
would come back, that he might have somebody to take
care of him. Julia, stern and silent, moved about the house with
more than her usual activity, regulating matters which had of
late been less carefully attended to than usual, and insisting upon
extra efforts on the part of the domestics, in order that every thing
might be in order for the reception of the family. On the
evening
of the third day all was pronounced ready, and the morrow
was talked of as the time for the probable arrival.
At midnight a loud knocking and shouting at Mr. Blanchard's
doors announced that a fire had broken out; and at the same
moment
a broad sheet of flame burst from the further end of Mr.
Coddington's house. The neighbourhood was soon aroused, and
all the efforts that country resources allow, were used to save the
main body of the building. Meanwhile, old Brand was carried,
in spite of his angry struggles and repeated declarations that he
would not go, to Mr. Blanchard's, and laid on a bed in one of the
lower rooms, Julia herself superintending the removal with
solicitous
care. This done, she took the lead in bringing out from the
blazing pile, everything of value; herself secured Mr.
Coddington's
papers, and suggested, from her knowledge of the affairs of
the family, what might best engage the attention of the assistants.
Most of the effects were thus placed in safety; but with scanty
supplies of water, and nothing more effectual than buckets, the
attempt to preserve any part of the house was soon discovered to
be hopeless. The neighbours, having done their best, were
obliged to withdraw to some distance, where they could only
stand and gaze upon the flames, and listen to their appalling
roar.
It was during this pause that the general attention was called
by the most agonizing shrieks, and Julia, who had been all
composure
during the agitation of the night, was seen coming from
Mr. Blanchard's in a state of absolute distraction. She had
hastened
from the fire to look after her helpless charge, but on
reaching
the bed on which he had been placed, she found it empty and
cold. A blanket that had been wrapped round him lay in the
path through the orchard, and the conviction had struck Julia at
once, as it did the minds of all present, that the old man, feeble
as he was, had, with the obstinacy of dotage, taken the
opportunity
when all were engrossed with the fire, to return to his own
chamber, now surrounded by flames. Julia darted towards the
door of the burning dwelling, but she was forcibly withheld by
the men present, who declared the attempt certain destruction.
While she still struggled and shrieked in their arms, the whole
roof fell in, and a fresh volume of flame went roaring and
crackling
up to the very stars. The old man was gone!gone to his
account, of which the midnight burning of the helpless formed so
dread an item. And Juliait is scarcely to be wondered at that
she envied him his fate. We dare not attempt a picture of her
condition.
The grey light of dawn began to chill the glare of the dying
flames. The contrast produced a ghastly tint on all around, till
the countenances of those who continued to watch the smouldering
fire looked as if death, instead of only fatigue and exhaustion,
was doing its work upon them. Julia, having resisted all
entreaties
of the Blanchards to go with them to their house, stood
with fixed gaze, and rigid as a statue, contemplating the ruin
before her; when the sound of approaching wheels was heard;
and the dreary light disclosed the return of the unfortunate
family
,
not with one carriage only, as they left home, but with two;
and travelling at so slow a pace that it seemed as if they brought
calamity with them in addition to that which awaited them at
their desolate home.
They are coming! The whisper went round, and then an
awe-struck silence pervaded the assembly. Julia's perceptions
seemed almost gone, although she was denied the refuge of
temporary
insensibility. She had already suffered all that nature
could bear, and a stupid calm had succeeded her agonizing cries.
Yet she drew near the carriage which contained her friends, and
cast her eyes eagerly around.
Where is Martha? she said, in a voice so altered, so
hollow
,
that the hearers started.
Mrs. Coddington burst into tears, but could not speak. Her
husband answered with a forced calmness, Julia, my love, our
dear Martha is at rest! We have brought home only her cold
remains.
Julia uttered not a sound, but, tossing her arms wildly in the
air, fell back, utterly lifeless, and in this state was carried to the
house of one of the neighbours.
The funeral was necessarily hurried, for poor Martha had died
two days before; so that the ruins of the home of her childhood
were still smoking when the sad procession passed them on its
way to the grave. Julia, recovered from that kind swoon, had
made a strong effort to master her feelings, and to take some part
in the last duties, but so violent had been the action of the
overtasked
nerves, that she was feeble and faint, and utterly
incapable
of the least exertion. No vestige of the old man's body could
be found among the ruins, so that she was spared the vain
anguish
of so horrible a sight; yet the reality could have been
scarcely more dreadful than the picturings of her own
guilt-quickened
fancy. She shrunk from joining, according to the
custom of the country, in the funeral solemnities of her friend,
and passed the dread interval alone in her chamber.
When the bereaved parents returned to the house, Mrs.
Coddington
went immediately to Julia.
My daughter! she said, my dearmy
only
daughter!
what should I be now without you! You must take the place of
the blessed creature who is gone! And she threw herself
sobbing
upon Julia's bosom, clasping her in her arms, and bestowing
upon her all the fulness of a mother's heart.
Like a blighted thing did the wretched girl shrink from her
embrace, and sinking prostrate on the floor at her feet, pour out
at once the whole shameful story of her guilt. Not a shade was
omitted, not even the unsought and frantic love which was now
loathsome in her own eyes, nor the suspicions of Mr. and Mrs.
Coddington which had been instilled into her heart until its very
springs were poisoned.
Mrs. Coddington shook like an aspen leaf. She tried to speak
to askto exclaimbut words came not from her paralyzed
lips. At lengthJulia! she faltered out,Juliaare you
mad? You cannot surely mean, my childyou
cannot
mean all
this! You cannot intend me to believe that you are the
She stopped, for Julia, still prostrate, groaned and shuddered,
deprecating by a motion of her hand, any recapitulation of the
horrors she had disclosed.
It is true, she said; I am all that I have told you; I have
burned your dwelling, so long my happy home; I have
committed
murder,all I ask now is punishment. I have thought of
all; I am ready for what is to follow; I wish for the worst;
make haste, for I must die soon,very soon!
She concluded so wildly, and with such an outburst of agony
that Mrs. Coddington again thought her mind had become
unsettled
by the dreadful occurrences of the last few hours.
But these tears somewhat relieved her, and she was
comparatively
calm after the paroxysm had subsided. And now, in a
collected manner, and in the presence of Mr. Coddington, did she
firmly repeat all that she had said, gathering courage as she
proceeded
,
and anxiously entreating to have her statement taken
down in legal form.
Mr. Coddington, once convinced that there was a dreadful
reality
in all this, felt it as any other man would; but he treated
it with a calmness and forbearance which not every man could
have commanded. He heard Julia's statement through, asked
some questions as to certain particulars, and then, taking her
hand with his old air of fatherly kindness, he said, My poor
child! you have been dreadfully deluded! Those who have led
you astray have much to answer for, and I shall take care that
they do not escape the reckoning. You I can forgive. The
mental sufferings you must endure are atonement enough; but
for those who wilfully poisoned your young mind
Oh nono! exclaimed Julia; no one is to blame but
myself
.
I alone am answerable for my crime! I did all with my
own free willout of my own wicked heart! And oh! how I
wish this wretched heart were cold and still, even now! How I
envy dear Martha her peaceful grave! Make haste and take
down what I have said, for I
cannot
live!
Julia! said Mr. Coddington, interrupting her, with an air of
severity very different from his former manner, do you wish me
to believe that all your expressions of remorse and self-abasement
are false and hollow? What do you mean? That you would
raise your hand against your own life? Rash girl! your thoughts
are impious. Suicide is not the resource of the true penitent,
but of the proud and self-worshipping hypocrite. If you are
sincere
in your desire to atone for the injury you have done me,
show it by entire submission to what I shall see fit to direct.
You know me; you know you have no reason to dread
harshness
at my hand. Be quiet then; command yourself, and
to-morrow
I will talk with you again.
So saying he left the room, seeing Julia too much exhausted
for further conference, but Mrs. Coddington remained long with
her, soothing her perturbed spirit by every thing that a mother's
love could have suggested, and assuring her of Mr. Coddington's
kindness and of his forgiveness. You have already suffered
enough, my poor child, said this kind-hearted woman; now go
to rest, pray for pardon and for peace, and fit yourself by a quiet
night for the duties of to-morrow.
And such friends Julia had been persuaded to believe harsh
and unsympathizing!
We shall not venture to give a fictitious conclusion to this story
of real life. It might not be difficult to award
poetical
justice;
but neither that nor any other was the result of Mr. Coddington's
efforts. He adhered firmly to his resolution of holding Julia's
advisers answerable for what she had done. She was not yet
sixteen, and her account of all that had passed during the
absence
of her friends plainly showed a conspiracy on the part of
the Blanchard family to do him a deep injury. Slanderous
fabrications
of the vilest character had been employed to prejudice
Julia against her benefactors. She had been urged to treacherous
and injurious conduct; persuaded that Mr. Coddington was
planning
to possess himself of her property, on her grandfather's
death; and frequently reminded that whatever injury should be
done to the Coddingtons, would be considered as no worse than
they merited; in attestation of which the sentiment of the
neighbourhood
on the occasion of the burning of the barn, was
frequently
cited. On the whole, Mr. Coddington, who was a man
of strong and decided character, was fully of opinion that he had
just cause of complaint against Blanchard, as answerable not
only for his own share of these misdemeanours, but for those
which his family, by his instigation, had carried more fully into
practice. He refused, therefore, to listen to Julia's entreaties,
that she alone might bear the burthen of her crime, and
proceeded
to seek redress from his malicious neighbour.
His first care was to obtain an interview with Mr. Blanchard,
and endeavour to induce him to make reparation and
acknowledgment
,
from a sense of justice. But this course, however
accordant
with the sound principles of the injured party, was wholly
lost upon the virulent enmity of his opponent. Blanchard, who
did not believe in Julia's deep repentance, treated his neighbour's
remonstrances with scorn and derision. He heaped abuse and
insult upon Mr. Coddington, telling him that it was well known
that his premises had been insured beyond their value, and more
than suspected that the fire had been a matter of his own
planning
,
in order that the insurance money might help to build a
more modern house. He said, as to Julia, that the young men
of the neighbourhood had resolved to release her by force, in case
she was not given up peaceably, since she was believed to be
detained
against her will. In short, this bold, bad man, strong in
the knowledge that the prejudices of the country, (so easily
awakened on the subject of
caste
,) had been thoroughly turned
against the Coddington family, defied him with contempt, and left
nothing unsaid that could exasperate his temper.
Mr. Coddington now resolved to appeal to the laws, his last
resort
against this determined enmity. That Blanchard was
morally
accountable he felt no doubt; to render him legally so, he
thought required only that the fact should be plainly set forth to
a jury. The ends of justice seemed to sanction if they did not
require such a course; since it is always desirable to ascertain
what protection the laws do really afford to those who give them
their support. He probably thought this necessary also on Julia's
account; for her dread secret was in possession of the declared
enemies of the family; and a judicial investigation, by showing the
influence under which she had acted, would place the matter in
its true light, and set forth the palliation with the crime. So the
matter was laid before the grand jury.
It might, perhaps, be inquiring too curiously, to ask whether,
in coming to this conclusion, Mr. Coddington did not consult his
passions rather than his judgment. It is difficult to know exactly
how much love we bear to abstract justice. That another course
would better have promoted both his happiness and his pecuniary
interests, is highly probable; since it is at least as true in a new
country, as elsewhere, that the law is a great gulf which is apt
to swallow up both parties. Yet the desire to appeal to public
justice was at all events a natural, if not a prudent one.
But a grand jury, though sworn to diligently inquire and a
true presentment make of such matters as the foregoing, and
that without fear, favour, or affection, are far from being above
prejudice, and, perhaps, not always secure from influences likely
to obstruct the even flow of justice. When the matter is not a
foregone conclusion, a judgment prejudged,it too often
happens
that the story first told has the advantage. There is no
room for more than one set of ideas on the same theme. The
prominent and tangible fact in this case was, that a young girl
confessed having burned a house; this might bring her to the
penitentiary, and the jury would not find a true bill. In vain
did the deeply penitent Julia make her statement in presence of
the court. She was represented as under compulsion. She was
taken aside again and again, at the repeated instigation of
Blanchard, as if, like prince Balak, he still hoped peradventure
she
will curse me them from thence;but although her story
was unaltered, it remained unheeded. She was now offered half
the homes in the neighbourhood, and repeatedly reminded that
she was under the protection of the court, and could go where
she liked; but she insisted on remaining with Mr. Coddington,
and declared that she desired life only that it might be spent in
atoning the injury she had done him. Foiled, as we have seen,
in his attempt to make the shame and the punishment due to so
great an offence fall on those whom he considered most guilty,
Mr. Coddington's next thought was to vindicate his own character
from the boundless calumnies of his envious neighbour. But a
better consideration of the case determined him to let his
reputation
clear itself; trusting that the past and the future would alike
be his vouchers to all those whose opinion he valued. So he
contented
himself with having placed Julia in comparative safety,
and resolved to live down the calumnies which had been so
industriously
propagated against him. Instead of quitting the
neighbourhood
,
as a man of weaker character might have done, he has
rebuilt his house, and adopted Julia as his daughter, fully
convinced
of the change in her character, as well as of the violent
mental excitement under which she yielded to temptation; and if
there be any truth in the doctrine of compensations, it cannot be
doubted that a man of his character must, in time, obtain a
complete
though silent triumph over the desperate malignity of such
people as the Blanchards.
THE END.